




TravelerStation旅行用品專賣店   美冠皮件


































  Language

中文
English
日本語

 銷售據點 


登入/註冊


0 Item          


























×






















  Language

中文
English
日本語

 銷售據點 


登入/註冊


0 Item          


























×


































































×











© 2016 美冠皮件有限公司  Designed by fishsaut 







































Protective Cases, Flashlights, & Outdoor Gear | Pelican Products







   
; 




						 · 
						
						EN						
						 · 
						log in 
					


  United States
  Europe
  Australia
  Canada






English
Español
Français
Italiano
Deutsch
Nederlands
Svenska
Polski
Русский 













ABOUT

Contact Us
Our Story
Leadership
Behrman Capital
Careers
Press Releases
In the News
Dealer log in
Guarantee of Excellence
Technical Bulletins





 
								 · 
								
								EN								
								 · 
								log in


Consumer Use  •  
								Professional Use  •  
								BioThermal











About Pelican

Contact Us
Our Story
Leadership
Behrman Capital
Careers



News

Press Releases
Pelican in the News



Support

Dealer log in
Guarantee of Excellence
Technical Bulletins







About




















Coolers

Soft Coolers
Elite Coolers








Cases

Pelican Air
Protector Case
Storm Case












Drinkware


Headlamps
Flashlights










Phone & Tablet

iPhone
iPad
Samsung Galaxy
LG








Travel

Luggage
Backpacks









Dive Lights
Tactical Lights




Consumer Use















Cases

Protector Case
Storm Case
Pelican Air








Lights

Tactical Flashlights
Headlamps
Safety Lights












Luggage
Backpacks


Coolers
Tumblers











Single Lid
Custom Cases
Rack Mount
Mobile Military
ISP








Remote Area Lights








BioThermal




Professional Use























BioThermal













Consumer Use





Professional Use





BioThermal
















 






9455 SAFETY LIGHT






SOFT COOLERS






BIOTHERMAL






PELICAN AIR + TREKPAK






CAPSIZED
 



Previous



Next
 
 




Consumer Use

Coolers
Cases
Phones & Tablets
Lights
Travel
Drinkware

Team Pelican
Phone & Tablet
Videos


   
							   
							



Professional Use

Cases
Lights
Coolers
Drinkware
Travel

Videos
Custom Cases
Pelican Air
Design Your Own Foam


   
							   
							



BioThermal
						About
						
Contact Us
Our Story
Leadership
Behrman Capital
Careers
Press Releases
In the News



						 

Dealer log in
Guarantee of Excellence
Technical Bulletins
Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy


   
							   
							











							© 2017 PELICAN PRODUCTS, INC.
						

							All trademarks are registered and/or unregistered trademarks of Pelican Products, Inc., its subsidiaries and/or affiliates.
						



800.473.5422





 







































Burger King products - Wikipedia






















 







Burger King products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Burger King


A Burger King Whopper combo meal




Type

Subsidiary


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Predecessor
Insta-Burger King


Founded
Insta-Burger King:
1953; 64 years ago (1953)
Jacksonville, Florida
Burger King:
1954; 63 years ago (1954)
Miami, Florida


Founder
Insta-Burger King:
Keith J. Kramer and Matthew Burns
Burger King:
David Edgerton and James McLamore


Headquarters
5505 Blue Lagoon Drive, Miami-Dade County, Florida, United States



Number of locations

15,000+ (2015)



Area served

Global



Key people




Alexandre Behring (Chairman RBI)[1]:123
Daniel S. Schwartz (CEO)[1]:123
José E. Cil (President)[1]:123
Joshua Kobza (CFO)[1]:123





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
breakfast
hot dogs





Revenue
 US$4.05 billion (FY 2015)[1]:30



Operating income

 US$363.0 million (FY 2015 RBI)[1]:30



Net income

 US$1.912 billion (FY 2015 RBI)[1]:30


Total assets
 US$18.41 billion (FY 2015 RBI)[1]:31


Total equity
 US$2.912 billion (FY 2015 RBI)[1]:31



Number of employees

34,248 (FY 2015 RBI)


Parent
Restaurant Brands International


Website

www.bk.com
This box:

view
talk
edit





When the predecessor of international fast food restaurant chain Burger King (BK) first opened in 1953, its menu predominantly consisted of hamburgers, French fries, soft drinks, milkshakes, and desserts. After being acquired by its Miami, Florida franchisees and renamed in 1954, BK began expanding its menu by adding the Whopper sandwich in 1957, and has since added non-beef items such as chicken, fish, and vegetarian offerings, including salads and meatless sandwiches. Other additions include a breakfast menu and beverages such as Icees, juices, and bottled waters. As the company expanded both inside and outside the United States, it introduced localized versions of its products that conform to regional tastes and cultural or religious beliefs. To generate additional sales, BK occasionally introduces limited-time offers of special versions of its products, or brings out completely new products intended for either long- or short-term sales. Not all of these products and services have been successful; in 1992, Burger King introduced limited table service featuring special dinner platters, but this concept failed to generate interest and was discontinued.
The company introduced the first iteration of its breakfast menu, along with the company's "Specialty Sandwich" product line, in a 1978 menu expansion. The products were some of the first designed by a fast food restaurant chain that were intended to capture the adult market, members of which would be willing to spend more on a higher-quality product. The expanded Burger King menu was part of a plan by then-company president Donald N. Smith to reach the broadest possible demographic market to better compete with McDonald's, and to fend off then newcomer Wendy's, who had a growing market share. The plan was successful: the company's sales increased by 15 percent. Despite another menu expansion in 1985, the company's market gains diminished due to neglect of the brand at the hands of then-parent Pillsbury and its successors, Grand Metropolitan and Diageo. When the company was sold to a group led by TPG Capital in 2004, the trend of targeting an expanded audience was renewed under a plan by its then-CEO Brad Blum. During Blum's tenure, the company added several products that featured higher-quality ingredients and other menu fare that again attempted to appeal to the adult palate and demographic. As in the past, not all of these products met corporate sales expectations, or in the case of several of its larger offerings, resulted in negative publicity due to nutritional concerns. With the purchase of the company in 2010 by 3G Capital, the company again began another revamp of its product line by phasing out some products, introducing new ones and redesigning others including its flagship Whopper sandwich.
Like its menu, the equipment the company cooks its hamburgers with has also evolved as the company grew. The burgers have always been broiled mechanically; the original unit, called an Insta-Broiler, was one of two pieces of equipment the founders of Insta-Burger King purchased before opening their new restaurant. The Insta-Broiler worked by cooking 12 burger patties in a wire basket, allowing the patties to be cooked from both sides simultaneously. With the acquisition of the chain by its Miami franchisees came an improved unit dubbed a "Flame Broiler". Designed by the new owners, it featured stationary burners that cooked the meat on a moving chain. The unit broke down less often, while maintaining a similar cooking rate. The cooking format remained for the next 40 years until Burger King developed a new, variable speed broiler that could handle multiple items with different cooking rates and times. These new unit began testing in 1999 and eventually evolved into the two models the company deployed system-wide in 2008–2009. Accompanying these new broilers was new food-holding equipment and a computer-based product monitoring system for its cooked products. The new system allows for more concise tracking of product quality, while giving its users a method to streamline costs by more precisely projecting sales and product usage



Contents


1 History

1.1 Sandwiches and entrées
1.2 Ancillaries
1.3 Breakfast


2 Regionalization
3 Preparation methods

3.1 Broiling
3.2 Kitchen equipment
3.3 Sandwich preparation


4 Demographic targeting

4.1 Value
4.2 Children
4.3 Adult
4.4 The "Superfan"


5 Nutrition
6 Products

6.1 Packaging
6.2 Reformulations
6.3 Limited time offers
6.4 Trends
6.5 Licensed products
6.6 Failed products


7 Suppliers and purchasing

7.1 Purchasing guidelines for meat

7.1.1 2001 Guidelines
7.1.2 2008 Guidelines
7.1.3 2012 Guidelines


7.2 Food

7.2.1 Condiments
7.2.2 Proteins
7.2.3 Sides and desserts


7.3 Beverages

7.3.1 Soft drinks
7.3.2 Coffee
7.3.3 Alcoholic drinks


7.4 Distributors


8 See also
9 Notes
10 References
11 External links



History[edit]
Main article: History of Burger King
Sandwiches and entrées[edit]




The Whopper sandwich, Burger King's signature product


When the predecessor to the modern Burger King, Insta-Burger King, opened in 1953 in Jacksonville, Florida,[2] the company's menu consisted predominantly of hamburgers, French fries, soft drinks, and desserts. Insta-Burger King was acquired in 1954 by two of its franchisees, James McLamore and David Edgerton, who renamed it Burger King. Under its new ownership, the company continued to develop its core menu, cooking techniques, and equipment. In 1957 McLamore and Edgerton created BK's signature item, the Whopper, as a way to differentiate BK from other burger outlets at the time. The Whopper is a 4 oz (110 g) hamburger with lettuce, tomato, mayonnaise, pickle, and ketchup, that was priced at 29¢. The sandwich was designed to give the customer a larger product with better value than competitors, who were selling burgers with an average price of 15¢.[3][4] As Burger King's flagship product, the Whopper has been expanded beyond the original sandwich into a line of sandwiches all made with the same ingredients. The Whopper sandwich has undergone several modifications in its recipe over the years, with a change from a plain bun to a sesame seed roll in the early 1970s and a change in patty size in the mid-1980s being two of the most notable.[5] Since its inception, the Whopper has become synonymous with Burger King and become the focus of much of its advertising.[6] The company has even named its kiosk-style restaurants "Whopper Bars".[7]
In 1978, Donald N. Smith was hired from McDonald's to help restructure the corporate operations of Burger King to better compete against his former company as well as the then up-and-coming chain, Wendy's. As part of an operational overhaul he dubbed "Operation Phoenix",[notes 1] one of his first changes to the company's menu was to add the Burger King specialty sandwich line in 1979. This line—with many non-hamburger sandwiches, including chicken and fish—significantly expanded the breadth of the BK menu. It was one of the first attempts by a major fast food chain to target a specific demographic, in this case adults aged between 18 and 34 years, members of which were presumably willing to spend more on a higher quality product.[notes 2] The new products were successful, and the company's sales increased by 15 percent.[8] While most of the line has since been discontinued, the company's Original Chicken Sandwich is still offered in all of its global markets, and the ham and cheese sandwich is a regional offering.[9]
BK Chicken Tenders made their debut in a menu revision and expansion in 1985 to address the absence of a chicken-based finger product akin to McDonald's Chicken McNuggets. The product had to be temporarily withdrawn because of limited availability of chicken meat; it was re-introduced about six months later.[10] Originally made with sliced fillets of chicken, the product was changed to a formed chopped-chicken product several years later.[11] In 1987, BK rolled out the Burger Bundles, a pack of six mini burger sliders, similar to White Castle was brought back later as the "Burger Buddy".[12] Fish Tenders were introduced to complement Chicken Tenders during a menu expansion in 1989. The new fish product, sold in the same style of container as the Chicken Tenders, was an order of fish sticks with Tartar sauce for dipping. Portion sizes were similar to those of the Chicken Tenders. Fish Tenders were discontinued in 1990.[notes 3]




A BK Original Chicken Sandwich, one of the products introduced under Operation Phoenix in 1978.


The company introduced its first broiled chicken sandwich, the BK Broiler, in 1990. The sandwich included a dill-ranch mayonnaise and was served on an oat-bran roll.[13][14] In 1998, BK reformulated the BK Broiler into a larger, more male-oriented sandwich: a larger chicken patty with mayonnaise served on a Whopper bun. In 2002, BK changed the name of the sandwich to Chicken Whopper and added a smaller Chicken Whopper Jr. sandwich.[15][16] The company replaced the Chicken Whopper line with another broiled sandwich line in 2003, the BK Baguette line. The chicken sandwich, served on a fresh cooked baguette roll, and came in several varieties, all of which were topped with a series of ingredients that were low in fat. They were sold in the United States at one time, but are now sold only in the European market.[17] The failed Baguette line was replaced in North America with the current grilled chicken iteration, the TenderGrill sandwich.[18]
Although Wendy's was the first to have a value menu in 1989, Burger King decided to offer its own value menu in 1998.[19][20] This menu featured seven products: the Whopper Jr., a five-piece Chicken Tenders, a bacon cheeseburger, medium-sized French fries, medium soft drink, medium onion rings, and a small milkshake – all priced at 99¢ (USD). In 2002 and 2006, BK revamped its value menu by adding and removing several products such as chili and the Rodeo Cheeseburger.[21] Many of these items, such as Chili, tacos, the Sourdough burger (a product similar to the Whopper Jr., but with sourdough bread), and Chicken Tender sandwiches have since been discontinued, modified, or relegated to regional menu options.[22]
Returning to the practice of targeting the adult demographic as it had in 1978, BK introduced several new products to its menu in 2003. The new products included new or revamped chicken sandwiches, a new salad line, and its BK Joe brand of coffee.[23] The first of these items was the TenderCrisp chicken sandwich, an entirely new sandwich which featured a fried 5.2 oz (150 g) whole-muscle chicken breast on a corn-dusted roll. The sandwich was part of then-CEO Greg Brenneman's plans to bolster the company's revived "Have it your way" advertising program, which was designed to draw younger people to its stores.[24] Some items, including the Enormous Omelet Sandwich line and the BK Stacker line, brought negative attention due the large portion size, amounts of unhealthy fats, and the presence of trans-fats.[25][26][27] At the time, many of the products featured higher-quality ingredients like whole chicken breast, Angus beef, Cheddar cheese, and pepper jack cheese.[28][29] Not all the products new products introduced under Blum's tenure met corporate sales expectations, the Baguette Chicken sandwiches being an example.[30] Others products, such as Burger King's line of "indulgent" burgers originally called the Angus Burger,[31] have undergone multiple reformulations. The Angus Steak burger was originally based around a 5 oz (140 g) frozen patty; despite high expectations from the company, the sandwich fared poorly.[32] After a reformulating program, it was relaunched in 2008 as the 5 oz (140 g) Angus Steakhouse burger.[33] With the introduction of a new multifunction broiler capable of cooking a more diverse set of products, Burger King replaced the Angus Steakhouse burger with the 7 oz (200 g) Steakhouse XT burger in 2009.[notes 4] In 2011, the company discontinued selling the product in the North American market, replacing it with the Chef's Choice Burger. The Chef's Choice Burger was removed in 2012. 2014 saw the introduction of the newest attempt at introducing a premium burger to the company's portfolio with the introduction of the A.1. Ultimate Cheeseburger in North America.
The Burger Bundles returned in 2011 with beef and chicken patty options.[12]
Ancillaries[edit]




A package of Burger King's zesty onion ring dipping sauce


During 1997, BK revamped its French fries in North America. The improved fries were coated with a layer of potato-based starch, giving the fries a crisp shell that maintained its texture longer. The company introduced them in a series of advertisements that claimed the new fries tasted better than McDonald's fries in consumer taste comparisons. Other ads featured Mr. Potato Head in a series of demographically-targeted commercials.[34] The fries were in research and development for over two years and already had been available in several markets when the advertising campaign began.[35] In Europe, BK also sells potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick-cut and wedge-shaped. In 1991, the company introduced Twister fries, spiral-cut fries with a spicy coating, as part of a promotional push. Part of the product's appeal was they were served in a paper drink cup as opposed to the normal fry carton. The product was designed as a short-term promotion that would be periodically reintroduced.[36]
In 2002, Burger King offered "Shake 'em up Fries", which included a bag of fries and a packet of spices. The customer would add the spices to the fries and then shake the bag until the fries were coated.[37][38]
Beyond French fries, the company has introduced several other side products over the course of its existence. Onion rings have been part of the menu for the majority of BK history. Originally made from whole, sliced onions, they were reformulated into a formed product made from onion paste in 2001 as part of a menu revamp.[39] In the same 2001 menu revamp, the company added an onion ring-specific dipping sauce, and emphasized it again during its 99¢ BK Value Menu introduction in 2002.[40] As part of its BK Cravers value menu introduction in 2005, the company briefly sold jalapeño poppers accompanied by a side of ranch dressing as part of its national menu. The same menu added mozzarella sticks with a side of marinara sauce; the mozzarella sticks have since been relegated to a regional menu item in the United States, but are sold on the national menu in Canada.[41][42][notes 5]
Breakfast[edit]
See also: Burger King breakfast sandwiches




BK Croissan'Wich


One of Smith's significant contributions to the menu was the addition of a breakfast product line as part of the 1978 product line expansion. Up until that point, breakfast was not a market Burger King had served.[notes 6] Other than the addition of the Croissan'Wich in 1983, the breakfast menu remained almost identical to the McDonald's offerings until a menu revamp in 1986.[notes 7] This expansion introduced BK's A.M. Express product line, which included French toast sticks and mini-muffins.[43] The new breakfast line was designed to be portable, because studies had shown that an increasing percent of consumers were eating breakfast on the go.[44] Shortly after the introduction of the French toast stick products, BK partnered with Lender's Bagels to introduce a bagel breakfast sandwich. The new product was designed to drive sales in the morning by piquing customer's curiosity with a new taste. The product was tested for several months in BK's original home territory of Miami before a national roll-out.[45]
In the late 1990s, BK co-branded several of its breakfast products with former parent Pillsbury; Pillsbury produced a fresh-baked biscuit product for the chain in 1996 and miniature cinnamon rolls called Cini-Minis in 1998. As part of the cachet built into the products, Burger King advertises that products are cooked fresh in the restaurant each morning.[46][47][48]
With the effects of the late-2000s recession reducing breakfast traffic to the stores, Burger King announced that it was making the first wholesale changes to its breakfast line-up in many years.[49] In early 2010, Burger King tested a new group of breakfast products under its new BK Brunch product line; a reintroduced English muffin sandwich, a sandwich featuring ciabatta bread, a pair of breakfast bowls, and a non-alcoholic mimosa.[50] In September, a slightly modified variation of the menu was taken national during one of the largest menu expansions in the company's history. Chief Marketing Officer Mike Kappitt said breakfast produced 12 percent of the company's income, but that was only half of what McDonald's made. Part of the expansion was a major advertising campaign that encouraged people to change their minds about skipping breakfast at a time of high unemployment.[51] 3G Capital has continued the expansion of the breakfast program with the introduction of Quaker Oats Company oatmeal to its menu in late 2011. Oatmeal has been shown to be a popular addition to breakfast menus industry-wide due to its low cost, ease in preparation and perception as a healthy, whole-grain option. Analysts from industry analytic firm Technomic stated that it was a good move for Burger King to add a winning product to its menu, but that it should have tried to be more creative by adding other, similar products such as grits.[52]
Regionalization[edit]




A now-shuttered kosher Burger King restaurant that was located in Jerusalem. The company exited the country in 2010.


As the company expanded both inside and outside the United States, it introduced localized versions of its products that conform to regional tastes and cultural or religious beliefs. In countries with predominantly Islamic populations, such as Saudi Arabia, pork is not served due to Muslim dietary laws. In Muslim countries, meat is slaughtered using the halal method and labeled as such.[53][54] Similar adaptations also occurred in Israel, where kosher dietary laws forbid the mixture of meat and dairy products. Before the company exited the country in 2010,[55] many of its locations in Israel were fully kosher.[56]
In many international markets, BK offers products or condiments that fit local tastes. For example, in Canada, BK offers poutine gravy and vinegar for its French fries, and peri-peri sauce is available as a sandwich topping in the United Kingdom.[57] Hungry Jack's, Burger King's Australian franchise, offers the "Aussie burger" with fried egg, beetroot, and other Australian flavors.[58] In Asian markets, dark-meat chicken is preferred over white meat, and poultry products sold in these markets often are advertised as such.[59][60] One of the more regionally differentiated lines of products is the company's dessert offerings. In the United States, BK offers several desserts, including Otis Spunkmeyer chocolate-chip cookies, apple pie slices, Hershey's Sundae pie slices (a type of chocolate creme pie), and a rotating pie as part of its dessert menu.[61][notes 8] Internationally the company sells turnovers, tortas, Cini-Minis, muffins, brownies, and vanilla soft-serve ice cream in cones and sundaes. In most markets where BK sells ice cream, it also sells a mix-in dessert under various names.[notes 9][62][63] Some of these international dessert products differ from the domestic products in terms of preparation; an example is the pies sold in Asian countries that are fried, turnover-style, instead of the deep-dish tart style associated with American sweet-filled pies.[64]

Preparation methods[edit]
Burger King cooks its foods in one of four ways: broiling, deep frying, baking, or microwaving. As noted in its mottos and advertisements, BK cooks its burgers and grilled chicken on an automated grill,[65] while its other chicken products, fish, sides, and breakfast sausage are deep-fried in vegetable oil.[66] BK prepares its biscuits, cinnamon rolls, and cookies by baking in a convection oven and microwaves its BK Veggie burger patty.[67][68][notes 10]
Broiling[edit]
See also: History of Burger King




The new broiler unit developed by Burger King and Duke Manufacturing, one of two models the company deployed in the United States.


The predecessor to Burger King, Insta-Burger King, began deploying the original broiling device in 1952 when its owners, Matthew Burns and Kieth Kramer, acquired the rights to George Read's Inst-Shake and Insta-Broiler machines. The Insta-Broiler cooked the burgers in a wire basket between two broilers, allowing the burgers to be cooked on both sides simultaneously. The machine was capable of cooking over 400 patties per hour, which allowed the company to grow rapidly. When McLamore and Edgarton opened their first Insta-Burger King location in Miami, they revamped the unit into what they called a "flame broiler" – the forerunner of the modern unit used by Burger King today.[69] After the acquisition of Insta-Burger King in 1954, the pair contracted the construction of the newly designed flame broilers to the SaniServ company of Indianapolis, Indiana, for the initial run of broilers.[notes 11] Eventually, the company moved the manufacturing contract for the broiler units to Nieco Automatic Broilers of Windsor, California, who manufactured all subsequent units until the start of the 2000s.[70]
When the time came for the company to develop a new broiler, it turned to its equipment manufacturer, Nieco, and St. Louis, Missouri-based Duke Manufacturing. Burger King's goal was to maintain the company's trademark flame broiling method while allowing more product options on a flexible cooking platform. The solutions that Nieco and Duke devised met that goal by using control features during cooking. The cooking methods employed by the two manufacturing companies vary in their methods; Nieco employed two chains, one that maintained a single speed and cooking temperature, and another that had a flexible speed setting and variable temperature control. Duke's solution utilizes an oven that cooks according to preset parameters for time and temperature, one heterogeneous product batch at a time.[notes 12] The first batch-style broiler was introduced in April 1999 and was tested in-store in central Wisconsin during the summer of 1999.[71]




A Nieco MBP94 flexible broiler, another model the company deployed in the United States.


Beyond the flexibility of the new broilers, the new equipment has several features intended to decrease operational costs. A more efficient design of the burners in the Nieco units produces a 30 percent reduction in energy consumption. The Duke units produce a $4,000 -$5,000 annual savings on energy compared to the original units, which ran approximately at full capacity all day. The units are so fuel-efficient that in many US states, the company and its franchises qualify for energy-efficiency rebates.[notes 13] However, and issue arose in September 2011 when the state of Washington department of health warned Burger King of issues with the Duke units. In multiple incidents in seven counties throughout the state, the Duke units were found to have cracked heat spreaders which resulted in under cooked products. Additionally, there was foreign material contamination caused by loose insulation resulting from the cracks as well as other issues.[72][73] Upon notification, Burger King released a statement that the company has notified franchisees and corporate-owned stores operating the Duke units with orders to repair the problem immediately. Additional training for operators was also ordered.[74]

Kitchen equipment[edit]




A Burger King kitchen in Italy featuring the company's product holding cabinets.


Before any products are sold, the company pre-cooks the ingredients and holds them in a heated holding cabinet. To ensure that product consistency is maintained and to reduce the amount of products discarded as waste, Burger King utilizes a computerized monitoring system created by Integrated Control Corp, or ICC. The system, called Kitchen Minder, monitors time and temperature in the cabinets and notifies staff and managers when to prepare more food and discard older products. Initially developed from 1998 to 2000, the system is designed to work with a holding cabinet system that was developed by Duke. The initial test designs were time-consuming to program because each bay in the holding units had to be programmed manually. This meant several minutes were required for each product, which added up to several hours to program up to six units with eight bays each. When BK finally deployed the system in 2001,[75] the updated units utilized a Palm Pilot to configure the units using a custom program designed to easily configure the units via Infrared or serial port.[76] A kitchen flow software system that helps centralize information about the system was deployed in 2007; combined with the new equipment, it helped further reduce costs for the company and its franchises by calculating projected sales and actual usage.[77] Along with the holding system, Burger King deployed newer high-speed toasters to decrease make times; the new toasters, while faster, require more maintenance, which increases overall labor costs.[78]
Sandwich preparation[edit]
During periods of high-volume sales, BK will pre-prepare high-demand items such as hamburgers and cheeseburgers; during slower periods all sandwiches are made to order. The Whopper sandwiches, premium sandwiches, and BK Veggies are all made when ordered.[79][80]
Demographic targeting[edit]
Value[edit]




The Buck Double, a value menu cheeseburger introduced in 2009 to compete against the McDouble from McDonald's.


Further information: Value meal and Value theory
BK targets "value-oriented" customers with its BK Value Menu. In the United States, this menu contains products that are usually priced in the $1.00 to $1.49 range. In non-US markets, the BK Value Menu typically takes on a different name, with prices set to reflect the approximate value of one US dollar. Internationally, the company is standardizing its value menu under the King Deals banners that features items for sale at €1.00 in the EU and one dirham in Dubai.[81] In all the markets, the value menu usually includes smaller sandwiches and entrées, small-sized side orders, small-sized drinks, and desserts. In the United States, the value menu has a breakfast offering in the same format as the lunch/dinner value menu.[82]
Children[edit]
See also: Burger King advertising § Children's advertising
As with all major fast food vendors, BK has a menu that specifically targets children. The company introduced its child-oriented product line in North America during the summer of 1990 with an advertising program called the Burger King Kid's Club. In the United States, the meal is called the Kids Club Meal and it is primarily positioned against the popular Happy Meal from McDonald's.[83] The meal includes an entrée, a side order, beverage, and a toy. The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show. The entrée and side offerings differ from market to market, as does portion size.
In the North American market, BK further divides its children's menu into three segments: toddler, kids, and "tween". The only difference between the first two groups is the prize offering; the toddler will receive an age-appropriate toy. The toys were originally designed by Kentwood, Michigan-based Sassy Inc., and were introduced in 2000 as a supplement to the company's existing children's line.[84] Burger King changed its toddler toy designer to Hudson, Ohio-based Little Tikes in 2003.[85]
The tween offering, introduced in 1999, is called the Big Kids Meal.[86] The Big Kids Meals consist of a double hamburger, a double cheeseburger, or a six-piece serving of Chicken Tenders plus a small order of fries, and a 16 US fl oz (470 ml) drink, and a toy. Further additions to the line included a six-piece serving of the company's Chicken Fries product. The introduction of the Big Kids Meal was not without controversy. McDonald's challenged Burger King's use of the name in a federal suit that claimed McDonald's had used the name first.[87] According to the filing, McDonald's stated the company had used the term in a limited manner in Michigan in 1998 as part of a promotion in Detroit.[notes 14] The suit was judged to be without merit and dismissed in a summary judgment.[88]
Adult[edit]




BK Chicken Fries, an adult oriented chicken finger product introduced in 2005.


To appeal to the adult market, BK offers several sandwiches and other products made with higher-quality ingredients such as whole-breast chicken fillets, Angus beef, and other "premium" ingredients.[89] These sandwiches are usually served on a better-quality roll, such as baguettes or corn-dusted potato rolls. Through 2009 and 2010, the company added other higher-end product such as barbecued ribs, grilled fish, an improved grilled chicken sandwich, kebabs, and an extra-thick burger called the Steakhouse XT.[90][notes 15] Several industry publications claimed that these new offerings disrupt the differentiation between the fast-food and casual-dining markets with a combination of taste, competitive pricing, speed of service, and convenience.[notes 16] The adult-oriented products of Burger King and it competitors have been criticized by restaurant industry commentators as a temporary blip. The "indulgent" products are seen as blurring the lines between the fast-food and casual-dining market segments and, while they draw in newer customers looking for value, the effect may only be temporary. Once the economic instabilities of the late-2000s recession fade, customers may return to such casual chains as Chili's and leave the fast food chains back where they started in terms of customer numbers and profits.[91]
BK targets specific sub-groups within the adult market. Products like the BK Stacker and BK XXL are aimed at late teen to young adult males; health-conscious individuals are offered products such as salads, grilled chicken, and veggie burgers.[92][93] Products such as the BK Veggie, a meatless burger initially introduced in 2002,[94] target the female and health-oriented demographic using a co-branded marketing program and a patty produced by the Kellogg Company's Morningstar Farms division.[95][96] Another sub-market in this group is on-the-go parents and commuters; The company's BK Chicken Fries—French-fry cut pieces of breaded chicken—is specifically targeted to this segment.[97][98] First introduced in 2005, the product was successful enough that Burger King expanded the marketing of chicken fries to the children's demographic with a kid's meal version of the product in 2007. The meal was launched with a cross-promotion in conjunction with Nickelodeon's SpongeBob SquarePants. The series of commercials raised the ire of the American Family Association due to perceived nudity concerns.[99]
The "Superfan"[edit]
See also: The Burger King
One particular market target that was of importance to the company was identified as the "Superfan". The superfan was a demographic group that included individuals that are 18 to 49 years old, primarily male, who would visit a fast-food restaurant five times a month and eat fast food 16 times a month.[100] Burger King and their competitors hope to attract this group because of the large sums of money that they represent; an increase in sales to this group could drive an increase in global sales.[101] While superfans accounted for less than 20 percent of Burger King's customer base, they accounted for nearly 50 percent of the company's business. By focusing on this demographic group, the company could increase sales more readily; it was easier to generate more repeat visits by this demographic than it was to coax new customers to switch from other chains. The company has used advertising featuring its mascot, the Burger King, in tandem with new product rollouts such as its BK Wrapper product to help generate an increased number of visits by this client segment.[102]
With the slowing of the global economy due to the financial crisis of 2007-2010, the company experienced a downside of focusing so much on this demographic group. The high unemployment of the recession, coupled with healthier eating habits, drove many customers away from fast food towards the fast-casual segment or forced them to stop eating out. Analysts have stated that by focusing its marketing and advertising programs on men, BK alienated women and children. Morgan Stanley analyst John Glass stated, "Maybe catering to the super fan was the correct strategy to kick-start the business, but maybe they relied on that for too long..."[103]
To help counter the perceived male bias of its superfan target group, the company expanded the definition in early 2010 to cover individuals of both sexes, all ages, and households who frequent fast food within the stated time frame. Throughout 2010, the company added newer calorie-conscious "Positive Steps" combo meals that were advertised in female-oriented media, as well as a continuing cross-promotional tie-in with the female-oriented Twilight film series.[notes 17] 3G Capital's new management team eliminated the focus on the superfan after its acquisition the company in 2010, concentrating on a more broad demographic base that includes women and more health conscious customers.[52]
Nutrition[edit]
See also: Burger King legal issues § Nutrition
One of the company's first forays into healthier products was in 1983 with introduction of its salad bar. The salad bar met with light to moderate success, but the company's franchise holders complained of high operating costs and a poor return on investment.[104] Part of the product, a pita salad, was quickly dropped from the salad bar, as were plans to use the bar unit to boost breakfast sales.[105] In 1987 the company augmented its salad bar with a test line of prepackaged salads, including chef and garden salads.[106] The salad bar was eventually eliminated in favor of packaged salads. In 1990, BK introduced a new salad line accompanied by a licensing agreement with Paul Newman's Newman's Own, Inc., whose salad dressings accompanied the products.[107][108] Burger King revamped its salad line again in 2004, with the introduction of its Fire Grilled Salad products.[109] Burger King sought to differentiate this line of salads by packaging the warm meat toppings—a choice of grilled shrimp or broiled chicken—separately from the cold salad; this added the appearance of an additional layer of freshness.[110] At one point in the United States, the salads are pre-made off-site. They are sold with two toppings and Ken's Foods Ken's Steakhouse brand salad dressing. Internationally, the salads vary in composition and style from market to market. In all markets, salads are one of the items targeted at female and health-conscious consumers. In parts of Europe, salads are sold under the "King Delight" or "LA Range" banner.[111][112]




The new Burger King healthier Kids' Club meal includes Kraft macaroni and cheese, apples, and chocolate milk.


As a response to recent obesity trends in the United States and other nations, Burger King modified its menu and food preparation practices. In addition to offering lower-fat menu item such as salads, the company has updated its nutrition guides to include dietary guidelines and other nutritional data. One of its reactions to the concerns over trans-fats was to initiate a program in January 2008 to phase out added trans-fat in its products, and to switch to pure vegetable oils that are free of hydrogenated fats.[113] The program ended in early 2009 with a complete changeover to the new oils. Most, but not all, of the products contain no added trans-fats; some products, such as the beef used in the hamburgers, still contain naturally occurring trans-fats.[114][notes 18]
To address concerns over the increase in childhood obesity in Western nations and accusations of unhealthy offerings for children by groups such as the Center for Science in the Public Interest,[115] the company created a nutritional program called "BK Positive Steps" that is aimed at children and their families.[116] The program began with the introduction of products such as broiled Chicken Tenders, Kraft Macaroni and Cheese, and apple "fries", which are French cut apples served in a fry box that are featured in a new low-fat Kid's Club Meal.[117][118] According to a statement by Burger King, the new Kid's Club meals contain no more than 560 calories per meal, less than 30 percent of calories from fat, less than 10 percent of calories from saturated fat, no added trans fats, and no more than 10 percent of calories from added sugars.[119][120] Additional changes to its menu were announced in May 2009, including the reduction of sodium levels in its Chicken Tenders product by approximately 33 percent; a switch to non-fat milk products in the U.S.; and adding calcium-fortified apple juice to its beverage line-up.[121][notes 19] The broiled Chicken Tenders product is only sold in the UK/Ireland market. The product line has been expanded to include a boiled mini chicken sandwich for the kid's meals in this region.[notes 20]




The spicy bean burger is a vegetarian sandwich sold in European Burger King locations.


The company has adapted its menu to accommodate different dietary lifestyles by adding several vegetarian options, including salads, the BK Veggie sandwich, and its deep-fried spicy bean burger that is sold in Burger King's international locations.[122][notes 21] The majority of these products do not qualify as vegan due to the presence of egg or dairy products;[notes 22] an example is the BK Veggie, which is approved by the British Vegetarian Society. Society guidelines do not require their approved products to be vegan, and allow ovo-lacto-vegetarian ingredients.[123] The Veggie Burger is widely sold in other countries, sometimes under different names (for example, it is called a "Country Burger" in Germany).[notes 23] Burger King added low-carb variants of several of its products in 2004 that are in accordance with low-carb diets such as the Atkins diet and the South Beach Diet.[124] Low-carbohydrate preparation consists of eliminating the bread and serving the product in a bowl with silverware.[125]
In January 2010, BK began to publish a list of which of their products that contain gluten and added menu options designed to help those afflicted with Celiac disease as part of its "Positive Steps" nutrition program. A company representative stated that it understands that its guests have individual dietary needs, and as part of its "Have It Your Way" promise, Burger King offers menu items for individuals with gluten sensitivity.[126][127] BK food is prepared with several known food allergens, including wheat, milk, soy, and eggs.[notes 24]

Products[edit]




An in-store advertisement for Burger King's Burgers for Breakfast program


The range of products sold usually depends on the time of day. Lunch items such as hamburgers and fries are traditionally not served during breakfast time. However, some BK stores do sell food under their "Burgers for Breakfast" program.[128] While for several years the company dictated hours to its franchisees in the United States, that changed with the sale of the company in 2010. The new owners relaxed the mandated hours for stores to be open from 6 am to midnight Monday through Saturday and 7 am to midnight on Sundays; franchises were encouraged to stay open later or for 24 hours in markets that could support the business.[129][130]
Packaging[edit]
Burger King's product packaging has undergone many changes over the years. Unlike McDonald's, the company never used the clamshell style box made of Styrofoam, so when the environmental concerns over Styrofoam came to a head in the late 1980s, the company touted its use of paperboard boxes for its sandwiches.[131][132] When McDonald's moved to eliminate its styrofoam packaging, Burger King ran several sarcastically-worded ads in national newspapers stating that it had always wrapped its sandwiches in waxed paper; they welcomed McDonald's "to the club".[notes 25] To cut back on the amount of paper that the company used, the paperboard box was mostly eliminated in 1991; it was replaced with waxed paper.[notes 26] Paperboard boxes are still used for its "finger food" products like Chicken Tenders and Fries, French toast sticks, and desserts.[133]
In 2004, the company committed itself to a redesign of its entire packaging line that tied the packaging into its irreverent advertising campaign created by Crispin, Porter + Bogusky. Each product's packaging included a tongue-in-cheek commentary about the product itself. Alex Bogusky, partner and executive creative director of CP+B, stated that BK decided "to create a dialogue with the consumer" by utilizing the large areas of white space found on its packaging at the time. All of its sandwich wrappers, cartons, tray liners, bags, breakfast platters, chili cups, condiments, and regional product packaging received what was described as "quirky ad copy" specifically targeting the 18–34-year-old male demographic segment. Besides the humorous commentary, the company also created sniglet-type names for things that would appear in its products, such as a "ringer" – a single onion ring that had been accidentally included in an order of fries.[134][135]




The FryPod and BK Chicken Fries products, two examples of Burger King's packaging designed to fit in a cup holder.


Starting with the introduction of its BK Chicken Fries product in 2005, BK began adapting some of its product packaging so that it could be placed in an automotive cup holder. The BK Chicken Fry box, while square in shape, will sit comfortably in the cup holder and its top, when opened, forms a small tray that is designed to hold dipping sauce. Burger King credits the design of this box with helping to make its Chicken Fries the most popular adult-oriented chicken product in the United States.[136] It has since added a trademarked and patented round French fry container which it calls the "FryPod", which is a paper cup made from 50 percent recycled materials that is designed to fit in an automotive cup holder.[137] The package design won an honorable mention at a packaging industry design competition.[138] BK's large and King sized beverage containers are made from molded HDPE plastic with a funnel-like shaped bottom that allows the oversized cups to fit in cup holders.
Union Packaging, a minority-owned, Philadelphia-based paper products company, has supplied much of the packaging for Burger King's North American operations since winning its first contract in 2000. The original $15 million contract was for paperboard "clamshell" containers and covered 1,250 BK locations in the United States.[notes 27] Union was instrumental in the development of the FryPod carton, and its efforts earned the company a supplier of the year award from Burger King in 2007.[139]

Reformulations[edit]
Over time, the company reformulates various products in an attempt to boost sales of the product or to improve the taste, appearance, or physical consistency of the product. One such example of this is the BK Big Fish, the company's fish sandwich offering in North America. Burger King's original fish sandwich, introduced as early as the late 1960s in some markets, was called the Whaler; it was a smaller fish sandwich made with tartar sauce and lettuce served on the small sesame seed roll BK used for their hamburgers. When Burger King introduced its broiled chicken sandwich in 1990, the BK Broiler, it changed the fish sandwich's breading to a panko style, began serving it on an oatmeal-dusted roll that was used for the broiled chicken sandwich, and renamed the product the Ocean Catch sandwich.[140] When BK reformulated the BK Broiler, the company also reformulated the Ocean Catch as the BK Big Fish in its current configuration.[141] The sandwich was again briefly reformulated after the phase-out of the Baguette sandwiches, and was reintroduced as the Big Fish in 2005.[142]
One of the company's larger product reformulations came in March 2011. The company updated the recipe of its 25+ year-old Chicken Tender product line by reformulating the breading and spice mixture while updating the shape. The new formulation was described by the company as being "more broadly appealing" to the palate of its customers according to statement released by the company. Nation's Restaurant News analyst John Barone stated that the change may also be due to an industry wide move to chicken-based product as a result of raising commodity prices, forcing restaurants to turn towards chicken-based offerings due to the elevated pork and beef prices occurring during the previous year. He added that chicken breast costs have been down or flat during the same period, making it a more appealing choice to companies. The new product push was accompanied with a product tie-in with the movie Hop aimed at the youth market, an adult-oriented advertising campaign pushing convenience and product customization and a nationwide coupon mailing in the United States. Online advertising was emphasized with the release a Facebook gaming application it called the "Tender 8".[143]
Limited time offers[edit]




The Windows 7 Whopper, A Whopper sandwich with seven patties that was an LTO product tie-in with Microsoft in Japan for the introduction of Windows 7.


To generate additional sales, BK will occasionally introduce limited time offers (LTO) that are versions of its core products or new products intended for either long- or short-term sales. Many of these LTO products focus on core menu products such as the Whopper, which has featured variations such as the Texas Double Whopper with added jalapeños, bacon, and pepperjack cheese. Other LTOs include all-new sandwiches like the Chick'n Crisp sandwich (now a permanent item in many regions) and test products such as the company's Great American Burger, which was an attempt at a premium sandwich in 2003. It was made with a Whopper patty and several new ingredients, including a bakery-style bun; peppered bacon; whole-leaf, as opposed to shredded, lettuce; seasoned mustard; and a special sauce. The burger was served with American cheese, mayonnaise, tomato, and onions.[144] A similar burger was tested in Wisconsin in 1999. That Great American burger featured a single 8 oz (230 g) burger patty and different toppings. It was designed to be cooked on a forerunner of the current batch broiler.[notes 28]
Other LTO products sought to expand existing product lines with new base ingredients. The company's 1992 offering, a Meatloaf Specialty Sandwich, was introduced as part of a push into limited table service.[145][146] Other LTO variants in its Specialty Sandwich line included an Italian sausage sandwich served in one of three ways: with onions and peppers; parmigiana-style with mozzarella cheese and marinara sauce; or with all four ingredients. Steak sandwiches were made from steak fillets or later, restructured beef. Other offerings were a ham and cheese sandwich with mayonnaise, lettuce, and tomato, and a veal parmigiana sandwich.[147]
Trends[edit]
The company is not above following trends within the fast food and fast casual industry; two of examples of this can be seen in some of its former products. The company's first wrap product, called a BK Wrapper, was introduced in North America as a breakfast option in April 2008, with a lunch/dinner version offered in September 2008.[148] These products were in response to industry trends towards products that are easier to consume on the go,[149] and to trends that began in 2007 regarding smaller foods.[150] Originally a limited time offer,[notes 29] the lunch/dinner version of this product was sold as a regional item through late 2009, when they were eliminated due to weakening sales. The 2009 introduction of BK Burger Shots, Burger King's version of sliders, was part of a wider trend in the restaurant industry for this type of sandwich.[151][152] European locations sell them as the BK Six Pack. The variation sold in the UK and Ireland is called the Angus 6 Pack; it is six small burgers that are attached together.[153] In the United States they are based on the Burger Bundles/Burger Buddies products of the 1980s, which were originally inspired by the similar products sold at White Castle and Krystal,[notes 30][154]
Licensed products[edit]
In 2007, Burger King began licensing its logo and items to outside companies for non-Burger King products. A licensed products company, Broad Street Licensing Group, and its manufacturing partner, the Inventure Group, introduced the first products in the fall of that year: flavored potato crisps in two flavors, flame-broiled burger and French fries with ketchup. Inventure added a third flavor, onion rings, in 2008.[155] A second licensed product, the company's child-oriented BK Fresh Apple Fries, was licensed for sale in supermarkets in 2009 to the Cruch Pak company.[156] The company stated that while the products are important in providing brand identity, they will not be concentrating their resources on them, and will be investing the licensing fees into the company's marketing fund. Industry pundits have criticized the company for this scheme, with Rob Frankel, author of the book The Revenge of Brand X, stating "just because you can do something does not mean you should."[notes 31]
The licensing deals have proven successful. Broad Street has expanded the product line to seventeen countries across the globe while increasing selection to more than a half dozen products designed to mimic the flavors of some of Burger King's core menu products. The success of the product line and licensing deals garnered the companies an award for "Brand Extension of the Year" from License! Global magazine, and earned them a nomination for "Best Corporate License of the Year" from the Licensing Industry Merchandisers Association.[157]
ConAgra Foods entered into a licensing agreement with Burger King in 2009 for a new line of microwavable French fry products. The new products are King Krinkz, which are seasoned crinkle-cut fries; King Kolossalz, an extra-large package of fries; and King Wedgez, seasoned potato wedges. The products were slated to be released in September 2009. The packaging is designed to resemble BK's FryPod fry container.[158]

Failed products[edit]




A cross section of a Big King sandwich sold by Burger King in Sweden


Burger King has introduced several new products that performed well in testing, but did not catch on with the public. The failure of the BK Baguette line of sandwiches is an example a product that did not meet corporate expectations; another earlier failure was the Bull's-eye Barbecue Burger. The sandwich consisted of two side-by-side hamburger patties, American cheese, and bacon, with Bull's-eye Barbecue brand barbecue sauce. The sandwich was served on the same 7 in (18 cm) roll as the Specialty Sandwiches. Later it was sold as a traditional-style double cheeseburger.[159]
In 1992, during its time under the ownership of Britain-based Grand Metropolitan, Burger King experimented with table service.[160] After 4 pm, customers would place their order at the counter, and their order would be brought to them at their table. Customers were given complimentary popcorn to eat while waiting for their meal. To coincide with the offering, a series of meals called the Dinner baskets were introduced. The dinner baskets included the Whopper Dinner Basket, Steak Sandwich Dinner Basket, Fried Chicken Dinner Basket, and Shrimp Dinner Basket. In the New England region of the United States, BK sold a Fried clam Basket. The dinner came with two sides, including a choice of a side salad, cole slaw, French fries, or baked potato. Lasting approximately a year, the sit-down restaurant concept was abandoned in 1994 in favor of the original quick-service formula.[161]
Another failed product, this time under Grand Metropolitan's successor Diageo, was the BK Back Porch Grillers line of burgers that featured a spiced and flavored patty served on a bakery-style roll. There were two varieties: The Regular served with mayonnaise, whole leaf iceberg lettuce, tomato and grilled onions, and the Bacon Cheddar, with bacon and smoked cheddar cheese. There was one LTO variety, the Black Stack Griller, made with Black Strap Barbecue sauce (a strong molasses-flavored sauce), bacon, lettuce, and tomato, to promote Men in Black II. The Griller patty was flavored so that it had a taste similar to a hamburger that had been grilled over a charcoal-fired grill.[162]
One of its international failures was the BK Crown Jewels line of sandwiches, originally sold in New Zealand. These larger, adult-oriented sandwiches were made with fried and grilled chicken or a Whopper patty and a variety of toppings and served on a Kaiser roll. Toppings included a mango lime sauce, avocado, aioli, a Cajun spiced sauce, and relish. Originally successful, the sandwiches piqued the interest of Burger King's corporate offices and were being considered for a potential global rollout. However, interest in the product faded and they were discontinued.[163]
Introduced as a direct challenge of corporate rival McDonald's, the Big King was Burger King's response to the Big Mac and had a similar style and taste.[notes 32] The sandwich was originally introduced in 1993 under the name Double Supreme during its testing stage. The name was switched to Big King when it was introduced nationally in 1997, and again to the King Supreme when reintroduced in 2002.[164] The sandwich was discontinued in the North American market in the mid-2000s. In November 2013, Burger King brought the Big King back to the North American market as a permanent menu item. The Big King sandwich's recipe is exactly the same as the original 1990s recipe, including a three-piece roll.[165] The Big King sandwich is also sold in many of the company's international markets in several forms.[notes 33][notes 34]
Suppliers and purchasing[edit]
Purchasing guidelines for meat[edit]




An example of a battery cage with several chickens being held.


Like many of its competitors, BK has been targeted by various animal welfare groups, such as PETA, over the treatment of the animals it uses in the manufacture of its ingredients. In a concession to these groups, BK agreed to adopt a series of policies for its suppliers for several of its raw animal products. The company has established a preference for purchasing eggs and pork-based products from those suppliers that use cage-free production methods.[166]
2001 Guidelines[edit]
As part of its 2001 guidelines, Burger King stated that it would begin conducting announced and unannounced inspections of the slaughterhouses for all of its meat suppliers and take action against facilities that fail those inspections. It would establish animal-handling verification guidelines for all the slaughterhouses of its suppliers. The company would require its suppliers to confine no more than five hens in each battery cage, that the birds be able to stand fully upright, and require the presence of two water drinkers per cage. It would stop purchasing from suppliers who engage in the forced molting of hens, develop auditing procedures for the handling of "broiler" chickens, and institute humane handling procedures for chickens at slaughterhouses. It would begin purchasing pork from farms that do not confine sows to stalls.[167]
Per the conditions of its agreement with the groups, the company filed a petition in 2002 with the Food and Drug Administration requesting the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) step up enforcement of the Humane Slaughter Act of 1958. The USDA agreed with the request, stating "it is granting your petition and is developing a proposed rule that addresses the issue of humane handling." The USDA failed to indicate when it intended to publish the proposal in the Federal Register and solicit public comment, which would be the first step before the agency drafts a final rule.[notes 35]
2008 Guidelines[edit]
The company amended its purchasing guidelines in 2008. It announced that it would expand its pork purchasing guidelines by requiring 10% of its pork products be purchased from suppliers who do not use gestation crates, metal enclosures that confine sows and restrict the animal's movement, and double that amount by the end of the year.[168] It would also immediately begin purchasing 2% of its eggs from producers whose hens are not confined to small wire battery cages, and double that amount by the end of that year.[notes 36] It agreed with PETA that the company would issue a statement that it would be give purchasing preference to egg suppliers that do not use battery cages and to those poultry suppliers that utilize or upgrade to controlled atmosphere killing, which is considered to be a more humane method of chicken and turkey slaughter.[169]
2012 Guidelines[edit]
A third round of guidelines was issued in April 2012 when the company announced that it would begin phasing in a plan to stop purchasing poultry and pork products from suppliers that caged animals. With this announcement, Burger King became the first American Fast food company to promise to purchase 100% of its eggs from companies that did not utilize wire battery cages and pork from suppliers that did not use gestational cages for sows. This is an increase of the percentage of cage free products from 9% of egg purchases and 20% of pork purchases the company made in 2008.[170] The plan should be completed by 2017.[171]
Food[edit]




A United States value meal including small French fries, a Whopper Jr., Barq's root beer, and several packets of Heinz ketchup.


Condiments[edit]
The H.J. Heinz Company is a significant supplier of condiments to Burger King.[172] The relationship between the two companies dates back into the twentieth century,[173] and they have worked together on several programs such as the 2001 promotional tie-in with the movie Shrek. Heinz provided an LTO Blastin' Green EZ Squirt colored ketchup and an apple flavored "ooze" dipping sauce for distribution with the Shrek-branded kid's meals.[174][175] Heinz has become a primary supplier of ketchup in the United States, Mexico, and Great Britain, while supplying various sauces in several European countries.[176][177][178][notes 37]
Kraft foods has supplied many of its products to BK over the years. Several of its condiment lines have found their way into BK menu items. Two Kraft products were involved in direct tie-ins: the Bull's-Eye BBQ Burger in 2005 and the A-1 Steakhouse XT sandwich in 2010. In both cases, Burger King prominently used the names of the Kraft products, A1 Steak Sauce and Bull's-Eye Barbecue Sauce, in the names of the sandwiches.[notes 38][notes 39] Kraft has supplied several of Burger King's children's products, including a Jell-O brand dessert during BK's Teletubbies promotion in 1999, and the Kraft macaroni and cheese used in its lower-fat kid's meals introduced in 2009.[179][notes 40]
Proteins[edit]
During the late 1960s, Tyson Foods was devising new methods to broaden their market, including introducing smaller consumer packaging and landing military contracts. The company expanded its commercial division by offering new products to McDonald's and Burger King. Tyson's McDonald's product eventually evolved into Chicken McNuggets while Burger King's product became the basis of its chicken sandwiches.[180] For their 2010 rib promotion, Tyson was Burger King's pork supplier. Despite a production-significant lead time, the estimated four-month product supply lasted Burger king less than three months.[181]
A 1996 E. Coli outbreak at one of Burger King's largest beef providers, Hudson Foods, gave Tyson Foods one of its largest business coups. Hudson was one of the largest poultry providers in the United States and one of Tyson's largest competitors when they moved into beef processing at the behest of Burger King. Once it had secured a contract with Burger King, Hudson opened a beef processing plant in Nebraska. When the plant was identified as the source of an E. Coli breakout in 1996, Burger King abandoned the company as a supplier.[182]
Lopez Foods, Inc. of Oklahoma City is a supplier of beef to the Burger King.[183] While Lopez's primary customer is McDonald's, the company supplies BK as well.
Sides and desserts[edit]
McCain Foods became a supplier of potato products to the company in 1998, shortly after an agreement with farmers in Maine to supply potatoes for use in the fast food market.[184]
Edwards Baking provides Burger King with prepackaged pies and pie-style desserts while providing oversight and assistance with the chain's dessert products. BK is one of Edwards' major national contracts, where the company provides Burger King with assistance in marketing programs, point-of-purchase advertising materials, market research, and other resources. Edwards has a full-time staff assigned to Burger King's headquarters in Miami.[185] Before Edwards became Burger King's primary baked goods supplier, the chain had a contract with Awrey Bakeries of Livonia, Michigan, for its line of pre-packaged breakfast products. Burger King sold a line of Awrey products including danish, doughnuts, and birthday cakes.[186]
Beverages[edit]
Soft drinks[edit]
Traditionally Burger King has sold soft drinks from the Coca-Cola Company in its home market. In 1983, PepsiCo garnered the $444 million beverage supplier contract from its rival, and, in the midst of extreme market debate over the future of the contract, had it renewed for a second term in 1987.[187] The company won the contract by strengthening the marketing and advertising program ties between Burger King and itself.[188][189] The contract lasted three more years when, partially based upon Pepsi's growth as a restaurant operator with its Tricon Restaurants division, Burger King moved its beverage contract back to Coca-Cola.[190][191]
Since 1990, Burger King has continued using Coca-Cola as its beverage supplier, renewing its contract in several times.[192] The Coca-Cola contract is not without its problems; the 1999 contract called for the Coca-Cola branded Icee products to be made a permanent menu item in all American locations. After the rollout, it was discovered that Coca-Cola employees had faked product test information to bolster prospective sales numbers in an effort to entice franchisees to enroll in a summertime advertising push. Several Coke employees were terminated, and Coca-Cola changed the in-store promotional materials to emphasize the Icee name.[193] The 2003 contract officially extended the relationship between the two companies so that Coca-Cola was the exclusive supplier of soft drinks for the company.[notes 41] Before this, individual international franchises would negotiate their own contracts with their company of choice. The 2003 contract gave Coca-Cola new access to the 3,000 operating or planned restaurants on the Asia-Pacific rim, in Europe, and in South and Central America.[notes 42] The purchase of Burger King by 3G Capital lead to a change in the beverage contract for the Caribbean and Latin America markets. 3G, which owns AmBev and is the producer and distributor of PepsiCo products in the region, started cross-licensing between its two companies in April 2011 and switched to Pepsi in these markets.[194]
In 1999, Burger King added a second soft drink supplier contract with the Dr Pepper Snapple Group to include Dr Pepper to its beverage line up in North American restaurants.[195]
Burger King's supply contracts for non-carbonated beverages are separate from the ones for its sodas. When the company first chose to introduce a bottled water product, it chose Nestlé's Poland Spring brand over Coke's Dasani. When the contract expired in 2003, BK moved to Pepsi's Aquafina, the top-selling brand at the time.[notes 43] In 2008 Burger King renewed its relationship with Nestlé by entering into an agreement to sell Pure Life bottled water products.[196] BK moved away from Pepsi's Tropicana brand juices in 2001 when it went with Coca-Cola's Minute Maid brands for the North America market.[197] With the introduction of its Positive Steps nutrition program for children, the company turned to the Hershey Company to provide Hershey's branded low-fat milk in its North American stores. BK is utilizing a popular brand name to promote its products in a move to draw customers' attention to itself and its meal programs.[198]
Coffee[edit]




Seattle's Best Coffee is the supplier of coffee products to Burger King's North American locations.


Produced by Sara Lee's Douwe Egberts brand,[199] BK Joe was Burger King's coffee line that was first introduced in 2001 in North America and later in parts of Europe.[notes 44] Advertised as being made from Arabica coffee, the product was made using Douwe's Cafitesse system, a platform that eschews coffee brewed from ground beans in favor of a beverage made from a coffee concentrate with hot water added.[200][201] Sara Lee claims the advantage of the system is that each cup of coffee is made at the time of order with minimal waste and labor.[202] The product was not designed to compete with products from companies such as Starbucks, but was intended to appeal to customers who seek a consistent cup of coffee.[203]
Despite the investment in the Douwe Egbert product, Burger King announced it would be phasing out the Cafitesse system in the United States in the summer of 2010 in favor of Starbucks' Seattle's Best brand of coffee.[204] Throughout the summer of 2010, BK added several new coffee-based products to the new coffee line in an initial effort to bring in more customers during the morning sales period.[205][notes 45] The new coffee products, including flavored coffees and iced coffee drinks, are available all day to compete with McDonald's McCafé coffee line.[206] Every Friday during November 2010, Burger King gave away free 12 US fl oz (350 ml) cups of Seattle's Best Coffee to encourage people to try its breakfast and coffee lines. The company predicted the number of free cups of coffee would number between two and four million.[notes 46]
Alcoholic drinks[edit]
For many years Burger King has sold beer in several of its international locations, such as Germany, but not in its home territory. The company began to sell beer at its BK Whopper Bar limited service concept restaurants in Miami, New York, and Los Angeles in 2010. The company is selling products from SABMiller and Anheuser-Busch, including Budweiser, Bud Lite, and Miller Lite in aluminum bottles designed to maintain temperature. The move, designed to target the important 30-and-under demographic, has been called risky by industry analysts because the company is known as a fast food purveyor and not as an alcoholic beverages seller. Other industry consultants have disagreed with the assessment, believing that the move is timely because the company is growing with its aging customer base.[207][208][209]
Distributors[edit]
For many years Burger King owned and operated its own distribution system, known originally as Distron. Distron, founded shortly after establishment of Burger King, primarily served the company-owned stores and 50–60 percent of franchised stores. Franchise groups were free to purchase supplies from one of seventeen independent distribution systems, often operated by larger franchise groups such as Carrols Restaurant Group.[210] The Distron setup remained relatively stable until BK was purchased from Pillsbury by Grand Metropolitan. Grand Met originally planned to sell it after the purchase, but ended up reorganizing the division into two separate groups for procurement (Burger King Purchasing [BKP]) and distribution (Burger King Distribution Services [BKDS]). The move resulted in the layoff of over a hundred staff members.[211][212][213]
In 1992, Burger King and its franchises formed Restaurant Services Inc. (RSI), an independent purchasing cooperative, which covered 100 percent of BK stores in the United States. The creation of RSI was based on a proposal by then-CEO Barry Gibbons create an organization that would be autonomous from BK corporate operations, provide full financial disclosure to participants on pricing issues and revenues, and enjoy the participation of the entire chain to maximize the benefits of volume purchasing. The format of RSI was based on the system employed by KFC for its distribution system and was operated in a similar manner.[214] Two weeks after the formation of the co-operative, Grand Met sold the physical assets of BKDS to Canadian-based buyout firm Onex Corporation and folded BKP into RSI.[notes 47]
Currently the company utilizes independent distributors such as Maines Paper and Food Service and Sysco for supplying North American stores with food and paper products.[215][216][217]
See also[edit]


Florida portal
Companies portal
Food portal
Drink portal







Book: Burger King





List of Burger King products
Burger King advertising
List of McDonald's products
In-N-Out Burger products

Notes[edit]


^ Jakle et al, p. 118 
^ Jakle et al, p. 119 
^ Romero, "BK steps up turnaround effort with Pick 'Em Ups finger food", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ Horovitz, "McDonald's, Burger King serve up premium gourmet burgers", USA Today 
^ "Burger King nutrition facts – United States" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ Rodriguez, "History of Burger King Corporation", Funding Universe 
^ Rodriguez, "History of Burger King Corporation", Funding Universe 
^ "Burger King nutrition facts – United States" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King menu – United Kingdom" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King nutrition facts – United States" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. p. 12. 
^ Carlino, "BK co-founder McLamore dead at 70", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ Hoyland, "Burger King menu to get creative", QSR Web 
^ Hoyland, "Burger King menu to get creative", QSR Web 
^ Cebrzynski, "McDonald's sues Burger King in Big Kids Meal dispute", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ Hoyland, "Burger King menu to get creative", QSR Web 
^ "Burger King Pays Premium to Promote Premium Menu Offerings" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ York, "Burger King's 'Superfan' Might Just Be Your Grandma", AdAge 
^ Burger King nutrition facts – United States, Burger King Corporation 
^ "Burger King Corp. Announces Three Additions to Kids Meal Menu That Meet Its Stringent Nutrition Criteria" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King menu – United Kingdom" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King nutrition facts – United States" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King ingredients & allergens – United States" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King menu – Germany" (Press release) (in German). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King ingredients & allergens – United States" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ Liddle, "McD's switch to paper fuels packaging debate", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ Gale Group, "BK replaces boxes with recyclables, rolls curly fries, barbecue sandwich", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ "Burger King hires Union Packaging", Philadelphia Business Journal 
^ "Burger King Goes To The Heartland Of The USA To Test The Next Big Thing – The Great American Burger" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ Kelso, "Burger King intros value Wrappers", QSR Web 
^ Romero, "Burger King chief plays peacemaker", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ Howard, "Burger King asks: Would you like chips with that?", USA Today 
^ Lubow, "Steal This Burger", New York Times 
^ Collins, "As Business Gets Lean, a Big King Dares Big Mac", New York Times 
^ "Burger King menu – Canada" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ The Gale Group, "USDA grants BK bid, will enforce humane slaughter", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ Martin, "Burger King Shifts Policy on Animals", New York Times 
^ Adamy, "Heinz courts McDonald's to boost ketchup brand", Wall Street Journal 
^ "Burger King Corporation Launches New 99¢ BK Cravers Menu" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ Horovitz, "McDonald's, Burger King serve up premium gourmet burgers", USA Today 
^ "Burger King Corp. Announces Three Additions to Kids Meal Menu That Meet Its Stringent Nutrition Criteria" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Fast food giant Burger King Corp. announced that it had expanded a partnership with Coca-Cola Co.", Food & Drink Weekly 
^ "Fast food giant Burger King Corp. announced that it had expanded a partnership with Coca-Cola Co.", Food & Drink Weekly 
^ "Fast food giant Burger King Corp. announced that it had expanded a partnership with Coca-Cola Co.", Food & Drink Weekly 
^ Bosman, "This Joe's for You?", New York Times 
^ "Burger King adds Seattle's Best coffee to menu", MSNBC 
^ "Burger King pours free coffee Fridays", The Sun News 
^ "Burger King to sell Burger King Dist. to Canadian firm", Nation's Restaurant News 


References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i 2015 10-K SEC Filing, Restaurant Brands International, 31 December 2015, retrieved 12 May 2015 
^ Jakle, John A.; Sculle, Keith A.; Pappas (1999). Fast Food: Roadside Restaurants in the Automobile Age (1st ed.). JHU Press. pp. 116–117. ISBN 0-8018-6920-X. Retrieved June 15, 2009. Mathew Burns of Long Beach, California, and Kieth g. Kramer, Burn's stepson and owner of a Daytona Beach, Florida drive in, founded Insta-Burger King, Burger King's predecessor. 
^ Carlino, Bill (August 19, 1996). "BK co-founder McLamore dead at 70". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved January 25, 2010. 
^ "Burger King Celebrates As The Whopper Turns 45" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. February 8, 2002. Retrieved October 22, 2007. 
^ Romero, Peter J. (February 16, 1987). "Burger King chief plays peacemaker". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 19, 2009. 
^ Vranica, Suzanne (February 8, 2008). "Hey, No Whopper on the Menu?!". Wall Street Journal. New York city. pp. B3. Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ "Burger King to open first Whopper Bar". USA Today. Associate Press. March 9, 2009. Retrieved October 21, 2009. 
^ Rodriguez, Ginger G. "History of Burger King Corporation". Funding Universe. Answers.com. Retrieved October 24, 2007. 
^ In Student's Encyclopædia (2007). "Burger King Corporation". Britannica Student Encyclopædia. Retrieved December 4, 2007. 
^ Zuckerman, David (August 8, 1986). "Revised BK tenders ads take swipe at McNuggets — Burger King's Chicken Tenders". Nation's Restaurant News. Penton Media. Television ads for Burger King's all-white-meat Chicken Tenders—pulled last April because of a purported chicken supply shortage-- are back on the network airwaves. And so, apparently, is the Pillsbury-owned chain's resolve to confront its chief rival, McDonald's, head on.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Romero, Peter J. (December 11, 1989). "BK steps up turnaround effort with Pick 'Em Ups finger food". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved December 4, 2007. The Fish Tenders are new, but the Chicken Tenders are reformulated versions of a product that Burger King rolled out several years ago. 
^ a b Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 10. Burger Bundles". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Carlino, Bill (March 30, 1990). "Franchisees on BK Kid's Club: what took so long?". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved June 6, 2009. 
^ Bernstein, Charles (May 15, 1995). "Fitzjohn Navigates Careful BK International Growth.". Restaurants & Institutions Magazine. Reed Business Information.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Crown jewels: New marketing, product rollouts energize BK journey back to fast-food royalty". Nation's Restaurant News. March 22, 2002. Retrieved June 3, 2009. 
^ "Burger King Sells 40 Millionth Chicken Whopper" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. May 23, 2003. Archived from the original on May 28, 2009. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "New Burger King Menu Targets Healthy Eaters". Fox News. Reuters. September 16, 2003. Retrieved October 27, 2007. 
^ Garber, Amy (August 22, 2005). "Return of the 'King'? BK recovery aided by sales jump, Chicken Fries". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved February 15, 2010. 
^ "Burger King Debuts New 99¢ 'Great Tastes' Menu" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. March 17, 1998. Retrieved October 9, 2007. 
^ Kelso, Alicia (November 24, 2010). "The evolution of the value menu". QSRWeb.com. Archived from the original on December 3, 2010. Retrieved January 26, 2011. 
^ "Burger King promotes new menu". South Florida Business Journal. September 12, 2002. Retrieved October 9, 2007. 
^ "Burger King nutrition facts – United States" (PDF) (Press release). Burger King Corporation. November 2010. Archived from the original (PDF) on December 26, 2010. Retrieved December 29, 2010. 
^ Begun, Bret (May 23, 2006). "A really big idea". MSNBC. Retrieved July 16, 2007. 
^ "Burger King Debuts New TenderCrisp Chicken Sandwich". Promo Magazine. March 23, 2004. Archived from the original on June 6, 2011. Retrieved October 27, 2009. 
^ Weisbaum, Herb (July 6, 2006). "Burger King Launches Line Of Jumbo High-Rise Burgers". KOMO Radio (Seattle, Washington). Archived from the original on February 6, 2008. Retrieved October 24, 2007. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (May 3, 2005). "Burger King to offer whopper of a breakfast sandwich". USA Today. Retrieved October 24, 2007. 
^ Lalley, Heather (September 6, 2005). "Word of the day: Meat'Normous". the Spokesman Review (Spokane, Washington). Archived from the original on September 29, 2007. Retrieved September 11, 2007. 
^ The Gale Group (August 4, 2004). "Chains beef up with Black Angus". Nation's Restaurant News.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Newcomb, Kevin (October 7, 2004). "Burger King's Back With New Buzz". ClickZ.com. Retrieved June 10, 2007. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (March 22, 2004). "Burger King zaps menu, image". USA Today. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Warner, Melanie (July 25, 2006). "U.S. Restaurant Chains Find There Is No Too Much.". New York Times. Retrieved December 3, 2007. Restaurants say offering lumberjack portions of fat and sodium-laden food is giving customers what they want and providing them with choices. "Some of our most successful products over the past few years have been indulgent products, whether it be the TenderCrisp Chicken Sandwich, the Angus Steak Burger, the Chicken Fries product or the Stackers", said Russ Klein, chief marketing officer at Burger King. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (September 18, 2009). "McDonald's, Burger King serve up premium gourmet burgers". USA Today. Gannet. Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ "New Angus Burgers at Burger King". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. April 3, 2008. Retrieved October 25, 2009. 
^ Hays, Constance (December 11, 1997). "Burger King Campaign Is Promoting New Fries". New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2009. 
^ Hamstra, Mark (December 22, 1997). "Burger King attacks McD with french-fry launch". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 12, 2007. 
^ Gale Group (September 9, 1991). "BK replaces boxes with recyclables, rolls curly fries, barbecue sandwich". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 21, 2009. 
^ "Play With Your Food! Burger King Corporation Shakes It Up With New Shake 'em Up Fries and Rowdy Rocket Power Toys" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. April 22, 2002. Archived from the original on May 16, 2008. Retrieved October 27, 2009. 
^ "The Whopper Turns 45". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. February 28, 2002. Retrieved October 27, 2009. 
^ "Three New Tastes at Burger King". QSR Magazine. December 26, 2001. Archived from the original on July 15, 2011. Retrieved December 1, 2009. 
^ "Burger King Corporation Introduces New 99¢ BK VALUE MENU Customers Have Never Seen Value Like This!" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. September 12, 2002. Archived from the original on May 16, 2008. Retrieved December 1, 2009. 
^ "Burger King Corporation Launches New 99¢ BK CRAVERS Menu". BNet.com (Press release). Burger King Corporation. February 9, 2005. Retrieved December 1, 2009. 
^ "Burger King menu – Canada" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. Archived from the original on July 6, 2011. 
^ "Burger King to add French toast sticks to its breakfast menus.". PRNewswire (Press release). August 13, 1986. Retrieved February 15, 2010. 
^ "BK expands breakfast line, marketing command". Nation's Restaurant News. September 1, 1986. Retrieved February 15, 2010. 
^ "Burger King going bagels". Ocala Star-Banner. Knight-Ridder. August 28, 1987. pp. D7. Retrieved February 17, 2010. 
^ "Burger King Sweetens America's Morning With New Cini-minis" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. April 27, 1998. Archived from the original on May 16, 2008. Retrieved December 1, 2009. 
^ "Burger King's Adds New Breakfast Addition". South Florida Business Journal. August 18, 1999. Retrieved October 27, 2007. 
^ Hsu, Cathy H. C.; Powers, Thomas F. (June 29, 2001). "8". Marketing Hospitality (3rd ed.). New York: Wiley. p. 183. ISBN 0-471-34885-6. 
^ Andrejczak, Matt (February 16, 2010). "Burger King to sell Starbucks Seattle's Best Coffee". Wall Street Journal. Market Watch. Retrieved February 17, 2010. Miami-based Burger King has been looking to improve its breakfast menu... 
^ "Burger King adds to breakfast menu". South Florida Business Journal. March 29, 2010. Retrieved March 31, 2010. Burger King has added a breakfast bowl and muffin sandwich to its breakfast menu. 
^ "Burger King adds 9 breakfast items to menu". News and Record. Associated Press. September 7, 2010. Retrieved September 8, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ a b York, Emily Bryson (August 25, 2011). "Burger King wants women in its court". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved December 10, 2011. 
^ "Prima-Agri to Produce Halal Beef for Regional Fast Food Chains". The Halal Journal. October 10, 2006. Archived from the original on February 7, 2011. Retrieved October 1, 2007. 
^ "Burger King UAE launches the king of all burgers across the UAE" (Press release). Zawya.com. May 2, 2004. Retrieved October 1, 2007. 
^ Eglash, Ruth (May 11, 2010). "Burger Ranch to take over all local branches of Burger King". Jerusalem Post. Retrieved May 19, 2010. Burger King, known for its flame-grilled oversized hamburger, the Whopper, will follow in the footsteps of a long line of American eateries, including Starbucks, Dunkin’ Donuts and Wendy's, that did not succeed in the Israeli market despite their popularity in the US and other countries across the globe. 
^ "The Kosher Whopper Boosts Burger Sales in Israel.". AllBusiness.com. July 1, 2000. Archived from the original on November 6, 2007. Retrieved October 1, 2007. 
^ "Burger King menu – United Kingdom". Burger King Corporation. 
^ "the History of Burgers". worldsgreatesthamburgers.com. Archived from the original on February 15, 2008. Retrieved March 28, 2008. The Hungry Jacks "Aussie Burger" has tomato, lettuce, onion, cheese, bacon, beetroot, egg, ketchup and a meat patty. 
^ "Burger King menu – Taiwan" (in Chinese). Archived from the original on June 7, 2007. Taiwanese menu listing chicken thigh meat sandwiches 
^ Knowledge@Emory (November 27, 2007). "Burger King CEO John Chidsey on Innovation, Trust, and "The King"". Emory University. Archived from the original on October 26, 2012. Retrieved March 1, 2008. When ordering chicken in China, take note. The Chinese prefer dark meat chicken, not white. "We definitely have to be cognizant of the local market and provide what the local market wants", he John Chidsey, CEO of BK says. 
^ "Burger King adds its 99 cents worth". Restaurant Business magazine. AllBusiness.com. September 17, 2002. Retrieved November 2, 2009. [dead link]
^ "Burger King – Italy" (in Italian). Burger King Corporation. Retrieved June 29, 2009. 
^ "Burger King menu – Germany" (in German). Burger King Corporation. 
^ "Burger King menu – Hong Kong". Burger King Corporation. Archived from the original on April 3, 2011. Dessert menu listing turnover-style pies 
^ Earl, Employee of the Month advertisement by Crispin Porter + Bogusky, 2006
^ "Burger King ingredients list – United States" (PDF) (Press release). Burger King Corporation. November 3, 2010. Archived from the original (PDF) on December 26, 2010. Retrieved December 29, 2010. 
^ "Burger King Partners With Kellogg on Veggie Burger.". Convenience Store News. May 25, 2005. Archived from the original on January 3, 2008. Retrieved December 4, 2007. ...it seems that the King is shooting for the best of both worlds with its new BK Veggie Burger, which has vegetarian patties from Kellogg's Morningstar Farms. 
^ "BK taps Lang as convection-oven supplier". Nation's Restaurant News. February 12, 1996. Archived from the original on March 8, 2016. Retrieved October 13, 2009. 
^ Smith, Andrew F. (August 30, 2006). Encyclopedia of Junk Food and Fast Food (First ed.). Westport, Conn: Greenwood Publishing Group. pp. 27–28. ISBN 0-313-33527-3. Retrieved June 7, 2008. 
^ Hoyland, Christa (April 7, 2009). "Burger King menu to get creative". QSR Web. Archived from the original on July 15, 2011. Retrieved June 6, 2009. With its old conveyor broiler, the chain's research and development team was limited to rolling out products that fit the speed of the conveyor chain. 
^ "Burger King Goes To The Heartland Of The USA To Test The Next Big Thing – The Great American Burger" (Press release). September 28, 1999. Archived from the original on February 19, 2006. Retrieved October 27, 2009. 
^ Kruse, Brandi (September 7, 2011). "Burger King has 'disturbing trend' of serving undercooked meat". KIRO FM. Archived from the original on March 12, 2012. Retrieved September 15, 2011. 
^ Kruse, Brandi (September 7, 2011). "Washington State Department of Health's inspection findings". KIRO FM. Retrieved September 15, 2011. 
^ Cartier, Curtis (September 8, 2011). "Burger King Caught Serving Undercooked Beef in 10 Washington State Counties". Seattle Weekly. Archived from the original on February 18, 2012. Retrieved September 15, 2011. 
^ Reckert, John (January 2, 2001). "A Whopper of a Wireless Solution". Wireless Business and Technologies. Retrieved October 13, 2009. 
^ Babyak, Richard (June 30, 2003). "Controls & Sensors". Appliance Design Magazine. Retrieved October 13, 2009. 
^ Boyle, Matthew (October 12, 2007). "Burger King reinvents flame broiling". Fortune Magazine. CNN. Retrieved October 13, 2009. 
^ Sherer, Mike (May 2003). "What it really costs". Foodservice Equipment Reports. Retrieved October 14, 2009. 
^ Cohen, Deborah (June 4, 1998). "McDonald's new system is 'Made for You'". Journal Record. Oklahoma City: Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on March 8, 2016. Retrieved June 8, 2009. For one thing, McDonald's is playing catch-up with Diageo unit Burger King and Wendy's, which have offered made-to-order sandwiches for years. 
^ "Burger King Corporation Debuts New Premium Great-Tasting TenderCrisp Chicken Sandwich" (Press release). April 14, 1999. Retrieved June 6, 2009. The new made-to-order, indulgent TenderCrisp Chicken Sandwich... [permanent dead link]
^ "Burger King Corp.'s Bold New Global Restaurant Design Takes Flight At Amsterdam's Schiphol Airport" (Press release). October 9, 2009. Retrieved November 11, 2009. 
^ Marco, Meghann (February 16, 2007). "Burger King Breakfast Value Menu Starts Monday". The Consumerist. Retrieved October 27, 2007. 
^ Carlino, "Franchisees on BK Kid's Club: what took so long?", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ "Burger King's Youngest Customers Appeased". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. December 12, 2000. Retrieved June 5, 2009. The premiums, developed with Sassy... 
^ "Burger King Corporation Announces Partnership With Little Tikes For Under-Three Kids Premiums". HispanicBusiness.com. November 21, 2003. Retrieved June 6, 2009. [permanent dead link]
^ Cebrzynski, Gregg (May 19, 1999). "McDonald's sues Burger King in Big Kids Meal dispute". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved June 5, 2009. 
^ "Court Rules In Kids Meals Case". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. June 16, 2000. Retrieved June 7, 2009. 
^ Zuber, Amy (April 2, 2001). "McD aims 'Mighty Kids' meal at preteens, combats BK initiative". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved June 7, 2009. Burger King, shortly after launching its new meal, was sued by McDonald's for unfair competition. In the lawsuit McDonald's challenged BK's use of the term "Big Kids Meal", claiming that it was the same name McDonald's had used the previous summer during a three-week meal promotion in southeastern Michigan. A federal court judge in Detroit eventually ruled that "kids meal" was a generic term and that Burger King, a division of London-based Diageo PLC, could use it. 
^ "New menus, P. Diddy ad crown Burger King rebound". GMANews.TV. Associated Press. Archived from the original on June 18, 2007. Retrieved June 6, 2009. Success has come from new "premium" flame-broiled products with high profit margins, quality chicken products and value menus... 
^ "Burger King Pays Premium to Promote Premium Menu Offerings". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. April 16, 2009. Retrieved June 5, 2009. Some of these new products include a "game-changing" extra-thick burger, bone-in-ribs, grilled fish sandwiches, and a new grilled chicken sandwich. 
^ Glover, Katherine (February 23, 2009). "From Burger King to Ruby Tuesday, Restaurants Struggle to Find 'Just Right'". BNet.com. Minneapolis, Minnesota. Retrieved October 17, 2009. But though those lines may be blurred, they're far from broken. A premium burger still doesn't turn Burger King into a sit-down restaurant with table service. It may work for now, but when Goldilocks gets back on her feet again, her version of "just right" may return to where it was. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (February 7, 2007). "Burger King of Cool?". USA Today. Retrieved August 21, 2007. 
^ Martin, Andrew (February 10, 2008). "Gulp! Burger King Is on the Rebound". New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2009. 
^ Zuber, Amy (December 17, 2001). "Listen up, Mac: BK aims to reign supreme, orders menu changes". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved December 4, 2007. The menu overhaul is part of a chain-wide effort led by chairman and chief executive John Dasburg to reverse declining sales and traffic trends in preparation for Burger King's much-anticipated separation from London-based parent Diageo PLC. 
^ "Burger King Partners With Kellogg on Veggie Burger.". Convenience Store News. May 25, 2005. Archived from the original on January 3, 2008. Retrieved December 4, 2007. ...it seems that the King is shooting for the best of both worlds with its new BK Veggie Burger, which has vegetarian patties from Kellogg's Morningstar Farms. 
^ Mallas, Steven (May 17, 2005). "Kellogg's Royal Partner". Motley Fool. Archived from the original on December 17, 2012. Retrieved December 4, 2007. It's good to be king. But, if you can't be king, then it's good to be associated with the King. Kellogg has decided to go for the latter. 
^ Boone, Louis E.; Kurtz, David L. (January 4, 2008). "2". In Calhoun, Jack W. Contemporary Marketing (13th ed.). Mason, Ohio: South-Western College Pub. p. 175. ISBN 0-324-58021-5. Retrieved October 29, 2009. 
^ "Burger Chains Get Chicken.". Motley Fool. July 19, 2005. Retrieved December 3, 2007. The Chicken Fries are coming. Yes, I said Chicken Fries. Tomorrow, Burger King officially rolls out its latest fast-food creation. The chain is hoping that its latest clever menu entry – chicken breast meat rolled into the shape of a french fry, then breaded and fried – will win over new fans in the brutally competitive fast-food wars. 
^ Garfield, Bob (April 16, 2009). "Burger King's 'No Pants' Spot vs. American Family Association". Advertising Age. Retrieved October 28, 2009. 
^ York, Emily Bryson (February 8, 2010). "Burger King's 'Superfan' Might Just Be Your Grandma". Ad Age. Retrieved February 12, 2010. 
^ "Burger King discusses new items for 2008, growth strategies". the International Herald Tribune. Associated Press. February 27, 2007. Retrieved March 1, 2008. [Russ] Klein [BK president of Global Marketing] said an increase from an average of five to six "superfan" visits a month would increase traffic by 9 percent. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (February 7, 2007). "Burger King of Cool?". USA Today. Retrieved June 6, 2009. That's BK's term for mostly 18- to 35-year-old males who gobble fast food at the devil-may-care clip of nine to 16 times a month. While they're just 18 percent of Burger King's customers, they account for about half of all visits to the stores. 
^ Jargon, Julie (February 1, 2010). "As Sales Drop, Burger King Draws Critics for Courting 'Super Fans'". Wall Street Journal. Yahoo.com. Archived from the original on February 4, 2010. Retrieved February 1, 2010. 
^ Edwards, Joe (June 4, 1984). "Results mixed from Burger King's salad bar". Nation's Restaurant News.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Forman, Charles (October 27, 1984). "New products: why some succeed, others fail – fast food restaurants". Nation's Restaurant News.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Van Warner, Rick (June 8, 1987). "Burger chains toss packaged salads". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 29, 2009. (Subscription required (help)). 
^ "Newman's Own, Inc.". FundingUniverse.com. Retrieved October 27, 2009. 
^ Shapiro, Eben (February 27, 1991). "Grand Met Executive Gets New No. 2 Post". New York Times. Retrieved September 19, 2011. ...the introduction of Paul Newman's line of salad dressings has helped double salad bar sales. 
^ "Burger King goes bun-less, adds high-protein salads". USA Today. January 13, 2004. Retrieved January 23, 2011. 
^ Kramer, Lauren (February 1, 2005). "Low-carb diets spark growing interest in salads". Seafood Business Magazine. Retrieved October 29, 2009. 
^ "Burger King introduces the King Delight line" (Press release). Simonds Farsons Cisk. July 27, 2004. Archived from the original on July 10, 2011. Retrieved November 2, 2009. 
^ Howden, Sarah (October 6, 2003). "Change is on the menu for a quick fix". Edinburgh Evening News. UK: The Scotsman. Archived from the original on June 16, 2011. Retrieved November 2, 2009. 
^ Marco, Meghann (January 31, 2007). "Burger King Testing Trans-Fat Free Oils". The Consumerist. Retrieved October 27, 2007. 
^ Shepherd, Lauren (October 2, 2008). "Burger King Switches to Trans Fat Free Oil". New York Times. Associated Press. Retrieved October 3, 2008. The No. 2 hamburger chain also said all of its menu ingredients, including its baked goods, will contain zero grams of trans fat by 1 Nov.. 
^ De Nies, Ynji; Ferran, Lee (August 4, 2008). "Kid's Menus Packed with Fun, Calories". ABC News. Retrieved June 7, 2009. Two popular kid's meals, Kentucky Fried Chicken's "Laptop" meal and Burger King's "Big Kids" meal, are well over double the recommended calorie count, at 940 and 910 calories respectively, the CSPI investigation found. 
^ "Burger King Corp. Announces Three Additions to Kids Meal Menu That Meet Its Stringent Nutrition Criteria" (Press release). Burger King Corporation. May 27, 2009. Retrieved June 3, 2009. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (September 21, 2007). "Burger King has a new twist on fries: Fresh Apples.". USA Today. Retrieved September 21, 2007. 
^ Sainz, Adrian (September 12, 2007). "Burger King to sell broiled chicken in healthier kid menu". USA Today. Retrieved September 12, 2007. 
^ Groom, Nichola (September 12, 2007). "Burger King to limit ads aimed at children under 12". Reuters. Retrieved October 4, 2007. 
^ "Burger King Corporation joins the Council of Better Business Bureaus' Children's Food and Beverage Advertising Initiative" (Press release). Better Business Bureau. September 12, 2007. Archived from the original on June 1, 2012. Retrieved October 4, 2007. 
^ "Burger King milk". Dairy Foods Magazine. January 2005. Retrieved October 24, 2007. [dead link]
^ Palmer, Vicky; Barnard, Adam; Chapman, Stephanie; Alford, Leah; Balch, Victoria (2003). "Children love to meet, but some want to veg out". Plymouth Evening Herald. Plymouth, England: Headliners.com. Archived from the original on July 23, 2011. Retrieved October 26, 2009. 
^ Vegetarian Society. "Approved products list – BK Veggie Burger". Retrieved August 16, 2008. [permanent dead link]
^ "Fast food burgers roll with low-carb craze". Associated Press. January 15, 2004. Archived from the original on August 17, 2007. Retrieved August 21, 2007. 
^ Garber, Amy (February 2, 2004). "BK eyes salad days with low-carb menu, new ad shop: but analyst says at least 1,000 stores are likely to close". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved January 23, 2011. 
^ Glover, Katherine (January 12, 2010). "Gluten-Free Options Go Mainstream with Burger King". BNet.com. Retrieved February 8, 2010. 
^ Gise, Molly (January 6, 2010). "BK singles out gluten-free menu items". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved February 8, 2010. 
^ Spurgeon, Devon (September 4, 2000). "Burger King Brings in Business By Offering Burgers for Breakfast". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved September 21, 2007. 
^ Walker, Elaine (December 15, 2010). "Burger King pulls back on after-midnight hours". Miami Herald. Retrieved January 7, 2011. [dead link]
^ Gibson, Richard (May 17, 2010). "Have It Whose Way?". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 7, 2011. 
^ Holusha, Joshua (November 18, 1990). "A Setback for Polystyrene". New York Times. Retrieved October 21, 2009. 
^ Liddle, Alan (November 19, 1990). "McD's switch to paper fuels packaging debate". Nation's Restaurant News.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Burger King hires Union Packaging". Philadelphia Business Journal. August 10, 2000. Retrieved February 14, 2010. 
^ Hein, Kenneth (August 23, 2004). "Design: Burger King Packaging Takes Time To Talk". Brandweek. AllBusiness.com. Archived from the original on January 6, 2010. Retrieved February 14, 2010. 
^ Swearingen, Wendy Guild (March 5, 2004). "Can Burger King Rekindle the Sizzle?". Harvard Business School. Retrieved February 14, 2010. 
^ Knowledge@Emory (November 27, 2007). "Burger King CEO John Chidsey on Innovation, Trust, and "The King"". Emory University. Archived from the original on October 26, 2012. Retrieved March 1, 2008. Burger King came out with the "BK Chicken Fries" and put them in a fry pod carton. The result? The company sells more servings per day than either McDonald's or Wendy's. 
^ Horowitz, Jeremy (September 6, 2006). "Frypod from Burger King: eat boiling oil, Apple". iLounge. Retrieved September 1, 2016. 
^ "New Bistro Concept Takes Top Honors at the QSR/FPI Foodservice Packaging Awards Ceremony" (PDF). Food packaging institute. October 26, 2007. Retrieved June 5, 2009. [permanent dead link]
^ "Burger King Corporation Honors Minority Suppliers". QSR Magazine (Press release). July 3, 2007. Retrieved February 14, 2010. 
^ Seligman, Bob (March 5, 1990). "Burger King reels out Ocean Catch, sinks Whaler". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved December 4, 2007. 
^ Lubow, Arthur (April 19, 1998). "Steal This Burger". New York Times. Retrieved December 4, 2007. Burger King reports that in blind tastings consumers prefer its recently introduced Big King to the Big Mac by a wide margin. 
^ Garber, Amy (February 28, 2005). "BK franchisees bullish on beefed up performance". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved November 2, 2009. 
^ Thorn, Bret (March 28, 2011). "Burger King revamps chicken tenders". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved June 26, 2011. 
^ Garber, Amy (August 4, 2003). "BK offers troops Great American burger for Independence Day". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 13, 2009. 
^ Collins, Glenn (August 28, 1997). "As Business Gets Lean, a Big King Dares Big Mac". New York Times. Retrieved August 21, 2007. 
^ Fabricant, Florence (May 10, 1993). "'Beefy' comeback for meat loaf". Nation's Restaurant News.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Romero, Peter J. (October 3, 1998). "Burger King discounts mark shift to regional promo plays". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 27, 2009. Stores in New England resurrected the veal Parmigiana sandwich... 
^ Kelso, Alicia (August 27, 2008). "Burger King intros value Wrappers". QSR Web. Archived from the original on July 15, 2011. Retrieved November 2, 2009. 
^ Newman, Eric (June 28, 2008). "Fast Feeders' New Wrap". BrandWeek. Retrieved November 2, 2009. 
^ "Eight menu trends for 2008". Bakery Management Magazine. Penton Publications. January 25, 2008. Archived from the original on April 16, 2009. Retrieved December 6, 2009. Mini burgers and wraps caught on late in 2007... 
^ Kirby, Adam (May 17, 2009). "Mind Your P's To Stay On Trend". Hotels Magazine. Reed Business Information. Archived from the original on July 7, 2011. Retrieved December 6, 2009. No menu item is hotter right now than the slider and the cadre of mini sandwiches it has inspired. Menu trends guru Nancy Kruse told an audience at the National Restaurant Association Show that restaurateurs across all dining segments are finding great success with sliders, from Burger King's Burger Shots... 
^ Brandau, Mark (March 20, 2009). "McDonald's wraps up new snack trend". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved December 6, 2009. More recently, mini-burgers have become a popular menu addition at fast-food chains. Burger King recently introduced BK Burger Shots, miniature burgers sold in packs of two or six... 
^ Brook, Chris (May 21, 2008). "The '6 Pack' calorie-busting monster burger that promotes 'social eating'". Daily Mail. London. Retrieved June 12, 2008. It's called the "6 Pack" but anyone with the appetite to eat this monster burger is likely to have a stomach of a more rounded variety. 
^ "Burger King tries mini-burgers on for size". Nation's Restaurant News. December 23, 2008. Retrieved May 6, 2009. 
^ Howard, Theresa (July 27, 2007). "Burger King asks: Would you like chips with that?". USA Today. Retrieved October 14, 2009. 
^ "BK Apple Fries Will Hit Grocery Shelves". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. June 19, 2009. Retrieved October 14, 2009. Burger King Corp. has entered a licensing arrangement with Crunch Pak to bring the popular BK Fresh Apple Fries to approximately 10,000 supermarkets nationwide... 
^ "Burger King License Expands Internationally". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. October 20, 2009. Retrieved October 20, 2009. 
^ "New Burger King Branded Crispy Microwaveable French Fries from ConAgra Foods Lamb Weston" (Press release). September 2, 2009. Retrieved October 20, 2009. 
^ Romero, Peter J. (July 11, 1988). "Chicken Internationals take Burger King test". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved March 1, 2008. Also included in the array are the Bull's Eye Barbecue Burger, which was available for a limited time beginning last fall. The sandwich—a hero roll topped with two beef patties and barbecue sauce—is called a Barbecue Sub in some markets. 
^ Hagstrom, Suzy (September 18, 1992). "Burger King Brings Service To The Table". Retrieved November 23, 2013. 
^ "Burger King Delivers". Philadelphia Inquirer. September 23, 1992. pp. F1. To the table all of the chain soon will be employing servers to carry food to seated customers. Its also expanding the dinner menu...  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Burger King Corporation to Launch BK Back Porch(TM) Griller Sandwiches" (Press release). PRNewswire.com,. January 18, 2001. Retrieved October 22, 2007. 
^ Drinnan, John (November 4, 2006). "Miami HQ sniffs around burger success". the New Zealand Herald. Retrieved December 4, 2007. Kiwis with a taste for posh hamburgers are tucking into a new gourmet range from Burger King, and now the chain's international bosses are looking to take a bite. 
^ Zuber, Amy (December 17, 2001). "Listen up, Mac: BK aims to reign supreme, orders menu changes". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved December 4, 2007. The new "King Supreme" – which will replace Burger King's poor-selling Big King—is similar to the Big Mac except that the burger will be flame-broiled and topped with a different sauce and no middle bun will be used, according to BK spokesman Rob Doughty. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (November 5, 2013). "Burger King re-rolls out Big Mac-buster Big King". USAToday. Retrieved November 5, 2013. 
^ "Burger King Offers Cage-Free Food.". CBS News. Associated Press. March 28, 2007. Retrieved July 21, 2007. 
^ The Gale Group (February 18, 2002). "USDA grants BK bid, will enforce humane slaughter". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved June 7, 2009. 
^ Martin, Andrew (March 28, 2007). "Burger King Shifts Policy on Animals". New York Times. Retrieved March 9, 2008. In what animal welfare advocates are describing as a "historic advance", Burger King, the world's second-largest hamburger chain, said yesterday that it would begin buying eggs and pork from suppliers that did not confine their animals in cages and crates. 
^ "PETA to criticize Burger King poultry choices". South Florida Business Journal. November 28, 2006. Retrieved March 9, 2008. People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals said it will use its position as a Burger King Holdings stockholder at Wednesday's shareholder's meeting to show its position on the fast-food company's poultry practices. 
^ Cone, Tracie (April 25, 2012). "Burger King makes cage-free eggs, pork promise". Yahoo News. Associated Press. Retrieved April 26, 2012. 
^ Beartlein, Lisa (April 25, 2012). "Burger King pledges to end use of caged pigs, hens". Reuters. Retrieved April 25, 2012. 
^ Adamy, Janet (June 28, 2006). "Heinz courts McDonald's to boost ketchup brand". Wall Street Journal. Pittsburg Post-Gazette. Retrieved June 5, 2009. Heinz produces most of the ketchup served in U.S. restaurants, including those of Burger King Corp. ... 
^ Nolan, Steve (October 26, 2013). "Heinz squeezed out by McDonald's as fast food chain drops its ketchup from the menu after more than 40 years". Daily Mail. Retrieved November 6, 2013. 
^ Promo Magazine staff (April 10, 2001). "Burger King Serves Up Ooze". Promo Magazine. Archived from the original on June 6, 2011. Retrieved February 16, 2010. 
^ "Burger King Promotes Dreamworks Film". QSR Magazine (Press release). Burger King Corporation. May 3, 2001. Retrieved February 16, 2010. 
^ Brat, Ilan; Kiernan, Paul (November 24, 2009). "Heinz Seeks to Tap Mexico's Taste for Ketchup". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved February 16, 2010. (Subscription required (help)). Soon Heinz had the contract to supply all Burger King restaurants in Mexico... 
^ "Burger King menu, condiments – United Kingdom". Retrieved February 16, 2010. 
^ "Burger King menu – Spain" (in Spanish). Retrieved February 16, 2010. 
^ "Teletubbies Come To Play At Burger King". AllBusiness.com. Point of Purchase magazine. June 1, 1999. Retrieved February 16, 2010. 
^ Ganzell, Bill. "Farming in the 50's and 60's". Wessel's Living History Farm. The Genzell Group. Retrieved September 27, 2010. 
^ Ziobro, Paul. "Burger King's Rib Deal Winding Down Sooner Than Planned". Greek Capital (Capital.gr). Dow Jones Newswire. Retrieved September 27, 2010. 
^ Warner, Melanie (October 27, 1997). "How Tyson ate Hudson in a little patch of Arkansas". Fortune Magazine. CNNMoney. Retrieved September 27, 2010. 
^ "Lopez Foods Inc.". Hoover's. Retrieved September 27, 2010. 
^ Gold, Alan R. (October 23, 1998). "Fast-Food Deal Gives Maine Potato a Lift". New York Times. Retrieved November 23, 2009. After a long struggle to overcome concerns about the quality of Maine potatoes, McCain Foods Ltd. of Canada has been designated a french-fry supplier by the Burger King Corporation... 
^ Littman, Margaret (October 1997). "Just desserts". Prepared Foods magazine. Retrieved July 7, 2009. Burger King is just one of Edwards' national accounts, but one Garvin thinks illustrates the Atlanta-based company's growth strategy through customization. 
^ Uhle, Frank. "Awrey's Bakeries". Answers.com. Hoover's. Retrieved August 7, 2010. 
^ "Burger King Picks Pepsi". New York Times. Associated Press. August 12, 1987. Retrieved November 3, 2009. 
^ Alva, Marilyn (August 27, 1987). "Tie-in promotions: the glue that made BK stick with Pepsi". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved November 3, 2009. 
^ Alva, Marilyn (August 3, 1987). "Burger King reviews contract with Pepsi-Cola syrup supplier". Nation's Restaurant News.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Ramirez, Anthony (August 12, 1990). "New Coke Conquest: Burger King". New York Times. Retrieved November 3, 2009. 
^ Sanchez, Jesus (May 2, 1990). "Cola wars: Burger King switches from Pepsi to Coke". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 28, 2007. 
^ "Fast food giant Burger King Corp. announced that it had expanded a partnership with Coca-Cola Co.". Food & Drink Weekly. AllBusiness.com. January 13, 2003. Archived from the original on February 23, 2008. Retrieved November 3, 2009. 
^ "Burger King, Coke May be Headed to Court". Convenience Store News. AllBusiness.com. June 5, 2003. Archived from the original on December 29, 2008. Retrieved November 3, 2009. 
^ Moura, Fabiola (October 29, 2011). "3G Capital aims to make Burger King a top brand in Latin America". Washington Post. p. 2. Retrieved December 10, 2011. 
^ Ziobro, Paul (May 13, 2009). "Burger King Ad Plan Is Fought". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved June 4, 2009. ...a soft-drink contract entered into by Burger King and the two drink companies [Coca-Cola Corporation and Dr Pepper-Snapple] in 1999 
^ "Burger King to Carry Nestlé's Pure Life". Beverage World. November 4, 2008. Archived from the original on July 7, 2011. Retrieved June 11, 2009. 
^ "Coke Partners With Burger King". Convenience Store News. AllBusiness.com. December 28, 2001. Archived from the original on February 3, 2009. Retrieved November 3, 2009. 
^ "Burger King Introduces Single-Serve Milk Nationally" (PDF). Midwest Dairy Association. June 30, 2006. Archived from the original (PDF) on January 5, 2009. Retrieved September 16, 2009. 
^ Bosman, Julie (July 8, 2006). "This Joe's for You?". New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2009. 
^ "Sara Lee opens liquid coffee plant". Tea & Coffee Trade Journal. AllBusiness.com. November 20, 2004. Retrieved June 11, 2009. The unit, which began operations in July, has restaurant chain Burger King as its main customer... [dead link]
^ "Sarah Lee Corporation 2006 Corporate Report". Sara Lee Corporation. p. 16. Archived from the original (PDF) on June 15, 2009. Retrieved November 5, 2009. Sara Lee Foodservice successfully partnered with Burger King to develop a consistently delicious, hard-working coffee: BK JOE. The coffee comes in three varieties – decaf, regular and turbo strength – and is served in the restaurant's 7,000+ American outlets using Sara Lee's Cafitesse liquid coffee concentrate machine. 
^ "Cafitesse: Perking up Ocean Properties". Nation's Restaurant News. April 26, 1999. Retrieved November 5, 2009. It's easy to control your costs. [The brewer] eliminates labor costs because no one has to be in charge of the coffee station." The Cafitesse brewing system uses patented bag-in-box packaging, so "there are no grounds, no filters and minimal cleaning." 
^ Petrecca, Laura (October 7, 2005). "Fast-food restaurants spruce up coffee". USA Today. Retrieved October 20, 2009. 
^ "Burger King adds Seattle's Best coffee to menu". MSNBC. Associated Press. February 16, 2010. Retrieved February 17, 2010. 
^ "Burger King pours free coffee Fridays". The Sun News. November 5, 2010. Retrieved November 5, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Horovitz, Bruce (February 16, 2010). "Burger King to serve Seattle's Best Coffee". USA Today. Retrieved February 17, 2010. McCafe, the premium coffee success story from McDonald's, is about to get double-teamed by Burger King and Starbucks. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (January 22, 2009). "Burger King plans beer-selling Whopper Bar in South Beach". USA Today. Miami, Florida. Retrieved January 23, 2010. 
^ Phillips, David (January 25, 2010). "Burger King Says "Have It Your Way:" Beer With That Whopper and Fries?". Retrieved February 8, 2010. 
^ Hoyland, Christa (January 22, 2010). "New BK Whopper Bar to sell beer". QSRWeb.com. Archived from the original on July 15, 2011. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ "Carrolls Corp 1997 10-K/A filing". Security and Exchange Commission. November 10, 1998. Retrieved October 28, 2009. In August 1990, the Company sold its food distribution business to Burger King Distribution Services ("BKDS"), a division of BKC. 
^ "Grand Met to Retain A Burger King Unit". New York Times. Reuters. August 11, 1989. Retrieved October 28, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (April 6, 1992). "Burger King launches new purchasing co-op". Nation's Restaurant News. Retrieved October 28, 2009. 
^ "Burger King to sell Burger King Dist. to Canadian firm". Nation's Restaurant News. April 20, 1992. Retrieved October 28, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, "Burger King launches new purchasing co-op", Nation's Restaurant News 
^ "Maines receives customer's highest recognition for outstanding Service". June 30, 2003. Archived from the original on June 20, 2006. Retrieved June 4, 2009. "Burger King has been an integral part of our customer portfolio for 30 years and will continue to be in the future", said David J. Maines, co-chairman of Maines' board. 
^ "Maines Paper & Food Service, Inc.". Business Week investors research. June 16, 2008. Retrieved June 5, 2009. Maines Paper & Food Service Inc. has expanded its Burger King Corporation account to include food service distribution to another 22 restaurants in the Maryland area. 
^ Kaplin, David (September 17, 2008). "Sysco deliveries restart in a jiffy". Houston Chronicle. Retrieved June 5, 2009. Sysco serves mammoth organizations such as Burger King... 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Burger King foods.








v
t
e


Burger King






History
Advertising
Advertising programs
Franchises
Countries with franchises
Legal issues
Products
Product list





People



James B. Adamson
Brad Blum
Greg Brenneman
Norman E. Brinker
Jeff Campbell
John W. Chidsey
Jack Cowin
David Edgerton
James McLamore
Donald N. Smith





Products




Beef



Sliders
Premium burgers
BK XXL
Big King
Whopper





Chicken



Grilled chicken sandwiches
Specialty Sandwiches
BK Chicken Fries
BK Chicken Nuggets
TenderCrisp





Other



BK Dinner Baskets
Breakfast sandwiches
Fish sandwiches
Mac n' Cheetos
Storm (ice cream)








Advertising




Campaigns



Big Bumpin'
BK Tee Vee
Burger King Kingdom
PocketBike Racer
Sneak King
The Burger King
The Subservient Chicken
The Whopperettes
The Whoppers
Ugoff
Where's Herb?





Sponsorships



BK Racing
Burger King Classic
Alex Bowman (NASCAR)
Joe Nemechek (NASCAR)
New Zealand Breakers (NBL)
Ryan Truex (NASCAR)
Sauber (F1)





Related subjects



Burger Wars
Fast food advertising








Franchises and
related topics



AmRest
Army and Air Force Exchange Service
Beurger King Muslim
BK Whopper Bar
Burger King Israel
Burger King (Mattoon, Illinois)
Burger King (Alberta)
Carrols Corporation
Simonds Farsons Cisk
Heartland Food Corporation
Hungry Jack's (Australia)
Tim Hortons
Olayan Group
Wimpy





Ownership



Pillsbury Company
Grand Metropolitan
Diageo
TPG Capital
Bain Capital
3G Capital
Berkshire Hathaway
Restaurant Brands International





Legal issues
and cases



Burger King Corporation v Hungry Jack's Pty Ltd
Burger King Corp. v. Rudzewicz
Burger King Pokémon container recall
2013 meat adulteration scandal










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Burger_King_products&oldid=793679772"					
Categories: Burger King foodsHidden categories: CS1 German-language sources (de)Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksCS1 Chinese-language sources (zh)Articles with dead external links from April 2012CS1 Italian-language sources (it)Pages containing links to subscription-only contentArticles with dead external links from June 2016CS1 Spanish-language sources (es)Use mdy dates from July 2017Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 August 2017, at 08:30.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Samsung - Wikipedia




















 







Samsung

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the conglomerate. For the publicly traded consumer electronics subsidiary, see Samsung Electronics.
Not to be confused with Samsun, Samson, Sanson, or Sampson.

Samsung












Samsung Town in the Gangnam Station area in Seoul



Industry
Conglomerate


Founded
1 March 1938; 79 years ago (1938-03-01)
Daegu, Japanese Korea


Founder
Lee Byung-chul


Headquarters
40th floor Samsung Electronics Building, 11, Seocho-daero 74-gil, Seocho District, Seoul, South Korea[1]



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Lee Kun-hee (Chairman)
Lee Jae-yong (Vice-Chairman)


Products
Apparel, chemicals, consumer electronics, electronic components, medical equipment, semiconductors, solid state drives, DRAM, ships, telecommunications equipment, home appliances[2]


Services
Advertising, construction, entertainment, financial services, hospitality, information and communications technology, medical and health care services, retail, shipbuilding


Revenue
 US$305 billion (2014)[3]



Net income

 US$22.1 billion (2014)[3]


Total assets
 US$529.5 billion (2014)[3]


Total equity
 US$231.2 billion (2014)[3]



Number of employees

489,000 (2014)[3]


Divisions
Samsung Electronics
Samsung C&T Corporation
Samsung Heavy Industries
Samsung SDS
Samsung Life Insurance
Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance
Cheil Worldwide


Website
samsung.com




Samsung


Hangul
삼성


Hanja
三星


Revised Romanization
Samseong


McCune–Reischauer
Samsŏng





This article contains Korean text. Without proper rendering support, you may see question marks, boxes, or other symbols instead of Hangul and Hanja.



Economy of South Korea

History




Five-Year Plans
Saemaul Undong
Heavy-Chemical Industry Drive
Miracle on the Han River
1997 financial crisis




Business culture




Chaebol
Trade policy




Industries




Currency
Communications
Tourism
Transportation
Real estate
Financial services
Energy




Regional




Regions by GDP per capita




Related topics




Science and technology
Cities







v
t
e





Samsung Group (Hangul: 삼성; Hanja: 三星; Korean pronunciation: [sʰamsʰʌŋ]) is a South Korean multinational conglomerate headquartered in Samsung Town, Seoul.[1] It comprises numerous affiliated businesses,[1] most of them united under the Samsung brand, and is the largest South Korean chaebol (business conglomerate).
Samsung was founded by Lee Byung-chul in 1938 as a trading company. Over the next three decades, the group diversified into areas including food processing, textiles, insurance, securities and retail. Samsung entered the electronics industry in the late 1960s and the construction and shipbuilding industries in the mid-1970s; these areas would drive its subsequent growth. Following Lee's death in 1987, Samsung was separated into four business groups – Samsung Group, Shinsegae Group, CJ Group and Hansol Group. Since 1990, Samsung has increasingly globalised its activities and electronics; in particular, its mobile phones and semiconductors have become its most important source of income.
Notable Samsung industrial affiliates include Samsung Electronics (the world's 2nd largest information technology company measured by 2015 revenues, and 5th in market value),[4] Samsung Heavy Industries (the world's 2nd largest shipbuilder measured by 2010 revenues),[5] and Samsung Engineering and Samsung C&T (respectively the world's 13th and 36th largest construction companies).[6] Other notable subsidiaries include Samsung Life Insurance (the world's 14th largest life insurance company),[7] Samsung Everland (operator of Everland Resort, the oldest theme park in South Korea)[8] and Cheil Worldwide (the world's 15th largest advertising agency measured by 2012 revenues).[9][10]
Samsung has a powerful influence on South Korea's economic development, politics, media and culture and has been a major driving force behind the "Miracle on the Han River".[11][12] Its affiliate companies produce around a fifth of South Korea's total exports.[13] Samsung's revenue was equal to 17% of South Korea's $1,082 billion GDP.[14]



Contents


1 Etymology
2 History

2.1 1938 to 1970
2.2 1970 to 1990
2.3 1990 to 2000
2.4 2000 to 2015
2.5 2016


3 Acquisitions and attempted acquisitions
4 Sold parts

4.1 Samsung Techwin
4.2 Samsung Thales
4.3 Samsung General Chemicals
4.4 Samsung Total


5 Operations

5.1 Affiliates

5.1.1 Samsung Electronics
5.1.2 Samsung Engineering
5.1.3 Samsung Everland
5.1.4 Samsung Fine Chemicals
5.1.5 Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance
5.1.6 Samsung Heavy Industries
5.1.7 Samsung Life Insurance
5.1.8 Samsung Machine Tools
5.1.9 Samsung Medical Center
5.1.10 Samsung SDI
5.1.11 Samsung Securities
5.1.12 Samtron
5.1.13 Shilla Hotels and Resorts
5.1.14 S-1 Corporation


5.2 Joint ventures

5.2.1 Defunct


5.3 Partially owned companies

5.3.1 Atlântico Sul
5.3.2 DGB Financial Group
5.3.3 Corning Inc.
5.3.4 Doosan Engine
5.3.5 Korea Aerospace Industries
5.3.6 MEMC KOREA
5.3.7 Pantech
5.3.8 Rambus Incorporated
5.3.9 Renault Samsung Motors
5.3.10 Seagate Technology
5.3.11 Sharp Corporation
5.3.12 SungJin Geotec
5.3.13 Taylor Energy
5.3.14 Wacom




6 Major clients
7 Logo and font

7.1 Audio logo
7.2 Font


8 Samsung Medical Center
9 Sponsorships
10 Litigation and regulatory issues

10.1 Financial scandals
10.2 Antitrust concerns
10.3 Viral marketing
10.4 Labor abuses
10.5 Price fixing


11 References
12 External links



Etymology
According to Samsung's founder, the meaning of the Korean hanja word Samsung (三星) is "tri-star" or "three stars". The word "three" represents something "big, numerous and powerful".[15]
History
1938 to 1970




Lee Byung-chul, founder of Samsung


In 1938, Lee Byung-chull (1910–1987) of a large landowning family in the Uiryeong county moved to nearby Daegu city and founded Samsung Sanghoe (삼성상회, 三星商會). Samsung started out as a small trading company with forty employees located in Su-dong (now Ingyo-dong).[16] It dealt in dried-fish,[16] locally-grown groceries and noodles. The company prospered and Lee moved its head office to Seoul in 1947. When the Korean War broke out, he was forced to leave Seoul. He started a sugar refinery in Busan named Cheil Jedang. In 1954, Lee founded Cheil Mojik and built the plant in Chimsan-dong, Daegu. It was the largest woollen mill ever in the country.[citation needed]
Samsung diversified into many different areas. Lee sought to establish Samsung as leader in a wide range of industries. Samsung moved into lines of business such as insurance, securities and retail. President Park Chung Hee placed great importance on industrialization. He focused his economic development strategy on a handful of large domestic conglomerates, protecting them from competition and assisting them financially.[17]
In 1947, Cho Hong-jai, the Hyosung group's founder, jointly invested in a new company called Samsung Mulsan Gongsa, or the Samsung Trading Corporation, with the Samsung's founder Lee Byung-chull. The trading firm grew to become the present-day Samsung C&T Corporation. After a few years, Cho and Lee separated due to differences in management style. Cho wanted a 30 equity share. Samsung Group was separated into Samsung Group and Hyosung Group, Hankook Tire and other businesses.[18][19]
In the late 1960s, Samsung Group entered the electronics industry. It formed several electronics-related divisions, such as Samsung Electronics Devices, Samsung Electro-Mechanics, Samsung Corning and Samsung Semiconductor & Telecommunications, and made the facility in Suwon. Its first product was a black-and-white television set.[citation needed]
1970 to 1990




The SPC-1000, introduced in 1982, was Samsung's first personal computer (Korean market only) and used an audio cassette tape to load and save data – the floppy drive was optional[20]


In 1980, Samsung acquired the Gumi-based Hanguk Jeonja Tongsin and entered telecommunications hardware. Its early products were switchboards. The facility was developed into the telephone and fax manufacturing systems and became the center of Samsung's mobile phone manufacturing. They have produced over 800 million mobile phones to date.[21] The company grouped them together under Samsung Electronics in the 1980s.
After Lee, the founder's death in 1987, Samsung Group was separated into four business groups—Samsung Group, Shinsegae Group, CJ Group and the Hansol Group.[22] Shinsegae (discount store, department store) was originally part of Samsung Group, separated in the 1990s from the Samsung Group along with CJ Group (Food/Chemicals/Entertainment/logistics), and the Hansol Group (Paper/Telecom). Today these separated groups are independent and they are not part of or connected to the Samsung Group.[23] One Hansol Group representative said, "Only people ignorant of the laws governing the business world could believe something so absurd", adding, "When Hansol separated from the Samsung Group in 1991, it severed all payment guarantees and share-holding ties with Samsung affiliates." One Hansol Group source asserted, "Hansol, Shinsegae, and CJ have been under independent management since their respective separations from the Samsung Group". One Shinsegae department store executive director said, "Shinsegae has no payment guarantees associated with the Samsung Group".[23]
In 1980s, Samsung Electronics began to invest heavily in research and development, investments that were pivotal in pushing the company to the forefront of the global electronics industry. In 1982, it built a television assembly plant in Portugal; in 1984, a plant in New York; in 1985, a plant in Tokyo; in 1987, a facility in England; and another facility in Austin, Texas, in 1996. As of 2012, Samsung has invested more than US$13,000,000,000 in the Austin facility, which operates under the name Samsung Austin Semiconductor. This makes the Austin location the largest foreign investment in Texas and one of the largest single foreign investments in the United States.[24][25]
1990 to 2000
Samsung started to rise as an international corporation in the 1990s. Samsung's construction branch was awarded contracts to build one of the two Petronas Towers in Malaysia, Taipei 101 in Taiwan and the Burj Khalifa in United Arab Emirates.[26] In 1993, Lee Kun-hee sold off ten of Samsung Group's subsidiaries, downsized the company, and merged other operations to concentrate on three industries: electronics, engineering and chemicals. In 1996, the Samsung Group reacquired the Sungkyunkwan University foundation.
Samsung became the world's largest producer of memory chips in 1992 and is the world's second-largest chipmaker after Intel (see Worldwide Top 20 Semiconductor Market Share Ranking Year by Year).[27] In 1995, it created its first liquid-crystal display screen. Ten years later, Samsung grew to be the world's largest manufacturer of liquid-crystal display panels. Sony, which had not invested in large-size TFT-LCDs, contacted Samsung to cooperate, and, in 2006, S-LCD was established as a joint venture between Samsung and Sony in order to provide a stable supply of LCD panels for both manufacturers. S-LCD was owned by Samsung (50% plus one share) and Sony (50% minus one share) and operates its factories and facilities in Tangjung, South Korea. As of 26 December 2011, it was announced that Samsung had acquired the stake of Sony in this joint venture.[28]
Compared to other major Korean companies, Samsung survived the 1997 Asian financial crisis relatively unharmed. However, Samsung Motor was sold to Renault at a significant loss. As of 2010[update], Renault Samsung is 80.1 percent owned by Renault and 19.9 percent owned by Samsung. Additionally, Samsung manufactured a range of aircraft from the 1980s to 1990s. The company was founded in 1999 as Korea Aerospace Industries (KAI), the result of merger between then three domestic major aerospace divisions of Samsung Aerospace, Daewoo Heavy Industries and Hyundai Space and Aircraft Company. However, Samsung still manufactures aircraft engines and gas turbines.[29]
2000 to 2015





This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: most of the section belongs to Samsung Electronics article Please help improve this section if you can. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 2000, Samsung opened a computer programming laboratory in Warsaw, Poland. Its work began with set-top-box technology before moving into digital TV and smartphones. As of 2011, the Warsaw base is Samsung's most important R&D center in Europe, forecast to be recruiting 400 new-hires per year by the end of 2013.[30]




The prominent Samsung sign in Times Square, New York City


In 2010, Samsung announced a ten-year growth strategy centered around five businesses.[31] One of these businesses was to be focused on biopharmaceuticals, to which has committed ₩2,100,000,000,000.[32]
In December 2011, Samsung Electronics sold its hard disk drive business to Seagate.[33]
In first quarter of 2012, Samsung Electronics became the world's largest mobile phone maker by unit sales, overtaking Nokia, which had been the market leader since 1998.[34][35] On 21 August's edition of the Austin American-Statesman, Samsung confirmed plans to spend 3 to 4 billion dollars converting half of its Austin chip manufacturing plant to a more profitable chip.[36] The conversion should start in early 2013 with production on line by the end of 2013. On 14 March 2013, Samsung unveiled the Galaxy S4.
On 24 August 2012, nine American jurors ruled that Samsung had to pay Apple $1.05 billion in damages for violating six of its patents on smartphone technology. The award was still less than the $2.5 billion requested by Apple. The decision also ruled that Apple did not violate five Samsung patents cited in the case.[37] Samsung decried the decision saying that the move could harm innovation in the sector.[38] It also followed a South Korean ruling stating that both companies were guilty of infringing on each other's intellectual property.[39] In first trading after the ruling, Samsung shares on the Kospi index fell 7.7%, the largest fall since 24 October 2008, to 1,177,000 Korean won.[40] Apple then sought to ban the sales of eight Samsung phones (Galaxy S 4G, Galaxy S2 AT&T, Galaxy S2 Skyrocket, Galaxy S2 T-Mobile, Galaxy S2 Epic 4G, Galaxy S Showcase, Droid Charge and Galaxy Prevail) in the United States[41] which has been denied by the court.[42]
On 4 September 2012, Samsung announced that it plans to examine all of its Chinese suppliers for possible violations of labor policies. The company said it will carry out audits of 250 Chinese companies that are its exclusive suppliers to see if children under the age of 16 are being used in their factories.[43]
In 2013, a New Zealand news outlet reported a number of Samsung washing machines spontaneously catching on fire.[44] The corporation is expected to spend $14 billion on advertising and marketing in 2013, with publicity appearing in TV and cinema ads, on billboards and at sports and arts events. In November 2013, the corporation was valued at $227 billion.[45]
In May 2014, Samsung announced it will be shutting down its streaming service on 1 July 2014, also meaning the end of the Samsung Music Hub app that typically comes installed on its Android phones.[46]
On 3 September 2014, Samsung announced Gear VR, a virtual reality device in collaboration with Oculus VR and developed for the Galaxy Note 4.[47]
In October 2014, Samsung announced a $14.7 billion investment to build a chip plant in South Korea. Construction will begin next year with production beginning in 2017. The company has not yet decided the type of chips to be produced.[48]
In October 2014, Samsung also announced it would invest 633 billion South Korean won ($560 million USD) in the construction of a new 700,000 square metre production complex in Vietnam.[49]
Samsung plans to launch a new set of services beginning early 2015. The goal of this new suite of business offerings, dubbed Samsung 360 Services, is to become a help desk of sorts for businesses IT departments. The customizable services range from technical support to security solutions for having a Samsung employee embedded in a client's business as an on-site support manager or technology consultant.[50]
On 2 December 2014, Samsung announced it will sell Fiber Optics to U.S. speciality glass manufacturer Corning Inc.[51]
Samsung Electronics Inc. is expanding in Silicon Valley with a $300 million facility in San Jose, California. The 10-story complex will include 1.1 million square feet of floor space, a clean room for semiconductors and a "fitness center in the sky". The facility will be split between semiconductor research and development and other sales and marketing functions. It will serve as the North America headquarters for semiconductor operations.[52]
In 2015, Samsung has been granted more U.S. patents than any other company - including IBM, Google, Sony, Microsoft and Apple. The company received 7,679 utility patents through 11 December.[53]
2016





This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: most of the section belongs to articles about specific companies Please help improve this section if you can. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In January 2016, Samsung announced it will be working with Microsoft to develop IoT devices based on Windows 10, where the companies will work together to develop products that will run on the platform, as well as integrate with other companies developing hardware and services on Microsoft's OS.[54]
Samsung released a fitness smartwatch called the Gear Fit 2 and a brand of wireless earbuds called Gear Icon X.[55]
On 2 August 2016, Samsung unveiled the Galaxy Note7 smartphone,[56] which went on sale on 19 August 2016. However, in early September 2016, Samsung suspended sales of the phone and announced an informal recall. This occurred after some units of the phones had batteries with a defect that caused them to produce excessive heat, leading to fires and explosions. Samsung replaced the recalled units of the phones with a new version; however, it was later discovered that the new version of the Galaxy Note7 also had the battery defect. Samsung recalled all Galaxy Note7 smartphones worldwide on 10 October 2016, and permanently ended production of the phone the following day.
On 31 August 2016, Samsung announced the Gear S3 smartwatch, which was released on 18 November 2016.[57]
Acquisitions and attempted acquisitions






This section has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This section is missing information about the acquisition of Harman International Industries. Please expand the section to include this information. Further details may exist on the talk page. (November 2016)







This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: most of the section belongs to articles about specific companies Please help improve this section if you can. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Samsung has made the following acquisitions and attempted acquisitions:[58]

Rollei – Swiss watch battle
Samsung Techwin acquired German camera-maker Rollei in 1995. Samsung (Rollei) used its optic expertise on the crystals of a new line of 100% Swiss-made watches, designed by a team of watchmakers at Nouvelle Piquerez S.A. in Bassequort, Switzerland. Rolex's decision to fight Rollei on every front stemmed from the close resemblance between the two names and fears that its sales would suffer as a consequence. In the face of such a threat, the Geneva firm decided to confront. This was also a demonstration of the Swiss watch industry's determination to defend itself when an established brand is threatened. Rolex sees this front-line battle as vital for the entire Swiss watch industry. Rolex has succeeded in keeping Rollei out of the German market. On 11 March 1995, the Cologne District court prohibited the advertising and sale of Rollei watches on German territory.[59][60] In 1999, Rollei management bought out the company.[61]


Fokker – Dutch aircraft maker
Samsung lost a chance to revive its failed bid to take over Dutch aircraft maker Fokker when other airplane makers rejected its offer to form a consortium. The three proposed partners—Hyundai, Hanjin and Daewoo—notified the South Korean government that they would not join Samsung Aerospace Industries.[62]


AST Research
Samsung bought AST (1994) in a failed attempt to break into the North American computer market. Samsung was forced to close the California-based computer maker following mass resignations of research staff and a string of losses.[63]


FUBU – clothing and apparel
In 1992, American fashion entrepreneur Daymond John had started the company with a hat collection that was made in the basement of his house in the Queens area of New York City. To fund the company, John had to mortgage his house for $100,000. With his friends J. Alexander Martin, Carl Brown and Keith Perrin, half of his house was turned into the first factory of FUBU, while the other half remained as the living quarters. Along with the expansion of FUBU, Samsung invested in FUBU in 1995.[64]


Lehman Brothers Holdings' Asian operations
Samsung Securities was one of a handful of brokerages looking into Lehman Brothers Holdings. But Nomura Holdings has reportedly waved the biggest check to win its bid for Lehman Brothers Holdings' Asian operations, beating out Samsung Securities, Standard Chartered and Barclays.[65] Ironically, after few months Samsung Securities Co., Ltd. and City of London-based N M Rothschild & Sons (more commonly known simply as Rothschild) have agreed to form a strategic alliance in investment banking business. Two parties will jointly work on cross border mergers and acquisition deals.[66]


MEDISON Co.,Ltd. – ultrasound monitors
In December 2010, Samsung Electronics bought MEDISON Co., a South Korean medical-equipment company, the first step in a long-discussed plan to diversify from consumer electronics.[67]


Grandis Inc. – memory developer
In July 2011, Samsung announced that it had acquired spin-transfer torque random access memory (MRAM) vendor Grandis Inc.[68] Grandis will become a part of Samsung's R&D operations and will focus on development of next generation random-access memory.[69]


Samsung and Sony joint venture – liquid crystal displays
On 26 December 2011 the board of Samsung Electronics approved a plan to buy Sony's entire stake in their 2004 joint liquid crystal display (LCD) venture for 1.08 trillion won ($938.97 million).[70]


mSpot, Inc – music service
On 9 May 2012, mSpot announced that it had been acquired by Samsung Electronics with the intention of a cloud based music service.[71] The succeeding service was Samsung Music Hub.


NVELO, Inc. – cache software developer
In December 2012, Samsung announced that it had acquired the privately held storage software vendor NVELO, Inc., based in Santa Clara, California.[72] NVELO will become part of Samsung's R&D operations, and will focus on software for intelligently managing and optimizing next-generation Samsung SSD storage subsystems for consumer and enterprise computing platforms.


NeuroLogica – portable CT scanner
In January 2013, Samsung announced that it has acquired medical imaging company NeuroLogica, part of the multinational conglomerate's plans to build a leading medical technology business. Terms of the deal were not disclosed.[73]


SmartThings – home automation
On 14 August 2014, Samsung acquired SmartThings, a fast-growing home automation startup. The company isn't releasing the acquisition price, but TechCrunch reported a $200 million pricetag when first caught word of the deal in July 2014.[74]


Quietside – U.S. air conditioner firm
On 19 August 2014, Samsung said it had acquired U.S. air conditioner distributor Quietside LLC as part of its push to strengthen its "smart home" business. A Samsung Electronics spokesman said the South Korean company acquired 100 percent of Quietside, but declined to elaborate on the price or other details.[75]


Proximal Data – data virtualization
3 November 2014, Samsung announced it had acquired Proximal Data, Inc., a San Diego, California-based pioneer of server-side caching software with I/O intelligence that work within virtualized systems.[76]


LoopPay – U.S. mobile payments firm
On 18 February 2015, Samsung acquired U.S. based mobile payments firm "LoopPay" - This allows Samsung in smartphone transactions.[77]


YESCO Electronics – U.S. based manufacturer of light emitting diode displays
On 5 March 2015, Samsung acquired small U.S.-based manufacturer of light emitting diode displays, YESCO Electronics, which focuses on making digital billboards and message signs.[78]


Viv – intelligent personal assistant
On 5 October 2016, Samsung announced it had acquired Viv, a company working on artificial intelligence.[79]


Rich Communications Services – text messaging standard
On 15 November 2016, Samsung Canada announced it has acquired Rich Communications Services, a company working on a new technology for text messaging.[80]

Sold parts
Samsung Techwin
Samsung Techwin was listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 012450), with its principal activities being the development and manufacture of surveillance, aeronautics, optoelectronics, automations and weapons technology. It was announced to be sold to Hanwha Group in December 2014[81] and the take-over completed in June 2015.[82]
Samsung Thales
Samsung Thales Co., Ltd. (until 2001 known as Samsung Thomson-CSF Co., Ltd.) was a joint venture between Samsung Techwin and the France-based aerospace and defence company Thales. It was established in 1978 and is based in Seoul.[83] Samsung's involvement was passed on to Hanwha Group as part of the Techwin transaction.[82]
Samsung General Chemicals



This section is empty. You can help by adding to it. (July 2017)


Samsung Total
Samsung Total was a 50:50 joint venture between Samsung and the France-based oil group Total S.A. (more specifically Samsung General Chemicals and Total Petrochemicals). Samsung's role was passed on to Hanwha Group when the latter acquired Samsung General Chemicals.[82]
Operations






This section has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (January 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This section contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (July 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)






The Samsung Library at Sungkyunkwan University Natural Sciences Campus in Suwon, South Korea






Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance HQ


Samsung comprises around 80 companies.[84] It is highly diversified, with activities in areas including construction, consumer electronics, financial services, shipbuilding and medical services.[84]
In FY 2009, Samsung reported consolidated revenues of 220 trillion KRW ($172.5 billion). In FY 2010, Samsung reported consolidated revenues of 280 trillion KRW ($258 billion), and profits of 30 trillion KRW ($27.6 billion) (based upon a KRW-USD exchange rate of 1,084.5 KRW per USD, the spot rate as of 19 August 2011[update]).[85] However, it should be noted that these amounts do not include the revenues from all of Samsung's subsidiaries based outside South Korea.[86]
Affiliates
As of April 2011, the Samsung Group comprised 59 unlisted companies and 19 listed companies, all of which had their primary listing on the Korea Exchange.[87]
Ace Digitech is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 036550).
Cheil Industries is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 001300).[88]
Cheil Worldwide is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 030000).
Credu is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 067280).
Imarket Korea is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 122900).
Samsung Card is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 029780).
Samsung SDS is a multinational IT Service company headquartered in Seoul. It was founded in March 1985. Its principal activity is the providing IT system(ERP, IT Infrastructure, IT Consulting, IT Outsourcing, Data Center). Samsung SDS is the Korea's largest IT service company. It achieved total revenues of 6,105.9 billion won (US$5.71 billion) in 2012.
Samsung C&T Corporation is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (000830).
Samsung Electro-Mechanics, established in 1973 as a manufacturer of key electronic components, is headquartered in Suwon, Gyeonggi-do, South Korea. It is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 009150).[89]
Samsung Electronics
Main article: Samsung Electronics
Samsung Electronics is a multinational electronics and information technology company headquartered in Suwon and the flagship company of the Samsung Group.[90] Its products include air conditioners, computers, digital televisions, liquid crystal displays (including thin film transistors (TFTs) and active-matrix organic light-emitting diodes (AMOLEDs)), mobile phones, monitors, printers, refrigerators, semiconductors and telecommunications networking equipment.[91] It is the world's largest mobile phone maker by unit sales in the first quarter of 2012, with a global market share of 25.4%.[92] It is also the world's second-largest semiconductor maker by 2011 revenues (after Intel).[93]
Samsung Electronics is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 005930).
Samsung Engineering
Main article: Samsung Engineering
Samsung Engineering is a multinational construction company headquartered in Seoul. It was founded in January 1969. Its principal activity is the construction of oil refining plants; upstream oil and gas facilities; petrochemical plants and gas plants; steel making plants; power plants; water treatment facilities; and other infrastructure.[94] It achieved total revenues of 9,298.2 billion won (US$8.06 billion) in 2011.[95]
Samsung Engineering is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 02803450).
Samsung Everland
Samsung Everland engages in an array of services closely associated with the day-to-day lives and business operations of its customers. Its business scope covers the three main sectors of Environment & Asset, Food Culture and Resort.
Since its inception in 1963 and the launch of theme park "Everland" in 1976, Samsung Everland has steadily built its presence across the markets of golf, building management, food and beverage, energy and environment. Through this process, Samsung Everland has managed to achieve its current market standing. As a corporation trusted by the local community and renowned globally as a pioneer in the infrastructure of life, Samsung Everland strives to help its customers lead fulfilling lives and achieve success in their business operations by building the infrastructure for every aspect of life including entertainment, culinary and business.
Samsung Fine Chemicals
Samsung Fine Chemicals is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 004000).
Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance
Main article: Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance
Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance is a multinational general insurance company headquartered in Seoul.[96] It was founded in January 1952 as Korea Anbo Fire and Marine Insurance and was renamed Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance in December 1993.[97] Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance offers services including accident insurance, automobile insurance, casualty insurance, fire insurance, liability insurance, marine insurance, personal pensions and loans.[98] As of March 2011 it had operations in 10 countries and 6.5 million customers. Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance had a total premium income of $11.7 billion in 2011 and total assets of $28.81 billion on 31 March 2011. It is the largest provider of general insurance in South Korea. Samsung Fire has been listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange since 1975 (number 000810).[98]
Samsung Heavy Industries
Main article: Samsung Heavy Industries
Samsung Heavy Industries is a shipbuilding and engineering company headquartered in Seoul. It was founded in August 1974. Its principal products are bulk carriers, container vessels, crude oil tankers, cruisers, passenger ferries, material handling equipment steel and bridge structures.[99] It achieved total revenues of 13,358.6 billion won in 2011 and is the world's second-largest shipbuilder by revenues (after Hyundai Heavy Industries).[100][101]
Samsung Heavy Industries is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 010140).
Samsung Life Insurance
Main article: Samsung Life Insurance
Samsung Life Insurance Co., Ltd. is a multinational life insurance company headquartered in Seoul. It was founded in March 1957 as Dongbang Life Insurance and became an affiliate of the Samsung Group in July 1963.[102] Samsung Life's principal activity is the provision of individual life insurance and annuity products and services.[103] As of December 2011 it had operations in seven countries, 8.08 million customers and 5,975 employees.[102] Samsung Life had total sales of 22,717 billion won in 2011 and total assets of 161,072 billion won at 31 December 2011.[102] It is the largest provider of life insurance in South Korea.
Samsung Life Insurance is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 032830)
Samsung Machine Tools
Samsung Machine Tools of America is a national distributor of machines in the United States. Samsung GM Machine Tools is the head office of China, It is an SMEC Legal incorporated company.[104]
Samsung Medical Center
The Samsung Medical Center was founded on 9 November 1994, under the philosophy of "contributing to improving the nation's health through the best medical service, advanced medical research and development of outstanding medical personnel". The Samsung Medical Center consists of a hospital and a cancer center. The hospital is located in an intelligent building with floor space of more than 200,000 square meters and 20 floors above ground and 5 floors underground, housing 40 departments, 10 specialist centers, 120 special clinics and 1,306 beds.
The 655-bed Cancer Center has 11 floors above ground and 8 floors underground, with floor space of over 100,000 square meters. SMC is a tertiary hospital manned by approximately 7,400 staff including over 1,200 doctors and 2,300 nurses. Since its foundation, the Samsung Medical Center has successfully incorporated and developed an advanced model with the motto of becoming a "patient-centered hospital", a new concept in Korea.[citation needed]
Samsung SDI
Samsung SDI is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 006400). On 5 December 2012, the European Union's antitrust regulator fined Samsung SDI and several other major companies for fixing prices of TV cathode-ray tubes in two cartels lasting nearly a decade.[105] SSDI also builds lithium-ion batteries for electric vehicles such as the BMW i3, and acquired Magna Steyr's battery plant in 2015.[106] SSDI began using the "21700" cell format in August 2015.[107] Samsung plans to build a factory in Hungary to supply 50,000 cars per year.[108]
Samsung Securities
Samsung Securities is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 016360).[citation needed]
Samtron
Samtron was a subsidiary of Samsung until 1999 when it became independent. After that, it continued to make computer monitors and plasma displays until 2003, Samtron became Samsung when Samtron was a brand. In 2003 the website redirected to Samsung.[citation needed]
Shilla Hotels and Resorts
The Hotel opened in March 1979, following the intention of the late Lee Byung-chull, the founder of the Samsung Group. Hosting numerous state visits and international events, it has played the role of locomotive for the service industry in Korea with pride and responsibility as "the face representing the Samsung Group" and "the hotel representing Korea". THE SHILLA maintains elegance and a tradition of winning guests' hearts with the aim of becoming "the best hospitality company". By joining LHW, it is on par with the most luxurious hotels in the world. Meanwhile, it has added modernistic design elements on top of the roof called tradition, thus going through changes to make itself a premium lifestyle space. In addition, with its know-how as a service company in the background, it started a duty-free shop business, and has built its image as the best global distribution company. Also, it is expanding its business into commissioned management of fitness facilities with five-star hotels in Korea and abroad as well as into the restaurant business. THE SHILLA promises to be a globally prestigious hospitality company that offers the best value for money by making creative innovations and continuously taking on challenges. Shilla Hotels and Resorts is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 008770).
S-1 Corporation
S-1 was founded as Korea's first specialized security business in 1997 and has maintained its position at the top of industry with the consistent willingness to take on challenges. S1 Corporation is listed on the Korea Exchange stock-exchange (number 012750).[citation needed]







Samsung Taepyeong-ro HQ in Jung District, Seoul









Samsung Engineering India Office- New Delhi, India









Samsung Japan's regional HQ at Roppongi, Minato, Tokyo, Japan









The Samsung Hub, formerly 3 Church Street, is a skyscraper located in the Downtown Core of Singapore.




Joint ventures





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


State-run Korea Agro-Fisheries Trade Corp. set up the venture, aT Grain Co., in Chicago, with three other South Korean companies, Korea Agro-Fisheries owns 55 percent of aT Grain, while Samsung C&T Corp, Hanjin Transportation Co. and STX Corporation each hold 15 percent.[109]
Brooks Automation Asia Co., Ltd. is a joint venture between Brooks Automation (70%) and Samsung (30%) which was established in 1999. The venture locally manufactures and configure vacuum wafer handling platforms and 300mm Front-Opening Unified Pod (FOUP) load port modules, and designs, manufactures and configures atmospheric loading systems for flat panel displays.[110]
Company POSS – SLPC s.r.o. was founded in 2007 as a subsidiary of Samsung C & T Corporation, Samsung C & T Deutschland and the company POSCO.[111]
Samsung Air China Life Insurance is a 50:50 joint venture between Samsung Life Insurance and China National Aviation Holding. It was established in Beijing in July 2005.[112]
Samsung Biologics will be jointly owned. Samsung Electronics Co. and Samsung Everland Inc. will each own a 40 percent stake in the venture, with Samsung C&T Corp. and Durham, North Carolina-based Quintiles each holding 10 percent. It will contract-make medicines made from living cells, and Samsung Group plans to expand into producing copies of biologics including Rituxan, the leukemia and lymphoma treatment sold by Roche Holding AG and Biogen Idec Inc.[113]
Samsung Bioepis is a joint venture between Samsung Biologics (85%) and the U.S.-based Biogen Idec (15%).[114] In 2014, Biogen Idec agreed to commercialize future anti-TNF biosimilar products in Europe through Samsung Bioepis.[115]
Samsung BP Chemicals, based in Ulsan, is a 49:51 joint venture between Samsung and the UK-based BP, which was established in 1989 to produce and supply high-value-added chemical products. Its products are used in rechargeable batteries and liquid crystal displays.[116][117][118]
Samsung Corning Precision Glass is a joint venture between Samsung and Corning, which was established in 1973 to manufacture and market cathode ray tube glass for black and white televisions. The company's first LCD glass substrate manufacturing facility opened in Gumi, South Korea, in 1996.
Samsung Sumitomo LED Materials is a Korea-based joint venture between Samsung LED Co., Ltd., an LED maker based in Suwon, Korea-based and the Japan-based Sumitomo Chemical. The JV will carry out research and development, manufacturing and sales of sapphire substrates for LEDs.[119]
SB LiMotive is a 50:50 joint company of Robert Bosch GmbH (commonly known as Bosch) and Samsung SDI founded in June 2008. The joint venture develops and manufactures lithium-ion batteries for use in hybrid-, plug-in hybrid vehicles and electric vehicles.
SD Flex Co., Ltd. was founded on October 2004 as a joint venture corporation by Samsung and DuPont, one of the world's largest chemical companies.[120]
Sermatech Korea owns 51% of its stock, while Samsung owns the remaining 49%. The U.S. firm Sermatech International, for a business specializing in aircraft construction processes such as special welding and brazing.[121]
Siam Samsung Life Insurance: Samsung Life Insurance holds a 37% stake while the Saha Group also has a 37.5% stake in the joint venture, with the remaining 25% owned by Thanachart Bank.[122]
Siltronic Samsung Wafer Pte. Ltd, the joint venture by Samsung and wholly owned Wacker Chemie subsidiary Siltronic, was officially opened in Singapore in June 2008.[123]
SMP Ltd. is a joint venture between Samsung Fine Chemicals and MEMC. MEMC Electronic Materials Inc. and an affiliate of Korean conglomerate Samsung are forming a joint venture to build a polysilicon plant.
Steco is the joint venture established between Samsung Electronics and Japan's Toray Industries in 1995.[124]
Stemco is a joint venture established between Samsung Electro-Mechanics and Toray Industries in 1995.[125]
Toshiba Samsung Storage Technology Corporation (TSST) is joint venture between Samsung Electronics and Toshiba of Japan which specialises in optical disc drive manufacturing. TSST was formed in 2004, and Toshiba owns 51% of its stock, while Samsung owns the remaining 49%.
Defunct
In 1998, Samsung created a U.S. joint venture with Compaq—called Alpha Processor Inc. (API)--to help it enter the high-end processor market. The venture was also aimed at expanding Samsung's non-memory chip business by fabricating Alpha processors. At the time, Samsung and Compaq invested $500 million in Alpha Processor.[126]
GE Samsung Lighting was a joint venture between Samsung and the GE Lighting subsidiary of General Electric. The venture was established in 1998 and was broken up in 2009.[127]
Global Steel Exchange was a joint venture formed in 2000 between Samsung, the U.S.-based Cargill, the Switzerland-based Duferco Group, and the Luxembourg-based Tradearbed (now part of the ArcelorMittal), to handle their online buying and selling of steel.[128]
S-LCD Corporation was a joint venture between Samsung Electronics (50% plus one share) and the Japan-based Sony Corporation (50% minus one share) which was established in April 2004. On 26 December 2011, Samsung Electronics announced that it would acquire all of Sony's shares in the venture.
Partially owned companies





This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: subsections far too short, need to be merged Please help improve this section if you can. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Atlântico Sul
Samsung Heavy Industries owns 10% of the Brazilian shipbuilder Atlântico Sul, whose Atlântico Sul Shipyard is the largest shipyard in South America. The Joao Candido, Brazil's largest ship, was built by Atlântico Sul with technology licensed by Samsung Heavy Industries.[129] The companies have a technical assistance agreement through which industrial design, vessel engineering and other know-how is being transferred to Atlântico Sul.[130]
DGB Financial Group
Samsung Life Insurance currently holds a 7.4% stake in the South Korean banking company DGB Financial Group, making it the largest shareholder.[131]
Corning Inc.
Samsung acquired 7.4% of Gorilla Glass maker Corning, signing a long-term supply deal.[132]
Doosan Engine
Samsung Heavy Industries currently holds a 14.1% stake in Doosan Engine, making it the second-largest shareholder.[133]
Korea Aerospace Industries
Samsung Techwin currently holds a 10% stake in Korea Aerospace Industries (KAI). Other major shareholders include the state-owned Korea Finance Corporation (26.75%), Hyundai Motor (10%) and Doosan (10%).[134]
MEMC KOREA
MEMC's joint venture with Samsung Electronics Company, Ltd. In 1990, MEMC entered into a joint venture agreement to construct a silicon plant in Korea.[135]
Pantech
Samsung buys 10% stake in rival phone maker Pantech.[136]
Rambus Incorporated
Samsung currently owns 4.19% of Rambus Incorporated.[137]
Renault Samsung Motors
Samsung currently owns 19.9% of the automobile manufacturer Renault Samsung Motors.
Seagate Technology
Samsung currently owns 9.6% of Seagate Technology, making it the second-largest shareholder. Under a shareholder agreement, Samsung has the right to nominate an executive to Seagate's Board of Directors.[138]
Sharp Corporation
Samsung owns 3% of Sharp Corporation, a rival company.[139]
SungJin Geotec
Samsung Engineering holds a 10% stake in Sungjin Geotec, an offshore oil drilling company that is a subsidiary of POSCO.[140]
Taylor Energy
Taylor Energy is an independent American oil company that drills in the Gulf of Mexico based in New Orleans, Louisiana.[141] Samsung Oil & Gas USA Corp., subsidiaries of Samsung, currently owns 20% of Taylor Energy.
Wacom
Samsung owns 5% of Wacom.[142]
Major clients





This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: random list Please help improve this section if you can. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






The world's largest oil and gas project, Sakhalin II- Lunskoye platform under construction. The topside facilities of the LUN-A (Lunskoye) and PA-B (Piltun Astokhskoye) platforms are being built at the Samsung Heavy Industry shipyard in South Korea.[143]


Major clients of Samsung include:

Royal Dutch Shell
Samsung Heavy Industries will be the sole provider of liquefied natural gas (LNG) storage facilities worth up to US$50 billion to Royal Dutch Shell for the next 15 years.[144][145]


Shell unveiled plans to build the world's first floating liquefied natural gas (FLNG) platform. In October 2012[146] at Samsung Heavy Industries' shipyard on Geoje Island in South Korea work started on a "ship" that, when finished and fully loaded, will weigh 600,000 tonnes, the world's biggest "ship". That is six times larger than the largest U.S. aircraft carrier.[147]


United Arab Emirates government
A consortium of South Korean firms, including Samsung, Korea Electric Power Corporation and Hyundai, won a deal worth $40 billion to build nuclear power plants in the United Arab Emirates.[148]


Ontario government
The government of the Canadian province of Ontario signed off one of the world's largest renewable energy projects, signing a deal worth $6.6 billion for an additional 2,500 MW of new wind and solar energy. Under the agreement, a consortium led by Samsung and the Korea Electric Power Corporation will manage the development of 2,000 MW-worth of new wind farms and 500 MW of solar capacity, while also building a manufacturing supply chain in the province.[149]

Logo and font





The neutrality of this article is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)















Samsung Byeolpyo noodles logo, used from late 1938 until replaced in 1958 













Samsung Group logo, used 1960s 













Samsung's current logo, in use since 1993[150] 






The current Samsung logo design is intended to emphasize flexibility and simplicity while conveying a dynamic and innovative image through the ellipse, the symbol of the universe and the world stage. The openings on both ends of the ellipse where the letters "S" and "G" are located are intended to illustrate the company's open-mindedness and the desire to communicate with the world. The English rendering is a visual expression of its core corporate vision, excellence in customer service through technology.[citation needed]
The basic color in the logo is blue, which Samsung has employed for years, symbolizing stability, reliability and corporate social responsibility.[151]
Audio logo
Samsung has an audio logo, which consists of the notes E♭, A♭, D♭, E♭. The audio logo was produced by Musikvergnuegen and written by Walter Werzowa.[152][153]
Font
In July 2016, Samsung unveiled its SamsungOne font, a typeface that hopes to give a consistent and universal visual identity to the wide range of Samsung products. SamsungOne was designed to be used across Samsung's diverse device portfolio, with a focus on legibility for everything from smaller devices like smartphones to larger connected TVs or refrigerators, as well as Samsung marketing and advertisements. The font family supports 400 different languages through over 25,000 characters.[154]
Samsung Medical Center
Samsung donates around US$100 million per annum to the Samsung Medical Center, a non-profit healthcare provider founded by the group in 1994.[155] Samsung Medical Center incorporates Samsung Seoul Hospital, Kangbook Samsung Hospital, Samsung Changwon Hospital, Samsung Cancer Center and Samsung Life Sciences Research Center. The Samsung Cancer Center, located in Seoul, is the largest cancer center in Asia.[156]
Samsung Medical Center and pharmaceutical multinational Pfizer have agreed to collaborate on research to identify the genomic mechanisms responsible for clinical outcomes in hepatocellular carcinoma.[citation needed]
Sponsorships




A Samsung display in Salt Lake City during the 2002 Winter Olympics


For more details on Samsung's sports sponsorships, see Samsung Sports.






This section has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: random list, most of the section belongs to articles about specific companies Please help improve this section if you can. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Samsung have been the sponsors of Premier League football club Chelsea since 2005, the sponsorship was ended after ten years in June 2015.[157]
Samsung, which started as a domestic sponsor of the Olympics in Seoul 1988, has been a worldwide Olympic partner since the 1998 Winter Olympics.[158]
Samsung operating many sports clubs, football club Suwon Samsung Bluewings, baseball club Samsung Lions, basketball club Seoul Samsung Thunders, volleyball club Daejeon Samsung Fire Bluefangs, etc.
Samsung also sponsors a former StarCraft: Brood War and current Starcraft II and League of Legends professional gaming team named Samsung Galaxy. Samsung has sponsored the team since 2000.
Samsung Electronics spent an estimated $14 billion (U.S.) – more than Iceland's GDP – on advertising and marketing in 2013. At 5.4% of annual revenue, this is a larger proportion than any of the world's top-20 companies by sales (Apple spent 0.6% and General Motors spent 3.5%). Samsung became the world's biggest advertiser in 2012, spending $4.3 billion, compared to Apple's $1 billion. Samsung's global brand value of $39.6 billion is less than half that of Apple.[159]
Samsung is the principal partner of the Sydney Opera House.[160]
In April 2016, Samsung were announced as the main sponsor of German Football League team Frankfurt Universe. Of the sponsorship, the Deputy President of Samsung Electronics said "it is important to promote athletic excellence not only in Germany but also in Frankfurt. Therefore we Frankfurt Universe want a great first season in the premier league of GFL". The partnership is for three years.[161]
Litigation and regulatory issues
See also: Samsung Electronics § Controversies, and Samsung Electronics § Viral marketing





This section may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: most of the section belongs to articles about specific companies Please help improve this section if you can. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Financial scandals
In 2007, former Samsung chief lawyer Kim Yong Chul claimed that he was involved in bribing and fabricating evidence on behalf of the group's chairman Lee Kun-hee and the company. Kim said that Samsung lawyers trained executives to serve as scapegoats in a "fabricated scenario" to protect Lee, even though those executives were not involved. Kim also told the media that he was "sidelined" by Samsung after he refused to pay a $3.3 million bribe to the U.S. Federal District Court judge presiding over a case where two of their executives were found guilty on charges related to memory chip price fixing. Kim revealed that the company had raised a large amount of secret funds through bank accounts illegally opened under the names of up to 1,000 Samsung executives—under his own name, four accounts were opened to manage 5 billion won.[162]
Antitrust concerns
"You can even say the Samsung chairman is more powerful than the President of South Korea. [South] Korean people have come to think of Samsung as invincible and above the law", said Woo Suk-hoon, host of a popular economics podcast in a Washington Post article headlined "In South Korea, the Republic of Samsung", published on 9 December 2012. Critics claimed that Samsung knocked out smaller businesses, limiting choices for South Korean consumers, and sometimes colluded with fellow giants to fix prices while bullying those who investigate. Lee Jung-hee, a South Korean presidential candidate, said in a debate, "Samsung has the government in its hands. Samsung manages the legal world, the press, the academics and bureaucracy".[163]
Viral marketing
The Fair Trade Commission of Taiwan is investigating Samsung and its local Taiwanese advertising agency for false advertising. The case was commenced after the Commission received complaints stating that the agency hired students to attack competitors of Samsung Electronics in online forums.[164] Samsung Taiwan made an announcement on its Facebook page in which it stated that it had not interfered with any evaluation report and had stopped online marketing campaigns that constituted posting or responding to content in online forums.[165]
Labor abuses
Samsung was the subject of several complaints about child labor in its supply chain from 2012 to 2015.
In July 2014, Samsung cut its contract with Shinyang Electronics after it received a complaint about the company violating child labor laws.[166] Samsung says that its investigation turned up evidence of Shinyang using underage workers and that it severed relations immediately per its "zero tolerance" policy for child labor violations.
One of Samsung's Chinese supplier factories, HEG, was criticized for using underage workers by China Labor Watch (CLW) in July 2014. HEG denied the charges and has sued China Labor Watch.[167][168]
CLW issued a statement in August 2014 claiming that HEG employed over ten children under the age of 16 at a factory in Huizhou, Guangdong. The group said the youngest child identified was 14 years old. Samsung said that it conducted an onsite investigation of the production line that included one-on-one interviews but found no evidence of child labor being used. CLW responded that HEG had already dismissed the workers described in its statement before Samsung's investigators arrived.[166]
CLW also claimed that HEG violated overtime rules for adult workers. CLW said a female college student was only paid her standard wage despite working four hours of overtime per day even though Chinese law requires ovetime pay at 1.5 to 2.0 times standard wages.[166]
Price fixing
On 19 October 2011, Samsung companies was fined €145,727,000 for being part of a price cartel of ten companies for DRAMs which lasted from 1 July 1998 to 15 June 2002. The companies received, like most of the other members of the cartel, a 10-% reduction for acknowledging the facts to investigators. Samsung had to pay 90% of their share of the settlement, but Micron avoided payment as a result of having initially revealed the case to investigators.[169]
In Canada, during 1999, some DRAM micro chip manufacturers conspired to price fix, among the accused included Samsung. The price fix was investigated in 2002. A recession started to occur that year, and the price fix ended; however, in 2014, the Canadian government reopened the case and investigated silently. Sufficient evidence was found and presented to Samsung and two other manufacturers during a class action lawsuit hearing. The companies agreed upon a $120 million agreement, with $40 million as a fine, and $80 Million to be paid back to Canadians who purchased a computer, printer, MP3 player, gaming console or camera from April 1999 to June 2002.[170]
References


^ a b c "삼성계열사 전자 - 삼성그룹 홈페이지". 
^ "Home and Kitchen Appliance showcase - Samsung". 
^ a b c d e "Samsung Financial Highlights". Samsung Group. Retrieved 13 May 2014. 
^ "Bangladesh and development: The path through the fields". The Economist. 3 November 2012. Retrieved 2 October 2013. Samsung now has around 80 companies and is the world’s largest information-technology firm. 
^ Park, Kyunghee (28 July 2009). "July 29 (Bloomberg) – Samsung Heavy Shares Gain on Shell's Platform Orders (Update1)". Bloomberg. Archived from the original on 24 September 2011. Retrieved 11 November 2010. 
^ "The Top 225 International Contractors 2013". Enr.construction.com. Retrieved 25 August 2013. 
^ "Global 500 2009: Industry: - FORTUNE on CNNMoney.com". Money.cnn.com. 20 July 2009. Retrieved 4 September 2010. 
^ Valhouli, Christina (21 March 2002). "The World's Best Amusement Parks". Forbes.com. Retrieved 11 September 2010. 
^ "Cheil Worldwide Inc (030000:Korea SE)". businessweek.com. Archived from the original on 5 October 2012. Retrieved 16 September 2010. 
^ "Cheil Worldwide (030000 KS)" (PDF). kdbdw.com. 26 April 2010. Retrieved 8 May 2013. 
^ "Samsung and its attractions – Asia's new model company". The Economist. 1 October 2011. Retrieved 11 January 2012. 
^ "South Korea's economy – What do you do when you reach the top?". The Economist. 12 November 2011. Retrieved 11 January 2012. 
^ Hutson, Graham; Richards, Jonathan (17 April 2008). "Samsung chairman charged with tax evasion – Times Online". The Times. London. Retrieved 28 February 2011. 
^ Shell, Glencore, and Other Multinationals Dominate Their Home Economies 4 April 2013 BusinessWeek
^ "한국 10대 그룹 이름과 로고의 의미". www.koreadaily.com. 10 July 2006. Retrieved 19 September 2010. 
^ a b "History – Corporate Profile – About Samsung – Samsung". Samsung Group. Samsung Group. Retrieved 21 October 2015. 
^ Ihlwan, Moon (22 April 2008). "Scandal-Plagued Samsung Chairman Quits". Bloomberg. Retrieved 21 October 2015. 
^ "Industrial giant's roots tied to nylon products". Joongangdaily.joins.com. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "효성 40년史..오너 일가 뒷얘기 '눈길'". www.chosun.com. 19 June 2007. Archived from the original on 1 May 2011. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "SPC-1000". old-computers.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ (in Korean) Gumisamsung.com
^ "Samsung to celebrate 100th anniversary of late founder". koreaherald.com. 29 March 2010. Retrieved 21 January 2011. 
^ a b Hansol, Shinsegae Deny Relations with Saehan 24 May 2000. Joongangdaily
^ "Samsung invests $4B in Austin to boost chip output", Austin Business Journal, 21 August 2012, retrieved 22 August 2012 
^ "Samsung Austin Semiconductor Begins $3.6B Expansion for Advanced Logic Chips" (PDF). Austinchamber.com. 9 June 2010. Retrieved 13 September 2010. [dead link]
^ "Dubai skyscraper symbol of S. Korea's global heights". CNN. 19 October 2009. Retrieved 19 October 2009. 
^ Cho, Kevin (24 April 2009). "Samsung Says Hopes of Recovery Are 'Premature' as Profit Falls". Bloomberg. Retrieved 4 September 2010. [dead link]
^ "Samsung buys Sony's entire stake in LCD joint venture". bbc.co.uk. 26 December 2011. 
^ "Samsung Techwin to spin off camera business". reuters.com. 6 November 2008. Retrieved 5 April 2011. 
^ Tchorek, Kamil (1 November 2011). "Samsung: Proud tradition of maths proves a strong draw". The Financial Times. London. Retrieved 28 May 2013. 
^ Business Wire (6 December 2011), Biogen Idec, Inc. (Massachusetts) (BIIB) Teams With Samsung Corporation on $300 Million Biosimilar Venture (press release), BioSpace, biospace.com, retrieved 3 January 2012 
^ Yang, Jun (7 December 2011), "Samsung, Biogen Idec Agree to Set Up $300 Million Venture", Bloomberg Businessweek, New York City: Bloomberg L.P., businessweek.com, archived from the original on 16 January 2013, retrieved 3 January 2012 
^ "Seagate Completes Acquisition of Samsung's Hard Disk Drive Business|Seagate". www.seagate.com. Retrieved 14 July 2015. 
^ "Samsung overtakes Nokia in mobile phone shipments". BBC News. 27 April 2012. Retrieved 6 August 2012. 
^ "Samsung overtakes Nokia for Cellphone Lead". Retrieved 29 April 2012. 
^ Kirk Ladendorf (21 August 2012), "Analysts: Samsung's Austin upgrades will keep it near head of the pack on low-power processors", Austin American-Statesman 
^ Vascellaro, Jessica E.. (25 August 2012) The Wall Street Journal. Online.wsj.com. Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ "Samsung bites back after Apple victory". Al Jazeera English. 26 August 2012. Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ South Korean court rules Samsung didn’t copy Apple’s iPhone design, but both infringed patents – The Washington Post[dead link]
^ Samsung Shares Fall After Apple Wins $1 Billion Verdict. Bloomberg. Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ "Apple Seeks Ban on Sales of Eight Samsung Phones in U.S." Bloomberg. 27 August 2012. Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ "Apple Denied Motion for Permanent Injunction". Scribd.com. Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ "Samsung to audit 250 of its suppliers in China amid allegations of child labor violations". CBS News. 4 September 2012. Retrieved 4 September 2012. 
^ "Worried customers clog phones". 3 News NZ. 3 May 2013. 
^ Miyoung Kim (27 November 2013). "Samsung's marketing splurge doesn't always bring bang-for-buck". Reuters. Retrieved 15 December 2013. 
^ "Samsung Music closing July 1". Digital Journal. 20 May 2014. Retrieved 23 May 2014. 
^ dcseifert. "Samsung's Gear VR is a portable Oculus Rift for the Galaxy Note 4". The Verge. Vox Media. Retrieved 31 August 2015. 
^ Lee, Min- Jeong (6 October 2014). "Samsung to Invest $14.7 Billion in New Chip Plant in South Korea". The Wall Street Journal. New York. Retrieved 6 October 2014. 
^ Samsung to invest $560 million in Vietnam TV production plant. Reuters, 1 October 2014
^ By Cadie Thompson, CNBC. "How Samsung plans to get inside your company." 7 October 2014. 7 October 2014.
^ By Min-Jeong Lee, The Wall Street Journal. "Samsung to Sell Fiber Optics Business to Corning." 2 December 2014. 2 December 2014.
^ Jonathan Cheng, The Wall Street Journal. "Look Inside Samsung's New Silicon Valley Headquarters." 19 May 2015. 19 May 2015.
^ Tood Bishop, GeekWire. "New stats: Samsung surges past IBM to lead U.S. patent race for 2015." 15 December 2015. 15 December 2015.
^ Ingrid Lunden and Frederic Lardinois, TechCrunch. “Samsung Partners With Microsoft For Windows 10 IoT Effort.” 7 January 2016. 8 January 2016.
^ Boas, Antonio Villas (2 June 2016). "Samsung releases truly wireless earbuds". techinsider.io. Retrieved 4 June 2016. 
^ DailyMail. "Say hello to Galaxy Note 7: Samsung reveals new smartphone will be unveiled on August 2nd." July 18, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2017.
^ Brian Heater, TechCrunch. "Samsung’s big Gear S3 smartwatch arrives November 18." November 03, 2016. Retrieved March 16, 2017.
^ "Samsung buys Swedish wireless chip company Nanoradio". computerworld.com. Retrieved 11 June 2012. 
^ "Voigtländer & Rollei non-camera items". 9 June 1997. Archived from the original on 21 August 2011. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "Basel 96 Watches Take Back the Spotlight". jckonline.com. June 1996. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "WWW.TLR-CAMERAS.COM/Rollei". 
^ "Samsung Loses Attempt to Acquire Fokker". latimes.com. 1 January 1997. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "Samsung buys Dutch group in return to M&A". 9 June 1997. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "FUBU Shoes". shoeshowcase.net. Archived from the original on 24 December 2010. Retrieved 5 February 2011. 
^ "Nomura Wins The Lehman Asia Stakes". Forbes. 22 September 2008. Retrieved 7 February 2011. 
^ "Samsung-Rothschild alliance". koreatimes.co.kr. 5 November 2008. Retrieved 7 February 2011. 
^ Ramstad, Evan (14 December 2010). "Samsung Electronics Buys Ultrasound-Monitor Maker Medison - WSJ.com". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 11 February 2013. 
^ Dylan McGrath, EE Times. "Samsung buys MRAM developer Grandis." 2 August 2011. Retrieved 2 August 2011.
^ Chris Preimesberger, eWeek. "Samsung Acquires New-Gen Memory Maker Grandis." 2 August 2011. Retrieved 2 August 2011.
^ "Samsung to buy Sony half of LCD venture". 26 December 2011. 
^ Samsung Electronics Acquires Mspot | Mspot. Mspotcorporate.com (9 May 2012). Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ Samsung Electronics Acquires NVELO. Samsung.com (14 December 2012). Retrieved 19 March 2013. Archived 23 April 2015 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Samsung Buys Medical Imaging Company NeuroLogica. TechCrunch (28 January 2013). Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ Samsung Acquires SmartThings, A Fast-Growing Home Automation Startup. Forbes (14 August 2014). Retrieved 19 August 2014.
^ Samsung buys U.S. air conditioner firm Quietside in 'smart home' push. Foxbusiness (19 August 2014). Retrieved 19 August 2014.
^ "Samsung Electronics Acquires Proximal Data" (Press release). Samsung. 3 November 2014. 
^ "Samsung's LoopPay: What it is, and why you should care". CNET. Retrieved 20 February 2015. 
^ By Min-Jeong Lee, The Wall Street Journal. "Samsung's Latest Acquisition: Utah-Based Yesco Electronics." 5 March 2015. 27 March 2015.
^ Panzarino, Matthew (5 October 2016). "Samsung acquires Viv, a next-gen AI assistant built by the creators of Apple’s Siri". TechCrunch. Retrieved 10 October 2016. 
^ Tibken, Shara (15 November 2016). "Samsung's new acquisition will make your texts more interesting". CNET. Retrieved 17 November 2016. 
^ "Samsung refocuses on its core business as it sells security arm Samsung Techwin to Hanwha Group". 
^ a b c "(LEAD) Hanwha wraps up takeover of four Samsung arms". 
^ "Company Overview of Samsung Thales Co., Ltd.". bloomberg.com. Retrieved 21 October 2015. 
^ a b Miyoung Kim (17 January 2012). "Samsung Group plans record $41 billion investment in 2012". Reuters. Retrieved 18 July 2013. 
^ "삼성 8년전 타임캡슐 열어보니...지난해 매출 정확히 맞춰". news.naver.com. 13 January 2011. Retrieved 22 August 2011. 
^ "한국경제 大计 기업이 이끈다 지난해 주요그룹 매출 보니". Hankook Ilbo. 30 July 2010. Archived from the original on 28 April 2011. Retrieved 4 September 2010. 
^ Kim Kyung-rok　 (11 April 2011). "Chaebol asset holdings swell under Lee administration". hani.co.kr. Retrieved 18 September 2011. 
^ "Samsung's Cheil Industries submits plans for roughly $1.4 billion IPO" (Press release). Reuters. 14 October 2014. 
^ "Samsung Electro-Mechanics Co – Profile". Bloomberg Businessweek. Archived from the original on 5 September 2011. Retrieved 26 August 2012. 
^ Barkham, Patrick (9 August 2012). "Samsung: Olympic smartphone firm aims for big global wins". The Guardian. London. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "Profile: Samsung Electronics Co Ltd". Reuters. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "Samsung overtakes Nokia in mobile phone shipments". BBC News. 27 April 2012. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "Preliminary Worldwide Ranking of the Top 20 Suppliers of Semiconductors in 2011". IHS Isuppli. Archived from the original on 27 June 2012. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "Samsung Engineering Co Ltd (028050.KS)". REUTERS. Retrieved 22 February 2017. 
^ "2011 Financial Statements" (PDF). Samsung Engineering. Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 June 2013. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "Profile: Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance Co Ltd". Reuters. Retrieved 18 October 2012. 
^ "Corporate Profile". Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance. Retrieved 18 October 2012. 
^ a b "Annual Report 2010". Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance. Archived from the original on 1 February 2013. Retrieved 18 October 2012. 
^ "Company Profile for Samsung Heavy Industries Co Ltd". Bloomberg. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "Separate Statements of Income Years Ended December 31, 2011 and 2010" (PDF). Samsung Heavy Industries. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ "From bad to worse". The Korea Times. 19 August 2012. Retrieved 27 August 2012. 
^ a b c "2011 Annual Report" (PDF). Samsung Life Insurance. Archived from the original (PDF) on 4 October 2012. Retrieved 28 August 2012. 
^ "Company Profile for Samsung Life Insurance Co Ltd". Bloomberg. Retrieved 28 August 2012. 
^ The Samsung mission Archived 26 August 2014 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Philips, LG Electronics, 4 others fined 1.47 billion Euros for EU cartel". The Economic Times. 5 December 2012. Retrieved 5 December 2012. 
^ http://www.samsungsdi.com/sdi-news/379.html?pageIndex=1&idx=379&searchCondition=0&searchKeyword=
^ "Samsung SDI Unveils E-bike Battery Capable of 100km on Single Charge". Be Korea-savvy. 26 August 2015. Archived from the original on 26 December 2015. Retrieved 31 August 2016. 
^ "Samsung SDI to Build Electric Vehicle Battery Plant for European Market". TheStreet. 30 August 2016. Retrieved 30 August 2016. 
^ "South Korea Starts Grain Venture in Chicago to Secure Supply". bloomberg.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Brooks Automation and Samsung Electronics Announce a Joint Venture". investor.brooks.com. Retrieved 28 March 2012. 
^ "POSCO and Subsidiaries" (PDF). londonstockexchange.com. Retrieved 6 June 2012. 
^ "Insurance joint venture off to flying start". english.sohu.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Samsung Group, Quintiles Plan $266 Million Venture to Make Biologic Drugs". bloomberg.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Biogen Idec (NASDAQ:BIIB) and Samsung JV". livetradingnews.com. Archived from the original on 15 June 2012. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Biogen Idec and Samsung Bioepis Ink Biosimilar Deal". Gen. Eng. Biotechnol. News (paper)|format= requires |url= (help). 34 (2). 15 January 2014. p. 14. 
^ "Samsung to sell chemicals and defence operations for $1.7bn". Kable. 26 November 2014. Retrieved 6 March 2014. 
^ "Samsung BP Chemicals". BP. Archived from the original on 3 April 2015. Retrieved 6 March 2015. 
^ "Company Overview of Samsung BP Chemicals Co., Ltd.". Bloomberg Business. Bloomberg. Retrieved 6 March 2015. 
^ "Samsung and Sumitomo Chemical to make sapphire substrates for LEDs". ledsmagazine.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "company/introduce". sdflex.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Samsung Aerospace, Sermatech Launch Korean JV". english.chosun.com. Retrieved 28 March 2012. 
^ "Siam Samsung Life ready to reawaken". bangkokpost.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Siltronic-Samsung Joint Venture". wacker.com. Archived from the original on 5 October 2012. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Completion Ceremony for EDS Production". toray.com. Archived from the original on 30 November 2012. Retrieved 28 March 2012. 
^ "Toray/Samsung JV boosts FPD circuit substrate capacity". electroiq.com. Retrieved 28 March 2012. 
^ "Alpha's demise thwarts Samsung's processor dreams, analysts say". www.eetimes.com. Retrieved 2 April 2012. 
^ "LED EXPO&OLED EXPO 2011 An Interview with GE Lighting". us.GFSSGYG aving.net. Retrieved 2 April 2012. 
^ "Steel firms in B2B venture". money.cnn.com. 10 May 2000. Retrieved 2 April 2012. 
^ "Shipyards in Brazil – Rev. D, June 2010" (PDF). INTSOK. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2 February 2014. 
^ "Milestone launch at Brazil's Atlântico Sul". MarineLog. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Company Analysis" (PDF). rdata.youfirst.co.kr. Archived from the original (PDF) on 11 April 2014. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Samsung eyes 7.4 percent stake in Gorilla Glass maker Corning". news.cnet.com. Retrieved 23 October 2013. 
^ "Doosan Engine ends 33.2 pct higher on stock market debut". yonhapnews.co.kr. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Korea Aerospace sale could prove need for clearer M&A guidelines". privateequitykorea.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "MEMC Korea Company". memc.com. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Samsung to buy 10 percent stake in rival Pantech". zdnet.com. Retrieved 23 October 2013. [dead link]
^ "Rambus, Inc. RMBS". morningstar.ca. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Seagate to Buy Samsung's Hard-Disk Unit for $1.38 Billion, Build Alliance". Bloomberg Businessweek. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Samsung buys stake in struggling Sharp". money.cnn.com. Retrieved 23 October 2013. 
^ "Posco Heavy Industries' may be in the works" (PDF). Korea JoongAng Daily. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Taylor Energy Sells Gulf of Mexico Assets to Two South Korean Companies". reuters.com. 1 February 2008. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Samsung buys five percent stake in stylus-maker Wacom". engadget.com. Retrieved 23 October 2013. [dead link]
^ "The Russian offshore project "Sakhalin II" is relying on Arma-Chek R". armacell.com. Archived from the original on 1 May 2011. Retrieved 7 February 2011. 
^ "Samsung Heavy Industries". www.forbes.com. 23 September 2009. Retrieved 13 September 2010. 
^ "Samsung Heavy Signs Deal with Shell to Build LNG Facilities". www.hellenicshippingnews.com. 31 July 2009. Retrieved 13 September 2010. [dead link]
^ "Major construction begins on the Prelude FLNG project". 18 October 2012. Retrieved 15 July 2014. 
^ "The gas platform that will be the world's biggest 'ship'". bbc.co.uk. 15 July 2011. Retrieved 19 March 2012. 
^ "Seoul wins 40-billion-dollar UAE nuclear power deal". www.france24.com. 28 December 2009. Archived from the original on 3 March 2011. Retrieved 29 September 2010. 
^ "Korean Companies Anchor Ontario's Green Economy – January 21, 2010". www.premier.gov.on.ca. 21 January 2010. Archived from the original on 15 May 2011. Retrieved 13 September 2010. 
^ Samsung 1993. Corporatebrandmatrix.com (19 May 2007). Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ "한국 10대 그룹 이름과 로고의 의미". Koreadaily. Retrieved 10 July 2006. 
^ "Speaker". Audio Branding Academy. Retrieved 17 December 2015. 
^ "Logo Video". Samsung-Youtube. Retrieved 15 January 2011. 
^ Chaim Gartenberg, The Verge. “Samsung developed its own font called SamsungOne.” 25 July 2016. 25 July 2016.
^ "기업의 사회공헌 삼성그룹, 함께 가는 `창조 경영`... 봉사도 1등". www.dt.co.kr. Retrieved 19 September 2010. 
^ Roberts, Rob (26 October 2009). "AECOM Technology buys Ellerbe Becket". kansascity.bizjournals.com. Retrieved 19 September 2010. 
^ "Yokohama to become official shirt partner". Chelsea F.C. 26 February 2015. Retrieved 26 July 2015. 
^ The Olympic Games and Samsung. Ajw.asahi.com. Retrieved 19 March 2013.
^ Kim, Miyoung (27 November 2013). "Samsung's marketing splurge doesn't always bring bang-for-buck". Reuters. Retrieved 21 October 2015. 
^ "Samsung Sponsorship - Sydney Opera House - Samsung". samsung.com. Retrieved 31 August 2015. 
^ "Samsung ist Namensgeber und Hauptsponsor". Frankfurter Neue Presse. 15 April 2016. Retrieved 4 May 2016. 
^ Choe Sang-Hun (6 November 2007). "Corruption scandal snowballs at South Korea's Samsung Group". New York Times. Retrieved 23 September 2013. 
^ Chico Harlan (9 December 2012). "In South Korea, the Republic of Samsung". The Washington Post. Retrieved 23 September 2013. 
^ AFP (15 April 2013). "Taiwan probes Samsung 'dirty tricks' vs HTC'". Google News. Archived from the original on 28 July 2013. Retrieved 27 September 2013. 
^ CNA (9 April 2013). "Samsung postpones Galaxy 4S debut in Taiwan". Want China Times. Retrieved 27 September 2013. 
^ a b c Reisinger, Don (28 August 2014). "Samsung supplier factory found to use child labor, watchdog says". CNET. United States. Retrieved 10 March 2015. 
^ "Another Samsung supplier factory exploiting child labor". 
^ "Cover-up involving underage workers at Samsung supplier alleged by labor group". 
^ "Antitrust: Commission fines DRAM producers € 331 million for price cartel; reaches first settlement in a cartel case". European Commission. European Commission. Retrieved 22 April 2012. 
^ "Canadian DRAM Class Action". themoneyismine.com. Retrieved 31 August 2015. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Samsung.



Official website
Samsung Group (in Korean)
Samsung Group (in Chinese)







v
t
e


Samsung



Subsidiaries





Electronics




Samsung Electronics
Samsung Electro-Mechanics
Samsung SDI
Samsung SDS
Samsung Display
Samsung Corning Advanced Glass






Heavy Industries




Samsung C&T Engineering & Construction Group
Samsung Heavy Industries
Samsung Engineering






Financial Services




Samsung Life Insurance
Samsung Fire & Marine Insurance
Samsung Card
Samsung Securities
Samsung Asset Management
Samsung Venture Investment






Others




Samsung C&T Trading & Investment Group
Samsung C&T Fashion Group

Bean Pole


Samsung C&T Resort Group

Everland
Everland Resort
Caribbean Bay


Hotel Shilla
Cheil Worldwide
S-1
Samsung Medical Center
Samsung Economic Research Institute
Samsung Biologics
Samsung Bioepis
Samsung Welstory
Samsung Indonesia

Samsung Electronics Indonesia
Samsung Tugu Insurance
Naver Indonesia
Spotify Indonesia













Affiliated Organisations



Samsung Human Resources Development Center
Samsung Foundation

Samsung Foundation of Culture
Samsung Welfare Foundation
Samsung Life Public Welfare Foundation


Ho-am Foundation

Ho-am Art Museum
Ho-am Art Hall
Ho-am Prize


Leeum, Samsung Museum of Art
PLATEAU
Samsung Childcare Center
Samsung Child Education and Culture Center
Samsung Dream Class
Samsung Scholarship
Samsung Corporate Citizenship
Mydog & Samsung
Samsung Institude of Safety & Environment
Samsung Press Foundation
Samsung Science & Technology Foundation
Samsung Electronics Science & Technology Center
Samsung Legal Aid Services
Samsung Transportation Museum





Sports



Samsung Sports
Suwon Samsung Bluewings
Samsung Lions
Seoul Samsung Thunders
Yongin Samsung Blueminx
Daejeon Samsung Bluefangs
Samsung Galaxy
Samsung Training Center





People



Lee Byung-chul
Lee Kun-hee
Lee Jae-yong
Lee Boo-jin
Lee Seo-hyun
Lee Yoon-hyung





Other



Samsung Hub
Samsung Town
Samsung Global Scholarship Program
Sungkyunkwan University
CJ
Shinsegae
Hansol
Saehan
JoongAng Ilbo
TBC








 Category
 Commons












v
t
e


2016 South Korean political scandal



Related people





Choi Tae-min family




Choi Tae-min
Choi Sun-deuk
Choi Soon-sil
Chung Yoon-hoi
Jang Si-ho
Chung Yoo-ra
Jo Sun-je






Other people




Park Geun-hye
Kim Jong
Ko Young-tae
Jay Y. Lee
Kim Ki-chun
Ahn Bong-geun
Ahn Jong-bum
Woo Byung-woo
Lee Gyeong-je
Lee Seung-chul
Lee Jae-man
Jung Ho-sung
Cha Eun-taek








Related
organizations



Mir Foundation
K-Sports Foundation
The Blue K
Korean Salvation Mission
NEST Foundation
Samsung
The Federation of Korean Industries
Korea Winter Sports Talent Center
Armstrong





Reactions



2016–17 South Korean protests
Impeachment of Park Geun-hye





Related topics



South Korean presidential election, 2017












v
t
e


Chaebol (South Korean conglomerates)




Economy of South Korea



Top 10



Samsung
Hyundai Motor Group
LG
SK Group
Lotte
GS Group
Hyundai Heavy Industries Group
Kumho Asiana Group
Hanjin
Hanwha





Others



Aju Group
Amorepacific Corporation
Byuck San
CJ Group
Crown
Daelim Group
Daesang Corporation
Dongbu Group
Dongkuk
Doosan Group
E-Land
Eugene Group
Halla Group
Hanil
Hankook Tire
Hansol
Hite
Hyosung
Isu Group
KCC Corporation
Kiswel Group
Kolon Group
Korea Tobacco & Ginseng Corporation
KT Corporation
Kyobo Life Insurance Company
LS Group
Nexen
Nongshim
Orion
POSCO
Saehan
Shinsegae
SsangYong Group
STX Corporation
Taekwang Group
YTN Group





Defunct



Daewoo
Keo-Pyung








 Category










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Samsung&oldid=792673983"					
Categories: Samsung1938 establishments in KoreaChaebolCompanies based in SeoulConglomerate companies established in 1938Conglomerate companies of South KoreaElectronics companies established in 1938Electronics companies of South KoreaHolding companies of South KoreaLens manufacturersManufacturing companies established in 1938Manufacturing companies of South KoreaMobile phone manufacturersMultinational companies headquartered in South KoreaRetail companies established in 1938Retail companies of South KoreaTechnology companies established in 1938Technology companies of South KoreaHidden categories: Articles with Korean-language external linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from August 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2013Webarchive template wayback linksPages using citations with format and no URLArticles with dead external links from June 2016Wikipedia pages semi-protected against vandalismUse British English from April 2015Use dmy dates from February 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing Korean-language textAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2017Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles needing cleanup from January 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from January 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from January 2017Articles to be expanded from November 2016Articles to be expanded from July 2017All articles to be expandedArticles with empty sections from July 2017All articles with empty sectionsArticles using small message boxesArticles needing additional references from January 2014All articles needing additional referencesArticles with a promotional tone from July 2015All articles with a promotional toneArticles containing potentially dated statements from August 2011Articles needing additional references from April 2017Articles needing cleanup from April 2017Cleanup tagged articles with a reason field from April 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from April 2017NPOV disputes from April 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Official website different in Wikidata and WikipediaArticles with Chinese-language external links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansአማርኛÆngliscالعربيةAzərbaycancaবাংলাБеларускаяभोजपुरीBislamaБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGalegoગુજરાતી客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIgboBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתBasa Jawaಕನ್ನಡქართულიKurdîКыргызчаLatinaLatviešuLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംमराठीمصرىBahasa Melayuမြန်မာဘာသာNāhuatlNederlandsनेपाली日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀپښتوPolskiPortuguêsQaraqalpaqshaRomânăРусскийСаха тылаसंस्कृतम्ScotsShqipSimple EnglishسنڌيSlovenčinaSlovenščinaSoomaaligaکوردیСрпски / srpskiBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeTürkmençeУкраїнськаاردوئۇيغۇرچە / UyghurcheTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語Žemaitėška中文डोटेली 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 27 July 2017, at 22:40.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 



























Britax - The #1 Brand in Safety Technology.
























                SHOP
            


                REGISTRATION
            


                SIGN UP
            


LOGIN



                CART
            


                SEARCH
            



































Safety Notice: B-Safe 35 Chest Clip

















OUR MISSION:
To be the leader and innovator that inspires and enables families to travel safely and grow with peace of mind.













 




Our Products









Car Seats
A full line of infant car seats, convertible car seats, and booster seats from the #1 brand in safety technology.



Shop Now








Strollers
A versatile, smart line of strollers that fit your family  lifestyle.



Find Yours








Travel Systems
Britax travel systems combine the safety of our car seats with exceptional maneuverability.



Explore









WHY FIT IN WHEN YOU WERE BORN TO STAND OUT?  - Dr. Seuss
Find Your Fashion












Shop Accessories


Shop Replacement Parts











Tight is safety.
Tight is love.

Learn More












 











DESIGNED. TESTED. BUILT. HERE.
Learn More












PEACE OF MIND
Why Britax?





 





B-READY STROLLER
Ready for Anything
Find Yours












 








2017 Car Seat Check Dates








 











FIND YOUR CHILD'S PERFECT FIT
FIT MY CHILD












WHY DO CAR SEATS EXPIRE?
Stay Safe










Register a Product



Start Here








Write a Review



Rate Us








Get Support



Contact Us








Stay Informed



Sign Up











Safety Notices










Britax B-Agile Recall: 2/2017




Britax B-Safe 35 Handle Recall: 1/2016




Britax B-Ready Arm Bar Recall: 1/2016




View All safety notices, product recalls, and other alerts.
















Prong | Take Charge With Our Innovative iPhone Cases































































PWR Case
Protective Case with Detachable Battery Pack and Integrated Charging Prongs.

Shop iPhone 6s/6
Shop iPhone 5s/5









PocketPlug
Protective Case with Integrated Charging Prongs.

Shop iPhone 5s/5
Shop iPhone 4


















OUR PRODUCTS







PWR Case

No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Detachable Backup Battery
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 6s/6 | 5s/5

                                            PRODUCT DETAILS            
                                        







PocketPlug

No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 5s/5 | 4

                                            PRODUCT DETAILS            
                                        





PRESS





                    "A veritable Swisss army knife of an iPhone case"
                






                    "Ingenious Idea"
                






                    "The first of its kind in the world"
                







                    "If you've ever experienced the horror of reaching into a bag only to find that you've forgotten to bring a charger for you dying phone´s battery, then you'll understand why this case is rather appealing"
                






                    "You have to ask what it's worth to never again have to say ¨oh no I forgot my charger¨"
                








                    "It's one of the coolest cases I've ever seen"
                





                    "You can leave your charging cable at home, but still top of the battery wherever you find an outlet"
                







Feature Comparison




























                                No CordsNeeded                            

















































Integrated WallCharger                            

















































Backup Battery 

















































                                Protective                            

















































                                Pocketable                            






















































×





Shop Now
And never lose power again.


Your Cart





×



1

SELECT PRODUCT



2

PAYMENT INFORMATION



3

PLACE ORDER







PWR Case for iPhone 6s/6

 Also available for                     
                iPhone 5s/5            


No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Detachable Backup Battery
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 6s/6 | 5s/5

Warranty: 1 year warranty
Battery: up to 100% extra battery


1
Choose Your Battery Capacity


Up to 100% (2600 mAh)
Up to 120% (3500 mAh)

2x Battery Power


2
Style


























Slate - Soft Touch

 




3
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 















































3
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 

 


PWR Case for iPhone 6s/6

 Also available for                     
                iPhone 5s/5            


No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Detachable Backup Battery
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 6s/6 | 5s/5

Warranty: 1 year warranty
Battery: up to 130% extra battery


1
Choose Your Battery Capacity


Up to 100% (2600 mAh)
Up to 120% (3500 mAh)

2.3x Battery Power


2
Style


























Slate - Soft Touch

 




3
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 















































3
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 

 


PWR Case for iPhone 5s/5

 Also available for                     
                iPhone 6s/6            


No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Detachable Backup Battery
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 6s/6 | 5s/5

Warranty: 1 year warranty
Battery: 1500 mAh (80%)

1.8x Battery Power


1
Style
















Slate - Soft Touch

 




2
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 


























2
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 

 


PocketPlug for iPhone 5s/5

 Also available for                     
                iPhone 4            


No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 5s/5 | 4

Warranty: 1 year warranty



1
Style































Slate - Soft Touch

 




2
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 









































2
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 

 


PocketPlug for iPhone 4

 Also available for                     
                iPhone 5s/5            


No Cords Needed
Integrated Wall Charger
Beautiful, Protective Inner Case
Pocketable

Available for iPhone 5s/5 | 4

Warranty: 1 year warranty



1
Style
















Slate - Soft Touch

 




2
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 


























2
Quantity



12345 



Price










            Add to Cart        


The  is currently on back order
Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order
 

 

Your Cart



                Checkout                


                Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order            



Free Shipping On All Domestic Orders over $50
* Excludes international and rush orders





Secure Credit Card Payment


1
Contact







Keep me posted on the latest Prong news and receive exclusive special offers.






2
Shipping Address









AfghanistanAlbaniaAlgeriaAmerican SamoaAndorraAngolaAnguillaAntarcticaAntigua and BarbudaArgentinaArmeniaArubaAustraliaAustriaAzerbaijanBahamasBahrainBangladeshBarbadosBelarusBelgiumBelizeBeninBermudaBhutanBoliviaBosnia and HerzegovinaBotswanaBouvet IslandBrazilBritish Indian Ocean TerritoryBrunei DarussalamBulgariaBurkina FasoBurundiCambodiaCameroonCanadaCape VerdeCayman IslandsCentral African RepublicChadChileChinaChristmas IslandCocos (Keeling) IslandsColombiaComorosCongoCook IslandsCosta RicaCote D'IvoireCroatiaCubaCyprusCzech RepublicDenmarkDjiboutiDominicaDominican RepublicEast TimorEcuadorEgyptEl SalvadorEquatorial GuineaEritreaEstoniaEthiopiaFalkland Islands (Malvinas)Faroe IslandsFijiFinlandFrance, MetropolitanFrench GuianaFrench PolynesiaFrench Southern TerritoriesGabonGambiaGeorgiaGermanyGhanaGibraltarGreeceGreenlandGrenadaGuadeloupeGuamGuatemalaGuineaGuinea-BissauGuyanaHaitiHeard and Mc Donald IslandsHondurasHong KongHungaryIcelandIndiaIndonesiaIran (Islamic Republic of)IraqIrelandIsraelItalyJamaicaJapanJordanKazakhstanKenyaKiribatiNorth KoreaKorea, Republic ofKuwaitKyrgyzstanLao People's Democratic RepublicLatviaLebanonLesothoLiberiaLibyan Arab JamahiriyaLiechtensteinLithuaniaLuxembourgMacauFYROMMadagascarMalawiMalaysiaMaldivesMaliMaltaMarshall IslandsMartiniqueMauritaniaMauritiusMayotteMexicoMicronesia, Federated States ofMoldova, Republic ofMonacoMongoliaMontserratMoroccoMozambiqueMyanmarNamibiaNauruNepalNetherlandsNetherlands AntillesNew CaledoniaNew ZealandNicaraguaNigerNigeriaNiueNorfolk IslandNorthern Mariana IslandsNorwayOmanPakistanPalauPanamaPapua New GuineaParaguayPeruPhilippinesPitcairnPolandPortugalPuerto RicoQatarReunionRomaniaRussian FederationRwandaSaint Kitts and NevisSaint LuciaSaint Vincent and the GrenadinesSamoaSan MarinoSao Tome and PrincipeSaudi ArabiaSenegalSeychellesSierra LeoneSingaporeSlovak RepublicSloveniaSolomon IslandsSomaliaSouth AfricaSouth Georgia & South Sandwich IslandsSpainSri LankaSt. HelenaSt. Pierre and MiquelonSudanSurinameSvalbard and Jan Mayen IslandsSwazilandSwedenSwitzerlandSyrian Arab RepublicTaiwanTajikistanTanzania, United Republic ofThailandTogoTokelauTongaTrinidad and TobagoTunisiaTurkeyTurkmenistanTurks and Caicos IslandsTuvaluUgandaUkraineUnited Arab EmiratesUnited KingdomUnited StatesUnited States Minor Outlying IslandsUruguayUzbekistanVanuatuVatican City State (Holy See)VenezuelaViet NamVirgin Islands (British)Virgin Islands (U.S.)Wallis and Futuna IslandsWestern SaharaYemenDemocratic Republic of CongoZambiaZimbabweJerseyGuernseyMontenegroSerbiaAaland IslandsBonaire, Sint Eustatius and SabaCuracaoPalestinian Territory, OccupiedSouth SudanSt. BarthelemySt. Martin (French part)Canary Islands 




ALAKASAZARAFAAACAEAMAPCACOCTDEDCFMFLGAGUHIIDILINIAKSKYLAMEMHMDMAMIMNMSMOMTNENVNHNJNMNYNCNDMPOHOKORPWPAPRRISCSDTNTXUTVTVIVAWAWVWIWY 










This is a commercial address






United States Standard (3-5 business days)
United States Overnight Delivery



Standard 6-10 business days






✓
Apply
×





3
Payment


                    Secured by SSL                





Jan
Feb
Mar
Apr
May
June
July
Aug
Sept
Oct
Nov
Dec




2017201820192020202120222023202420252026 









Error

Review Order








1
Shipping Information



















ALAKASAZARAFAAACAEAMAPCACOCTDEDCFMFLGAGUHIIDILINIAKSKYLAMEMHMDMAMIMNMSMOMTNENVNHNJNMNYNCNDMPOHOKORPWPAPRRISCSDTNTXUTVTVIVAWAWVWIWY 





AfghanistanAlbaniaAlgeriaAmerican SamoaAndorraAngolaAnguillaAntarcticaAntigua and BarbudaArgentinaArmeniaArubaAustraliaAustriaAzerbaijanBahamasBahrainBangladeshBarbadosBelarusBelgiumBelizeBeninBermudaBhutanBoliviaBosnia and HerzegovinaBotswanaBouvet IslandBrazilBritish Indian Ocean TerritoryBrunei DarussalamBulgariaBurkina FasoBurundiCambodiaCameroonCanadaCape VerdeCayman IslandsCentral African RepublicChadChileChinaChristmas IslandCocos (Keeling) IslandsColombiaComorosCongoCook IslandsCosta RicaCote D'IvoireCroatiaCubaCyprusCzech RepublicDenmarkDjiboutiDominicaDominican RepublicEast TimorEcuadorEgyptEl SalvadorEquatorial GuineaEritreaEstoniaEthiopiaFalkland Islands (Malvinas)Faroe IslandsFijiFinlandFrance, MetropolitanFrench GuianaFrench PolynesiaFrench Southern TerritoriesGabonGambiaGeorgiaGermanyGhanaGibraltarGreeceGreenlandGrenadaGuadeloupeGuamGuatemalaGuineaGuinea-BissauGuyanaHaitiHeard and Mc Donald IslandsHondurasHong KongHungaryIcelandIndiaIndonesiaIran (Islamic Republic of)IraqIrelandIsraelItalyJamaicaJapanJordanKazakhstanKenyaKiribatiNorth KoreaKorea, Republic ofKuwaitKyrgyzstanLao People's Democratic RepublicLatviaLebanonLesothoLiberiaLibyan Arab JamahiriyaLiechtensteinLithuaniaLuxembourgMacauFYROMMadagascarMalawiMalaysiaMaldivesMaliMaltaMarshall IslandsMartiniqueMauritaniaMauritiusMayotteMexicoMicronesia, Federated States ofMoldova, Republic ofMonacoMongoliaMontserratMoroccoMozambiqueMyanmarNamibiaNauruNepalNetherlandsNetherlands AntillesNew CaledoniaNew ZealandNicaraguaNigerNigeriaNiueNorfolk IslandNorthern Mariana IslandsNorwayOmanPakistanPalauPanamaPapua New GuineaParaguayPeruPhilippinesPitcairnPolandPortugalPuerto RicoQatarReunionRomaniaRussian FederationRwandaSaint Kitts and NevisSaint LuciaSaint Vincent and the GrenadinesSamoaSan MarinoSao Tome and PrincipeSaudi ArabiaSenegalSeychellesSierra LeoneSingaporeSlovak RepublicSloveniaSolomon IslandsSomaliaSouth AfricaSouth Georgia & South Sandwich IslandsSpainSri LankaSt. HelenaSt. Pierre and MiquelonSudanSurinameSvalbard and Jan Mayen IslandsSwazilandSwedenSwitzerlandSyrian Arab RepublicTaiwanTajikistanTanzania, United Republic ofThailandTogoTokelauTongaTrinidad and TobagoTunisiaTurkeyTurkmenistanTurks and Caicos IslandsTuvaluUgandaUkraineUnited Arab EmiratesUnited KingdomUnited StatesUnited States Minor Outlying IslandsUruguayUzbekistanVanuatuVatican City State (Holy See)VenezuelaViet NamVirgin Islands (British)Virgin Islands (U.S.)Wallis and Futuna IslandsWestern SaharaYemenDemocratic Republic of CongoZambiaZimbabweJerseyGuernseyMontenegroSerbiaAaland IslandsBonaire, Sint Eustatius and SabaCuracaoPalestinian Territory, OccupiedSouth SudanSt. BarthelemySt. Martin (French part)Canary Islands 







This is a commercial address






United States Standard (3-5 business days)
United States Overnight Delivery



Standard 6-10 business days










Keep me posted on the latest Prong news and receive exclusive special offers.






2
Payment


                    Secured by SSL                






✓
Apply
×








Billing information same as shipping address



















ALAKASAZARAFAAACAEAMAPCACOCTDEDCFMFLGAGUHIIDILINIAKSKYLAMEMHMDMAMIMNMSMOMTNENVNHNJNMNYNCNDMPOHOKORPWPAPRRISCSDTNTXUTVTVIVAWAWVWIWY 





AfghanistanAlbaniaAlgeriaAmerican SamoaAndorraAngolaAnguillaAntarcticaAntigua and BarbudaArgentinaArmeniaArubaAustraliaAustriaAzerbaijanBahamasBahrainBangladeshBarbadosBelarusBelgiumBelizeBeninBermudaBhutanBoliviaBosnia and HerzegovinaBotswanaBouvet IslandBrazilBritish Indian Ocean TerritoryBrunei DarussalamBulgariaBurkina FasoBurundiCambodiaCameroonCanadaCape VerdeCayman IslandsCentral African RepublicChadChileChinaChristmas IslandCocos (Keeling) IslandsColombiaComorosCongoCook IslandsCosta RicaCote D'IvoireCroatiaCubaCyprusCzech RepublicDenmarkDjiboutiDominicaDominican RepublicEast TimorEcuadorEgyptEl SalvadorEquatorial GuineaEritreaEstoniaEthiopiaFalkland Islands (Malvinas)Faroe IslandsFijiFinlandFrance, MetropolitanFrench GuianaFrench PolynesiaFrench Southern TerritoriesGabonGambiaGeorgiaGermanyGhanaGibraltarGreeceGreenlandGrenadaGuadeloupeGuamGuatemalaGuineaGuinea-BissauGuyanaHaitiHeard and Mc Donald IslandsHondurasHong KongHungaryIcelandIndiaIndonesiaIran (Islamic Republic of)IraqIrelandIsraelItalyJamaicaJapanJordanKazakhstanKenyaKiribatiNorth KoreaKorea, Republic ofKuwaitKyrgyzstanLao People's Democratic RepublicLatviaLebanonLesothoLiberiaLibyan Arab JamahiriyaLiechtensteinLithuaniaLuxembourgMacauFYROMMadagascarMalawiMalaysiaMaldivesMaliMaltaMarshall IslandsMartiniqueMauritaniaMauritiusMayotteMexicoMicronesia, Federated States ofMoldova, Republic ofMonacoMongoliaMontserratMoroccoMozambiqueMyanmarNamibiaNauruNepalNetherlandsNetherlands AntillesNew CaledoniaNew ZealandNicaraguaNigerNigeriaNiueNorfolk IslandNorthern Mariana IslandsNorwayOmanPakistanPalauPanamaPapua New GuineaParaguayPeruPhilippinesPitcairnPolandPortugalPuerto RicoQatarReunionRomaniaRussian FederationRwandaSaint Kitts and NevisSaint LuciaSaint Vincent and the GrenadinesSamoaSan MarinoSao Tome and PrincipeSaudi ArabiaSenegalSeychellesSierra LeoneSingaporeSlovak RepublicSloveniaSolomon IslandsSomaliaSouth AfricaSouth Georgia & South Sandwich IslandsSpainSri LankaSt. HelenaSt. Pierre and MiquelonSudanSurinameSvalbard and Jan Mayen IslandsSwazilandSwedenSwitzerlandSyrian Arab RepublicTaiwanTajikistanTanzania, United Republic ofThailandTogoTokelauTongaTrinidad and TobagoTunisiaTurkeyTurkmenistanTurks and Caicos IslandsTuvaluUgandaUkraineUnited Arab EmiratesUnited KingdomUnited StatesUnited States Minor Outlying IslandsUruguayUzbekistanVanuatuVatican City State (Holy See)VenezuelaViet NamVirgin Islands (British)Virgin Islands (U.S.)Wallis and Futuna IslandsWestern SaharaYemenDemocratic Republic of CongoZambiaZimbabweJerseyGuernseyMontenegroSerbiaAaland IslandsBonaire, Sint Eustatius and SabaCuracaoPalestinian Territory, OccupiedSouth SudanSt. BarthelemySt. Martin (French part)Canary Islands 







Jan
Feb
Mar
Apr
May
June
July
Aug
Sept
Oct
Nov
Dec




2017201820192020202120222023202420252026 








Error


PLACE ORDER






Review Your Order
Review Your Order

Edit
Your Information



Shipping Address







Shipping Method



Billing Method








Edit
Order Summary




Shipping:



Discount ():



Total



Error

Place Order



            Secured by SSL        



×



OOPS, NOW YOUR CART IS EMPTY.



Discount



Shipping



Total
$





Back To Shop


Checkout


Please visit our Resellers Page if you are interested in placing a bulk order










                Add to Cart            




                Checkout                








Newsletter, deals and steals
Be the first to know about the latest Prong news and receive Exclusive Offers.




Sign Up






        Prong, Inc. 1133 Broadway, Suite 645 New York, NY 10010 (917) 226 - 0558
    





Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software






Safer Skincare - Clean Beauty - Join the Movement | THE OFFICIAL BEAUTYCOUNTER SITE















































Start a new order with:


Yes, let's go
No, Search Again











You are shopping with: 















Start Shopping




Shop 's Socials





Change






Doesn't look familiar?
Search for a different Consultant or shop without a Consultant








What is a Consultant: 


Think of a Consultant as a personal shopper who can work with you to provide recommendations and purchasing advice throughout your Beautycounter experience. If you want your Consultant to get credit for this order, please select their name from the search results.

What is a Social: 

A Social is a gathering where people learn about the Beautycounter mission and can preview, sample, and order products.
 Have you recently attended a Social? If so, select a Social from the dropdown menu.





                Shop with a different Consultant
            








Search for a different Consultant. Select a name from the search results, and you will be directed to
                    their personal website to place your order. The next time you visit Beautycounter.com, you will shop
                    with your original Consultant.
                
If you would like to change your default Consultant, please contact Customer Care or call (888)
                        988-9108.
















SPEND $75+, RECEIVE TWO PROTECT SPF LIP BALMS FOR FREE 
 


SHOP THE NEW LIMITED EDITION OCEAN & PACIFIC PALETTE


FREE SHIPPING + REWARDS & SAVINGS  BECOME A BEAUTYCOUNTER MEMBER




SPEND $75+, RECEIVE TWO PROTECT SPF LIP BALMS FOR FREE 
 


SHOP THE NEW LIMITED EDITION OCEAN & PACIFIC PALETTE


FREE SHIPPING + REWARDS & SAVINGS  BECOME A BEAUTYCOUNTER MEMBER




SPEND $75+, RECEIVE TWO PROTECT SPF LIP BALMS FOR FREE 
 


SHOP THE NEW LIMITED EDITION OCEAN & PACIFIC PALETTE


BECOME A MEMBER, Free Shipping + More...





*Spend $150+ US / $175+ CAN in product purchases (less applicable taxes, shipping and handling, and Member enrollment fees), receive your choice of one Cleansing Balm ($80 US value / $94 CAN value) or one Body Oil in Citrus Mimosa ($73 US value / $89 CAN value) for FREE. Offer available to Clients and Band of Beauty Members in the US & Canada only. $150 US / $175 CAN purchase minimum is applicable towards host rewards. Offer valid from 12:01 AM PST on July 27, 2017, until 11:59 PM PST on July 30, 2017, while supplies last. Offer available on Beautycounter.com and Consultant Personal Websites only. Quantities are limited; substitutions in gift options may occur. Offer not valid on previous purchases. Offer not transferable or interchangeable. We reserve the right to modify or replace any part of these terms and conditions without notice. Offer subject to change in Beautycounter’s sole discretion.

Shop Now
*Spend $75+ in product purchases (less applicable taxes, shipping and handling, and Member enrollment fees), receive two Protect Lip Balms ($20 value) for FREE. Offer available to Consultants, Clients and Band of Beauty Members in the US only. $75 purchase minimum is applicable towards host rewards. Offer valid from 12:01 AM PST on August 1, 2017, until 11:59 PM PST on August 8, 2017, while supplies last. Offer available on Beautycounter.com and Consultant Personal Websites only. Quantities are limited; substitutions in gift options may occur. Offer not valid on previous purchases. Offer cannot be combined with Consultant enrollment orders. Offer not transferable or interchangeable. We reserve the right to modify or replace any part of these terms and conditions without notice. Offer subject to change in Beautycounter’s sole discretion.

Shop Now
*Offer available to Consultants, Clients and Band of Beauty Members in the US & Canada only. Consultant discount is not applicable. I'm Yours Valentine's Day Duo, which includes: Color Sweep Blush Duo in Bloom/Tulip and Sheer Lipstick in Rose (US: $52 SRP / $70 value, CAN: $64 SRP / $87 value), is available for a limited time only, while supplies last. Offer available on Beautycounter.com, Behind the Counter and Consultant Personal Websites only. If purchasing within an open Social for US & CAN, the Social must be closed and submitted prior to 11:59 PM PST on February 12, 2017. To receive orders by February 14, 2017, cut-off dates for placing orders are as follow: For US Ground Shipping, orders must be placed by 10am PST on February 6, 2017. For US Expedited Shipping, orders must be placed by 10am PST on February 12, 2017. For CAN Ground Shipping, orders must be placed by 10am PST on February 3, 2017. Delivery dates and timeframes are estimated and not guaranteed. Offer not valid on previous purchases. Offer not transferable or interchangeable. Exceptions will not be granted. Terms subject to change.

Shop Now
 





Find a Consultant
Become a Consultant







0



 
X


                            Your bag is empty. Fill it up!                        









US
            






US



EN



FR



 

Sign In













 



JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                



























Skin CareBeautycounter+CleansersToners & Mists MasksMoisturizersFace Oils & SerumsEye & Lip Care Sun ProtectionSets & Collections View AllMakeupFaceEyesLipsMakeup RemoversBrushes & BagsCollectionsView AllBath & BodyMoisturizersBody Wash & ScrubsHair CareSun ProtectionHand CareCollectionsView AllFamilyBabyKidsCollectionsView AllOur StoryOur FounderOur Safety MissionIngredients GlossaryEventsCareersView All 


Find a Consultant
Become a Consultant



Sign In






 US
                    


 CAN
            

EN

|

FR



 





Beautycounter 









You did not add your free gift to your shopping cart.

SELECT YOUR GIFT


Shop Now






Let’s Talk Transparency
Clear information is one of the most important factors in any purchasing decision. Find out what transparency means to us in our first-ever Corporate Social Responsibility Report.
Learn More





















The Latest from The Asterisk Blog

More articles




Must-Watch Video




More videos




X





 




TOP






Our Products
Skin Care
Makeup
Bath & Body
Family
 


Our Story
Our Founder
Our Safety Mission
Ingredients
The Never List™
Transparency
Team
Events
Careers
The Asterisk Blog
Target
Pop Up Shop


 


Help
Contact Us
Shipping
Returns
FAQs
Trusted Non-Profits
Certifications
Resources
 



Make a Difference
Become a Consultant
Find a Consultant
Socials & Events
Become a Member
 

















 








Sign Up



You're in! Thanks for signing up.




Sign up to receive exclusive news on product launches, helpful tips and special offers.







© 2017 COUNTERBRANDS LLC. ALL RIGHTS RESERVED. TERMS OF USEPRIVACY POLICY 







X









X


Want to be in the Know?
Get Beautycounter updates on product launches, exclusive tips, and special offers.









Sign Up



You're in! Thanks for signing up.




Sign up to receive exclusive news on product launches, helpful tips and special offers.





















Kidde Fire Safety Products: Shop Smoke Alarms, Carbon Monoxide Detectors, Fire Extinguishers













































This site uses cookies. By continuing to use this site you are agreeing to use cookies. Find out more.   ×




CommonSearchHandler.ashx
















 




News
Careers
Global





 Fire Safety













X

Don't miss out.


Get useful tips, reminders, product notices, and discount offers.



Name 
Email* 
Subscribe





We respect your email privacy

















NOMINATE ON FACEBOOK:
Nominate your community fire department for the Step Up and Stand Out Award and learn how to support your local first responders.

LEARN MORE







FIRE SAFETY
Learning the basics of fire safety is the first step in fighting fire - and it just so happens to be the most important.

LEARN MORE







CO SAFETY
What is carbon monoxide? How can carbon monoxide poisoning be prevented?

LEARN MORE






  










EVERY HOME’S DIFFERENT. FIND THE RIGHT PRODUCTS FOR YOURS.Explore products










PRODUCT SAFETY NOTICE:Hardwired Combination CO & Smoke Alarm KN-COSM-IB. Learn more.









READY TO BUY? WE’RE NEVER FAR AWAY.
Find a store or buy online



Select one
Smoke Alarms
CO Alarms
Combination Smoke/CO Alarms
Fire Extinguishers
Safety Accessories
Key Safes

























iHome: Products: Audio





































Products 
Apps
Support


Sign in


















Apps
Deals
Support

View All Products

Beauty
Wireless
SmartHome
Headphones
Classic


Sign In
Create Account









                    Classic
                




                    Beauty
                




                    Wireless
                




                    SmartHome
                




                    Headphones
                


View All Products








Products




Filter





Filter

Connection


 Lightning Connector
 Bluetooth
 AUX Line-In


Product Type


 Classic
 Wireless Audio
 SmartHome
 Headphones
 Beauty
 Zenergy


Features


 Alarm Clock
 Radio
 Bluetooth
 Docking
 NFC Technology
 Rechargeable Battery
 Melody
 Wireless Charging
 iHome Vanity Mirror
 Waterproof
 Splashproof
 Speakerphone
 Color Changing
 Amazon Echo Dot™ Docking




Close







Showing 15 of 15 Products





Free Shipping with a $60 purchase!


There are no products that match your criteria.
We recommend unchecking your last selection in the filter, or you can show all products.




Sports Headphones
Fitness Headphones








This is a new product.

iDL46


							
								Dual Charging Stereo FM Clock Radio...
							
						








iBN6


							
								Rugged Portable Waterproof Bluetooth...
							
						








iPL22


							
								Lightning Clock Radio for iPhone/iPod
							
						








iBN180


							
								Rubberized NFC Bluetooth Dual Alarm...
							
						








iBN27


							
								NFC Bluetooth Rechargeable Stereo...
							
						








iDL100


							
								Triple Charging Stereo FM Clock...
							
						








iPL10


							
								Dual Charging Stereo FM Clock Radio...
							
						








iBT65


							
								Bluetooth Rechargeable Mini Speaker...
							
						








iBT4


							
								Bluetooth Wireless Rechargeable...
							
						

								
								 
								
							


Gray
Block Series Purple










iBT22


							
								Bluetooth Bedside Dual Alarm Clock...
							
						








iBN20


							
								NFC Bluetooth Wireless FM Clock Radio...
							
						

								
								 
								
							


Gunmetal










iBN97


							
								NFC Bluetooth Stereo FM Clock Radio...
							
						








iBT24


							
								Bluetooth Rechargeable Stereo Mini...
							
						

								
								 
								
							


Block Series Green
Block Series Purple










iM60


							
								NEON Rechargeable Mini Speaker
							
						

								
								 
								
							


Neon Pink










iDM8


							
								Rechargeable Portable Bluetooth...
							
						











Live. Life. Loud.














Sign In
Create Account




Products
Deals
View All
Write a Review




Apps
iHome Zen
iHome Sleep
iHome Control




Company
About
Blog
Press & Awards
Hospitality
Press & Media Inquiries




Support
Hardware
Apps
Register Product
Contact Us




Call us 1 (800) 288-2792
Copyright © 2017 SDI Technologies Inc. All Rights Reserved. iHome & Live Life Loud are trademarks of SDI Technologies, Inc.

Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Sustainability Policy
iHome App EULA




























